The Project Gutenberg EBook of Deaconesses in Europe, by Jane M. Bancroft

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org


Title: Deaconesses in Europe
       and their Lessons for America

Author: Jane M. Bancroft

Release Date: March 6, 2007 [EBook #20747]

Language: English


*** START OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK DEACONESSES IN EUROPE ***




Produced by Barbara Tozier, David Wilson, Bill Tozier and
the Online Distributed Proofreading Team at
http://www.pgdp.net









                 DEACONESSES IN EUROPE

                          AND

               THEIR LESSONS FOR AMERICA



                           BY

                 JANE M. BANCROFT, Ph.D



                  WITH AN INTRODUCTION

                           BY

             EDWARD G. ANDREWS, D.D., LL.D.

       _Bishop of the Methodist Episcopal Church_


                                            "No life
   Can be pure in its purpose and strong in its strife,
   And all life not be purer and stronger thereby."


                _NEW YORK: HUNT & EATON_
             _CINCINNATI: CRANSTON & STOWE_
                          1890




                IN GRATEFUL RECOGNITION,

                           TO

           THE EARNEST AND DEVOTED WOMEN WHO,

      AS MEMBERS OF THE COMMITTEE ON DEACONESS WORK

                           OF

          THE WOMAN'S HOME MISSIONARY SOCIETY,

  HAVE AIDED IN EXTENDING THE KNOWLEDGE OF THE DIACONATE
                        OF WOMEN,

               THIS BOOK IS RESPECTFULLY

                        Dedicated

                     BY THE AUTHOR.




AUTHOR'S NOTE.


The Author has aimed to present an accurate and concise statement of the
deaconess cause as it exists at the present time.

In all cases where it was possible, original sources of information have
been consulted.

Many friends, both in Europe and America, have given invaluable aid, for
which words of thanks are an inadequate recognition.

The excellent Index at the close of the volume was kindly prepared by
the Rev. J. C. Thomas.

Acknowledgments are also due to Mr. Gillett, Librarian of the Union
Theological Seminary, and to Mr. C. H. A. Bjerregaard, of the Astor
Library, for putting not only the facilities of the library, but their
personal assistance, at the service of the writer.

                                                  JANE M. BANCROFT.
  NEW YORK CITY, _June 5, 1889_.




                             CONTENTS.


                            CHAPTER I.

                          THE DIACONATE.

  Compassion a Christian virtue--Brotherhood of all men in
  Christ--Foreign Missions--Home Missions--Service of
  ministering compassion gives rise to the diaconate--Diaconate
  of women--Its qualities--Field of labor                 Page 9

                            CHAPTER II.

                 DEACONESSES IN THE EARLY CHURCH.

  Little knowledge of early Church--Pliny's letter--Apostolic
  Constitutions--Deaconesses, widows, and virgins--Duties of the
  deaconess--Chrysostom, Olympias--Deaconesses in Western
  Church--Decline in importance--Extinction--Influences that led
  to decay                                                    18

                           CHAPTER III.

     DEACONESSES FROM THE TWELFTH TO THE NINETEENTH CENTURIES.

  Béguines--Characteristics--Duties--Gerhard Groot--Sisters of
  the Common Life--Obligations--Duties--Waldenses--Bohemian
  Brethren--Luther--Calvin--Reformed Church at Wesel--
  Deaconesses in Amsterdam--Damsels of Charity--Mennonites and
  Moravians                                                   34

                            CHAPTER IV.

       FLIEDNER, THE RESTORER OF THE OFFICE OF DEACONESS.

  Efforts for the restoration of the office of deaconess made by
  Klönne--Amalie Sieveking--Von Stein--Count von der Recke--
  Fliedner--His childhood--Youth--Student life--Pastorate and
  travels--Marriage--First prison society--Founding of refuge--
  Need of training schools--Rhenish-Westphalian Deaconess
  Society                                                     46

                            CHAPTER V.

               THE INSTITUTIONS AT KAISERSWERTH.

  Opening of hospital training-school--Gertrude Reichardt--The
  Home-life--Normal school--Fliedner's wife--Publishing house--
  Orphan asylum--Insane asylum--Dispensary--Farm--"Salem"--House
  of Evening Rest--Extension of work--Berlin--Foreign lands
  Jerusalem--Beirut--Smyrna--Bucharest--Florence--Rome        61

                           CHAPTER VI.

   THE REGULATIONS AT KAISERSWERTH AND THE DUTIES AND SERVICES
                       OF THE DEACONESSES.

  Two classes of deaconesses--Nurses--Teachers--Qualifications--
  Probationers--Duties--Service of consecration--Conferences--
  Table of results--Instances of work--Duisburg--
  Schleswig-Holstein war--Austrian war--Franco Prussian war   79

                           CHAPTER VII.

              OTHER ESTABLISHMENTS ON THE CONTINENT.

  House at Strasburg--Mülhausen--Marthashof at Berlin--
  Neudettelsau--St. Loup--Riehen--Zürich--Gallneukirchen--
  Characteristics of institutions--Countries where they exist 93

                          CHAPTER VIII.

                 DEACONESSES IN GERMAN METHODISM.

  Origin of Bethany Society--House at Frankfort--Hamburg--
  Berlin--St. Gall--Zürich--Sister Myrtha--House of Rest--"God's
  Fidelity"--House regulations--Training--Results            110

                           CHAPTER IX.

                      DEACONESSES IN PARIS.

  Deaconess Home on Rue de Reuilly--Situation--School--
  Hospital--House of Correction--Preparatory school--
  Instruction--Prison mission--Mademoiselle Dumas--Expenses of
  house--Its founders--Deaconess house on Rue Bridaine--
  Character of work--Duties of the Sisters--Their consecration--
  Importance of parish deaconesses                           120

                            CHAPTER X.

                     DEACONESSES IN ENGLAND.

  Early beginnings--The Puritans--Cambridge Platform--Southey's
  complaint--Mrs. Fry--Fliedner--Florence Nightingale--Agnes
  Jones--Distinction between "sister" and "deaconess"--
  Institutions in Church of England--Garb--Ceremonies--
  Self-denying lives--Dr. Laseron's institutions and others--
  Prison mission of Mrs. Meredith--The Sisters of the People 142

                           CHAPTER XI.

                      MILDMAY INSTITUTIONS.

  Rev. W. Pennefather--Sketch of his life--Building of hall and
  deaconess home at Mildmay--Conference hall--Nursing hall--
  Mission and hospital at Bethnal Green--The deaconesses--Their
  training--Expense--Expenses of institution                 166

                           CHAPTER XII.

                     DEACONESSES IN SCOTLAND.

  Church of Scotland--Organization of woman's work--Report of
  committees--Scheme--Adoption--Women's Guild--Women-workers'
  Guild--Deaconesses--Training--Syllabus of lectures--
  Presbyterian Church of England and Ireland Page            189

                          CHAPTER XIII.

                 THE DEACONESS CAUSE IN AMERICA.

  German Lutherans--Fliedner visits America--Philadelphia--
  Mother-house of Deaconesses--Deaconesses in the Episcopal
  Church--Among the Presbyterians--The Methodist Episcopal
  Church--Deaconess-home in Chicago--Action of General
  Conference--Fields of work                                 204

                           CHAPTER XIV.

   THE MEANS OF TRAINING AND THE FIELD OF WORK FOR DEACONESSES
                           IN AMERICA.

  Advantages of the Home and Training-school--Field of work--In
  hospitals--Insane asylums--Infant-schools--Teachers--The
  Home-mission deaconess--Her work in London--Similar work
  needed in cities of the United States                      228

                           CHAPTER XV.

             OBJECTIONS MET AND SUGGESTIONS OFFERED.

  Objection that deaconesses resemble Catholic nuns--Their
  influence--Numbers in different orders--Order of Charles--
  Objection to garb--Its advantages--Objection to the life
  answered--Opinion of Bryce concerning American women--Women of
  Methodism--Advice to candidates--Associates--The Church
  commended by its deeds                                     247




INTRODUCTION.


How far, and in what form, ought woman's work in the Church to be
organized? What was the deaconess of St. Paul's epistles? What light on
this subject do the primitive and the mediæval Churches yield us? Can
"sisterhoods" be established without weakening the sense of personal
responsibility in those Christian women who are not thus wholly set
apart to charitable and spiritual work? Can they be multiplied without
danger of introducing into Protestant communions the evils of the
conventual life? Are there modern instances of safe and successful
organizations? What good have they achieved, and what further good do
they promise? In what relation should such organizations stand to the
authority and fostering care of the Church? What should be their scope,
spirit, methods? What regulations are fundamental and indispensable?
What perils are real and possibly imminent?

To answer these, and other questions associated with them, this book is
written. Its authoress is a gifted daughter of the Church, well known in
literary and educational circles. During a protracted sojourn in Europe
she enjoyed unusual facilities for studying the deaconess work as
carried on in many places, and particularly in the institutions founded
by Pastor Fliedner at Kaiserswerth in Prussia, and in those at Mildmay
in England. She has also made a thorough and discriminating study of the
subject as developed in the early centuries of the Church and in the
Middle Ages.

The book itself will amply reveal these facts, and cannot but contribute
largely to the guidance of the newly revived interest of the American
churches in the far-reaching question how Christian women may best serve
their Lord in serving the humanity which he has redeemed.

It appears at an opportune time. The General Conference of the Methodist
Episcopal Church, at its session in May, 1888, inserted in the law of
the Church a chapter on deaconesses, defining their duties and
providing for the appointment and oversight of them through the Annual
Conferences. This action was the natural outcome of a wide and
increasing appreciation of the service of Christian women in many
departments of Church work; and it was greatly furthered by the advocacy
of Dr. J. M. Thoburn, now the devoted and honored missionary bishop of
India and Malaysia. But it had not been the subject of any considerable
previous discussion in the periodicals of the Church, and there was not
in the Church a widely diffused or an accurate knowledge of the history,
scope, possibilities, or perils of such an organization. The promptness,
however, with which the provision thus made by the General Conference
has been seized upon by the Church in several of our large cities,
indicates that the time was ripe for the movement. But information is
still scanty; ideas concerning the aim and place of the deaconess work
are crude; methods have been very little digested; the foundations of
local homes evidently may come to be very imperfectly laid; and the
movement may easily come to naught.

This book, it is hoped, will do a twofold work. It will awaken a lively
interest in a movement already arrived at large proportions in some
parts of European Protestantism; and it will guide those among us who
are studying how best to organize, against the sin and suffering of the
world, the practically unlimited resources of Christian women. Whenever
any one shall in some good degree apprehend what helpfulness for the
lost as yet lies undeveloped in the hearts and hands of the daughters of
the Church, and what honor may yet come to Christianity by the rightly
directed use of this power, he will welcome a volume which, like the
present one, offers such guidance as history, observation, and earnest
reflection yield on the question at issue.

                                                  EDWARD G. ANDREWS.
  NEW YORK, _May 10, 1889_.




DEACONESSES IN EUROPE.




CHAPTER I.

THE DIACONATE.


In the ruins of the old cities of Greece and Rome we find buildings that
were used for public purposes of all kinds--forums, theaters,
amphitheaters, circuses, and temples of worship. Every provision was
made for the entertainment of the people, and for their political and
intellectual needs. But nowhere do we find the ruins of structures,
belonging either to the public or to private individuals, indicating
that any attempt was ever made to care for the feeble-minded, the
insane, the deaf, the blind, the sick, or the aged; those that in every
nation of modern times are the wards of the State and the definite
objects of religious ministrations.

The ruins cannot be found because such buildings never existed. No
provision was made for those suffering from bodily infirmities, because
so far as the State could control circumstances they were not allowed
to exist. Children who were defective in any way were put to death. In
Sparta this measure was carried out under government supervision. Even
Plato in his model republic has all children of wicked men, the
misshapen, or the illegitimate put out of existence, that they may not
be a burden to the State.[1]

With the coming of Christ new elements were introduced into the
civilization of the world; elements of kindliness, of compassion, of
sympathy of man toward his fellow-man, that up to this time had not been
known. There was a new revelation of the brotherhood of all men in the
fatherhood of God: "We are all one in Christ Jesus."

This spirit of compassion and of sympathy has grown with every century
in the Christian era, and at no time has it been stronger in the history
of the world than it is to-day. Well has one American historian said:

"To a generation which knows but two crimes worthy of death, that
against the life of the individual and that against the life of the
State; which has expended fabulous sums in the erection of
reformatories, asylums, and penitentiaries, houses of correction,
houses of refuge, and houses of detention all over the land; which has
furnished every State prison with a library, with a hospital, with
workshops, and with schools, the brutal scenes on which our ancestors
looked with indifference seem scarcely a reality. Yet it is well to
recall them, for we cannot but turn from the contemplation of so much
misery and so much suffering with a deep sense of thankfulness that our
lot has fallen in a pitiful age, when more compassion is felt for a
galled horse or a dog run over at a street-crossing than our
great-grandfathers felt for a woman beaten for cursing, or a man
imprisoned for debt."[2]

The spirit of Christ has penetrated even where his rule is not
acknowledged, and the humanitarianism of the present day is simply the
leaven of Christian love working among the masses of men.

In the Christian world the effort to realize the brotherhood of all men
in Christ is producing large results. Treasures of money, and infinitely
more precious treasures of men, are every year devoted to this one
object. The cause of Protestant foreign missions is not yet a century
old, but the latest available statistics tell us that the following
sums are being contributed annually for this great work:[3]

    32 American societies contribute   $3,011,027
    28 British      "        "          5,217,385
    27 Continental  "        "          1,083,170
    --                                 ----------
    87 societies contribute            $9,311,582

With this large sum American societies are employing 986 men, and 1,081
women; British societies, 1,811 men, and 745 women; Continental
societies, 777 men, and 447 women. Total, 3,574 men, 2,273 women.

Visible results of faithfulness in work:

    Members in American societies        242,733
       "       British     "             340,242
       "       Continental "             117,532
                                         -------
    Total membership in foreign lands    700,507
    Children in the Sunday-schools       626,741

The subject of home missions is to-day attracting greater attention than
ever before. "Die Innere Mission" of Germany, the various forms the work
assumes in England, the many societies in the United States occupied by
the questions of city evangelization, work among the Mormons, the
treatment of the Indians, care for the colored race, and other phases
of home work show that Christians are fully understanding that it is
wise to build over against our own house.

Certainly the reproach cannot justly be made that the Church of Christ
is neglectful of the precept, "As we have therefore opportunity, let us
do good unto all men."

This is genuine service of man to man, and the motive of the service is
love to God. Every revelation of God is of ministering love and
compassion, and the efforts of his disciples to imitate the divine love
have indelibly stamped upon modern civilization the Christian impress.

The service of ministering compassion is so clearly one of the duties of
Christ's Church that of necessity there must be ordinances touching the
exercise of this duty. So in Acts vi, 3, we read of the appointment of
the deacons, "men of honest report, full of the Holy Ghost and of
wisdom," to see that the service of the tables was not neglected.

But Christian women have ever had special gifts in caring for the poor
and sick and helpless, and the women of apostolic times must necessarily
have had their part in these services of love. In addition to the
diaconate appointed by the apostles recorded in the sixth chapter of
Acts, we must look for a female diaconate as an office in the Church.
This we do not fail to find. In Rom. xvi, 1, we read: "I commend unto
you Phebe, a deacon of the church which is at Cenchrea." Such at least
would have been the form of the verse if our translators had rendered
the Greek word here translated servant as they rendered the like word in
the sixth chapter of Acts, the third of the First Epistle to Timothy,
and in other passages of the apostolic writings.

"That ye receive her in the Lord as becometh saints, and that ye assist
her in whatsoever business she hath need of you: for she hath been a
succorer of many, and of myself also." These words of St. Paul are
especially valuable as an apostolic witness for the existence of the
office of deaconess at the time when he wrote. They are even more than
that. They are an apostolic commendation of the office addressed to the
Christian Church of all times to accept the deaconess in the Lord, and
to assist her "in whatsoever business she hath need of you."

Whether Priscilla, spoken of with Aquila as "my helpers in Christ
Jesus," or Tryphena, Tryphosa, and the beloved Persis, who "labored
much," or Julia and Olympas, all mentioned in the same chapter, were or
were not deaconesses we have no means of knowing.

Outside of this chapter we do not find other references to the order in
the New Testament, unless it be in 1 Tim. iii, 11. In the midst of a
lengthy description of the qualifications of deacons is interjected the
exhortation: "Even so must their wives be grave, not slanderers, sober,
faithful in all things." Now the word _wives_ has no authority from the
Greek word, which is simply _women_. Bishop Lightfoot remarks, in his
book on the authorized version of the New Testament, "If the theory of
the definite article (in the Greek) had been understood our translators
would have seen that the reference is to deaconesses, not to wives of
the deacons."

Many eminent scholars are of the same opinion, among whom are
Chrysostom, Grotius, Bishop Wordsworth, and Dean Alvord. Dean Howson
adds: "It should be particularly noticed in connection with this that in
the early part of the chapter no such directions are given concerning
the wives of the bishops, though they are certainly as important as the
wives of the deacons; so that it can scarcely be thought otherwise than
that the apostle's directions were for the deaconesses, an order which
we find in ecclesiastical records for some centuries side by side with
that of deacons."[4]

Those mentioned in Tit. ii, 3, and in 1 Tim. v, 9, cannot be considered
as holding the office of a deaconess. They belong distinctively to the
class of widows, who held a position of honor in the Church. St. Paul
had clear conceptions of the administrative needs of the Church, and it
is not probable that he would set apart to the service of deaconesses,
which had many difficult duties, those who were already sixty years old.

The many names of faithful women mentioned in his letters as helpers in
the Church are important witnesses for the great apostle's appreciation
of woman's co-operation in the work of the Church, although his judgment
was necessarily limited in some directions by the influence of the times
in which he lived.

Let us examine the requirements for the diaconate of the early Church.
The word diaconate means service; helpful service. We use the word to
designate service for the Church of Christ; service that more
particularly concerns itself with administering the charities of the
Church and performing its duties of compassion and mercy. The men who
were selected for this office were to be men of "honest report." They
must have led a blameless life. Those who had repented of wrong-doing
and reformed their lives were excluded from the office, because they
had lost a good report "of them which are without." Pre-eminently they
must be men of spiritual experience, proven Christians, "full of the
Holy Ghost and of wisdom." They were also to have practical gifts that
would make them efficient and capable in the duties of every-day life.
1 Tim. iii, 8.

These are some of the qualifications spoken of as belonging to the
diaconate, and are the same in application to either sex. The woman
deacon must, however, besides possessing the above qualities, be
unmarried or a widow. The married woman has her calling at home, and
cannot combine with that an official calling in the Church, although she
may be a valuable lay helper.

The field of labor of the women deacons of apostolic times and of the
present is essentially the same. The conditions of society and of the
Church, however, are totally dissimilar. We must, therefore, look to see
new adaptations of the same useful qualities. In other words, we shall
not expect to take the female diaconate of the days of the apostles and
transport it unchanged, into nineteenth century environments. We shall
rather expect to see the invariably useful qualities of the diaconate of
women adapted to the needs of the sinful, sorrowing, ignorant, and
helpless of the age in which we live.


   [1] _Heidenthum und Judenthum_, von Döllinger, p. 692. Regensburg,
      1857.
   [2] MacMaster's _History of the United States_, vol. i, p. 102.
   [3] Statistics from _North American Review_, February, 1889, "Why am
       I a Missionary?"
   [4] _Deaconesses_, Rev. J. D. Howson, D.D., p. 236.




CHAPTER II.

DEACONESSES IN THE EARLY CHURCH.


To understand the position of the deaconess with respect to the modern
Church we must know something of the relation in which she stood to the
early Church. Concisely as may be we must recall the story of the
intervening centuries to the present, that we may learn the true
position of deaconesses in modern times.

We have very little knowledge of the early Church. During the first
century and the first half of the second century continued persecution
compelled the religious communities of the new faith to live in almost
complete seclusion. For the same reason little has been left on record
of those years, and it is impossible to form clear conceptions of Church
history during the period. The first trace which we find of the
existence of deaconesses after the times of the apostles comes to us
from an entirely outside source--from the official records of the Roman
government. Shortly after the close of the first century the Emperor
Trajan sent the younger Pliny as prefect to Bithynia in Asia Minor. At
the imperial command he began a persecution of the Christians, but
interrupted it for a time to obtain further instructions from the
emperor. His letter and the reply still exist. In the course of what he
wrote Pliny says that he had sought to learn from two maids, who were
called "ministræ" ("ex duabus ancillis, quæ ministræ dicebantur," Book
x, chap. xcvii), or helpers, the truth of what the Christians had said,
and had even deemed it necessary to put them to torture, but could
obtain evidence of nothing save unbounded superstition. Here is
independent testimony of singular interest that deaconesses, followers
of Phebe, were found in Christian communities of Asia Minor at the
beginning of the second century, and that they kept the faith, when put
to cruel martyrdom.

The clearest conceptions of the characteristics and duties of
deaconesses of the early Church we obtain from the _Apostolic
Constitutions_, a collection of ecclesiastical instructions that
gradually grew up in the Eastern Church, and were gathered into one work
in the fourth century. These instructions were of unequal antiquity,
ranging from the earliest usages to the rules and practices last
determined upon. Whether the _Apostolic Constitutions_ have all the
authority that some claim for them is a question not here to be
decided. If not genuine, they must have been written at a very early
time, and from that fact possess a historical value of their own. "They
prove beyond a doubt that there was a time in the history of the Church
when a clear idea was held by some writer of the office of the female
deacon as essential to the discipline of the Church."[5] From them we
learn of three distinct types of women connected with the administration
of the Church--deaconesses, widows, and virgins. Deaconesses and widows
date from apostolic times, the Church virgins from a somewhat later
period. The distinction between widows and deaconesses was not at first
clearly maintained. By some Church fathers widows were called
deaconesses, and deaconesses widows. It was only after the lapse of time
that we find the classes clearly distinguished, and when that time is
reached the deaconesses have become exalted in office, being regarded as
belonging to the clergy,[6] while the widows have lost somewhat the
honorable position first accorded to them. The deaconesses are active
ministering agents, caring for the necessities of others; the widows
have passed the period of active service, and having won the respect
and protection of the Church are supported in old age from a fund set
apart for that purpose. In the _Apostolic Constitutions_ the order of
deaconesses stands forth independently, its many official activities are
mentioned, and the importance of its service emphasized.

By combining the different references we obtain a tolerably clear
picture of the deaconess and her duties. She must be a "pure virgin," or
"a widow once married, faithful, and worthy" (Book vi, chap. xvii). Her
special duties were as follows:

(a.) She was a door-keeper at the women's entrance to the church. This
was an ancient service, dating back to the oldest times.[7] Ignatius
died a martyr's death not long after the beginning of the second
century, and in a letter which bears his name is written, "I greet the
doorkeepers of the holy doors, the deaconesses who are in the Lord."

This guardianship was maintained not only in times of persecution, but
as a matter of order and discipline in times of peace.

(b.) She showed women their places in the congregation, being especially
bound to look after the poor and strangers, giving each due attention.

(c.) She instructed the female catechumens. She also visited the
women's apartments, where male deacons could not enter, carried messages
to the bishops, and acted as a missionary. Teaching was an important
part of the duties of the early deaconesses.

(d.) The deaconess had certain duties in connection with the baptism of
women that were considered important and indispensable.

(e.) In times of persecution she visited those who were oppressed or in
prison, and ministered to their bodily and spiritual needs. She seems to
have been less endangered in performing these acts than were men. Lucian
alludes to the service of these devoted women in prisons. She also cared
for the sick and sorrowing, being especially "zealous to serve other
women."

(f.) On occasion she was a mediator when there was strife in families,
or among friends. Both to deacons and deaconesses "pertain messages,
journeys to foreign parts, ministrations, services." The
ever-to-be-remembered journey of Phebe to Rome, when a whole system of
theology was committed to her keeping, was quite within the sphere of
her duties. It has also been said that to them was given the
safe-keeping of the holy books in periods of persecution. The
enumeration of these principal duties implying so many lesser details
helps us to understand that "deaconesses are needed for many purposes"
(Book ii, chapter xv). The deaconess was ordained to her work, as is
attested by a great number of authorities.[8] "It was because men felt
still that the Holy Ghost alone could give power to do any work to God's
glory that they deemed themselves constrained to ask such power of him,
in setting a woman to do Church service."[9]

The following beautiful prayer of ordination, attributed to the apostle
Bartholomew, bears within it certain proofs of the very early existence
of the ceremony, as well as of the order of deaconesses:

"Eternal God, Father of our Lord Jesus Christ, Creator of man and women,
who didst fill Miriam and Deborah and Hannah and Huldah with thy Spirit,
and didst not disdain to suffer thine only-begotten Son to be born of a
woman; who also in the tabernacle and temple didst appoint woman-keepers
of thine holy gates, look down now upon this thine handmaid, who is
designated to the office of deaconess, and cleanse her from all
filthiness of the flesh and of the spirit, that she may worthily execute
the work intrusted to her to thine honor, and to the praise of thine
Anointed, to whom, with thee and the Holy Ghost, be honor and adoration
forever. Amen."

The allusion to the creation of man and woman, to the women in the Old
Testament who were called to special service, as well as to Mary, the
mother of the Lord, while no reference is made to the women of the
apostolic Church who were so highly commended, and held in veneration as
worthy of all imitation, go to prove that the origin of this prayer was
so near the time of the apostles as to be almost contemporary with them.

The office of the deaconess, as described by the _Apostolic
Constitutions_, fitted into the needs of the Eastern Church and the
requirements of Greek life. It was in the East that the diaconate of
women originated, and here that it attained its greatest growth. In the
West custom did not demand the careful separation of the sexes as in the
East, and church relations were less bound by social usages;
consequently we meet with fewer references to deaconesses in the works
of the Latin fathers, and the diaconate of women is not so deeply rooted
in the affections of the church communities as we have found it in the
Greek Church.[10]

The fourth century was the blossoming period of woman's diaconate, when
it attained its highest importance. All the leading Greek fathers and
Church authorities of the age make mention of it. The office is spoken
of as worthy of all honor, filled by women of rank from noble families,
and those of wealth and ability. It found its special advocate and
protector in Chrysostom, "John of the Golden Mouth," who was Bishop of
Constantinople from 397 until 407 A.D. He seems to have had the
ability, rare for that age, of understanding the value of the services
of Christian women, and through his wise guidance and encouragement had
over them almost unbounded influence. Forty-six deaconesses were under
his direction--forty attached to the mother church at Constantinople,
and six belonging to a small church in the suburbs. A number of these
were closely identified with his history, either as relatives or
friends, and through his writings their memory is preserved. Of these
are Nicarete, of a noble family of Nicomedia. We are told she was of a
modest, retiring nature, and would not take places of responsibility
when urged to do so by Chrysostom. We note a strong tendency toward the
later celibate life of the nuns when we read that she was extolled for
"her perpetual virginity and holy life." Sabiniana was the aunt of
Chrysostom. To Amprucla the bishop wrote two letters still extant.[11]
They are filled with words of consolation for the religious persecution
she has undergone. In one of them he says: "Greatly did we sympathize
with your manliness, your steadfast and adamantine understanding, your
freedom of speech and boldness." "Manliness of soul" seems to have held
a high place in the bishop's favorite qualities. In another place,
writing to the same deaconess, he praises "your steadfast soul, true to
God; yea, rather, your noble and most manly soul."

Pentadia and Procla were closely associated with Olympias. In a letter
to Pentadia, Chrysostom writes: "For I know your great and lofty soul,
which can sail as with a fair wind through many tempests, and in the
midst of the waves enjoy a white calm."[12] Reading such words of
appreciation, words that in other places approach dangerously near to
adulation, we better understand the influence Chrysostom exercised over
the women of his time, and their steadfast devotion to him. They had the
conviction that all their efforts met with his sincere and profound
appreciation and quick responsive acknowledgment.

Pre-eminent among the friends of the great bishop was Olympias, of whom
Dean Howson said, "She is the queenly figure among the deaconesses of
the primitive Church." To understand her life we must recall the scenes
by which she was surrounded and the age in which she lived.[13]

In the great capital of the Eastern Empire, where the luxuriance and
magnificence of the Orient combined with the keen, quick intellectual
life of the Greeks; in the circle of the imperial court, with its
intrigues, its fashions, its favoritisms; at a time when outwardly much
respect was paid to the forms of religious life, but when the great and
vital dogmas of the Church were made the sport of witty sophistical
disputations; when those who endeavored to lead an earnest Christian
life met with nearly as much to oppose them as in periods of active
persecution; such were her environments. They were little favorable to
the strength of mind, the fixedness of purpose, the self-denial and
Christian devotion that marked this noble deaconess. Born in 368 A.D. of
a heathen family of rank, owing to her parents' early death she was
educated a Christian. In her seventeenth year she married Nebridius, the
prefect of the city, but after a married life of twenty months he died,
leaving her at eighteen years a widow, rich, beautiful, and free to
decide her future. The Emperor Theodosius desired her to marry one of
his kinsmen, but she refused, saying, "Had God designed me to lead a
married life he would not have taken my husband; I will remain a widow,"
and shortly after she was consecrated a deaconess by Bishop Nectarius.
The emperor, angered at her refusal, took from her the use of her large
fortune, and put it under the care of guardians until she should be
thirty years old, whereupon she only thanked him for relieving her of
the heavy responsibility of administering her estate, and begged him to
add to his kindness by dividing it between the poor and the Church.

Shamed out of his anger, the emperor soon restored her rights, and when
Chrysostom came to Constantinople her lavish and often unwise generosity
was felt in every direction, being compared to "a stream which flows to
the end of the world." He reproved her unbounded liberality, and advised
her to administer alms as a wise steward who must render an account.
This counsel guided her into safer paths. Finally, when Chrysostom was
driven forth to banishment, by his advice she remained in the city, and
became a support for his followers and those who had been dependent upon
him. She met contemptuous treatment and judicial persecutions, but
continued her works of charity, and outlived the man whose mind and
heart had so influenced hers by eleven years. Chrysostom wrote her many
letters, of which seventeen are extant.[14] They plainly show the
estimate he set upon the diaconate of women, and his endeavor to wisely
cherish it. Unfortunately, they also show exaggeration of compliment and
praise which detract from his words of sincere and honest admiration.
Too often, also, he gives undue value to works of mercy, and exalts acts
of ascetic self-denial.

The question of the age at which deaconesses could be received is a
vexed one. The confusion of apprehension touching deaconesses and widows
led to differing enactments at different times and places. The
restriction of age, however, must now have lost its force, as we find
Olympias a deaconess when not yet twenty years of age, and Makrina, the
sister of Gregory of Nyssa, was ordained when a young girl. Deaconesses
retained control of their property. In truth, a law of the State forbade
them to enrich churches and institutions at the expense of those having
just claims on them. Deaconesses also existed in the Church of Asia
Minor. Ignatius mentions them as at Antioch in Syria. They were in Italy
and Rome. The Church of St. Pudentiana, in the Eternal City, keeps
alive the memory of two deaconesses whose house is said to have stood on
this site; Praxedes and Pudentiana, the daughters of a Roman senator,
who devoted themselves, with all they had, to the service of the Church.
Deaconesses also penetrated to Ireland, Gaul, and Spain, lingering in
the last named country many years after they had passed out of knowledge
elsewhere.

We find very little about this order of Christian workers in the Western
Church. There is a passage of Origen in a Latin translation which speaks
of the ministry of women as both existing and necessary, but in the
great Latin fathers, the contemporaries of Chrysostom, scarcely a
mention occurs. From the last half of the fifth century the diaconate of
women declined in importance.[15] It was deprived of its clerical
character by the decrees passed by the Gallic councils of the fifth and
sixth centuries. It was finally entirely abolished as a church order by
the Synod of Orleans, 593 A.D., which forbade any woman henceforth to
receive the _benedictio diaconalis_, which had been substituted for
_ordinatio diaconalis_ by a previous council (Synod of Orange, 441). The
withdrawing of church sanctions made the deaconess cause a private one.
But as such it existed for hundreds of years, often under the patronage
and protection of those high in authority. About the year 600 A.D. the
patriarch of Constantinople, godfather of the Emperor Mauritius, built
for his sister, who was a deaconess, a church which for centuries was
called the "Church of the Deaconesses." It is still standing and, only
slightly changed, is now used for a Turkish mosque.[16]

In the twelfth century there were still deaconesses at Constantinople.
Balsamon, a distinguished professor of Church law, writing at the time,
says that deaconesses were still elected in that city and took charge of
conferences among women members, but in other places the order had
passed completely away.

There was no historian of the diaconate of the early Church. We learn of
it only from isolated and occasional references in works devoted to
other subjects. Yet these references are sufficient to enable us to
affirm that deaconesses were a factor in the life of the Church for from
nine to twelve centuries, or two thirds of the Christian era.

The same influences led to its decay that affected the entire life of
the Church during these centuries. The superior sanctity attached to
the unmarried state, that brought about the celibacy of the priests,
gradually changed the active beneficent existence of the old-time
deaconesses into the cloistral life of nuns. Statutes were passed
forbidding her to marry. Gradually grew up the dangerous superstition of
the marriage of the individual soul with Christ, that made of the nun
the Bride of Christ in an especial sense. It was this false conception
that led the vow of the nun to be regarded as the vow of marriage, and
to be guarded from infringement in the same way as the human marriage
tie, and like it to be lasting for life. The glorious doctrine of
justification by faith was replaced by ascetic mortifications of the
flesh based upon the belief in meritorious works. The cell of the monk
and the nun were esteemed more sacred than the family circle, and in the
darkness of mediæval times that settled down upon the life of the Church
we lose sight of the busy, active ministrations of women deacons, who
had once been esteemed so needful to her usefulness.

There are other minor causes that aided in the downfall of the order;
the abuses that arose in some cases; the changes in the ceremony of
baptism by which the aid of women was not so indispensable, and
especially the fact that since the time of Constantine the care of the
sick and poor was placed under the charge of the State.[17]

These causes combined removed from the life of the Church a powerful
agency for good, and for centuries deprived it of the pre-eminent gifts
of ministration which belong to Christian women.


   [5] _Woman's Work in the Church_, J. M. Ludlow, p. 21.
   [6] _Die Weibliche Diakonie in ihrem ganzen Umfang_, Theodor Schäfer,
       3 vols. Stuttgart: D. Gundert, 1887. Vol. i, p. 45.
   [7] _Der Diakonissenberuf nach seiner Vergangenheit und Gegenwart_,
       Emil Wacker. Gütersloh: E. Bertelman, 1888. p. 33.
   [8] Neander, _Hist. of Chr. Religion and Church_, vol. i, p. 188;
       Schaff, _Hist. of Chr. Church_, vol. iii, p. 260; McClintock &
       Strong's _Encyclopædia_, art. "Deaconesses."
   [9] J. M. Ludlow, _Woman's Work in the Church_, p. 17.
  [10] Neander, _Hist. of Chr. Rel. and Church_, vol. i, p. 188; Schaff,
       _Hist. of Chr. Church_, vol. iii, p. 260.
  [11] _Sancti Johannis Chrysostomi opera om_, t. ii, pp. 659, 662.
       Paris, 1842.
  [12] Chrys., _Op._, vol. ii, p. 658.
  [13] _Die Weibliche Diakonie_, Theodor Schäfer, vol. i, p. 8.
  [14] Chrys., _Op._, vol. ii, p. 600.
  [15] Schaff's _History of Chr. Church_, vol. iii, p. 260.
  [16] _Denkschrift zur Jubelfeier_, J. Disselhoff, Kaiserswerth, 1880,
       p. 5.
  [17] Herzog's _Protestantische Real Enc._, vol. iii, p. 589.




CHAPTER III.

DEACONESSES FROM THE TWELFTH TO THE NINETEENTH
CENTURIES.


During these seven centuries whenever there arose a reviving spirit of
true love to God, whether within the Church of Rome or in any of the
churches formed from reforming elements that separated from it, then we
find traces of the diaconate of woman assuming some form of devotion to
Christ and work for him. One of these movements well worth our study
originated in Belgium while the last of the Greek deaconesses were still
daily walking the arched pathway that led to their church in
Constantinople. Toward the close of the twelfth century great corruption
of morals and open abuses prevailed in society, and also in the Church.
One of those who protested against the evils of the times was the priest
Lambert le Bègue, as he was called, meaning the stutterer. He lived at
Liège, in Belgium, and just without the city walls owned a large garden.
He determined to make use of this to found a retreat for godly women,
where they could lead in common a life of well-doing. Here he built a
number of little houses, and in the center a church, which was dedicated
to St. Christopher in 1184. Then he presented the whole to some godly
women to be used and owned in common. His earnest words of rebuke
brought persecution upon him from those whose consciences he disturbed,
but he went to Rome and appealed to the pope, who not only protected him
from his assailants, but made him the patriarch of the order he had
founded. Only six months after his return, however, he died, and was
buried before the high altar of the church he had erected in 1187.
Whether he was indeed the founder of the Béguine houses has been called
in question. Be that as it may, fifty years after his death fifteen
hundred Béguines were living around St. Christopher's Church,[18] and
Béguine courts were found throughout Belgium, in the Netherlands, south
along the Rhine, in eastern France, and in Switzerland. The Crusades
made many widows, and both widows and young girls sought shelter in the
community life of the Béguines. As a rule they lived alone, in separate
small houses built closely together and surrounded by a wall. Each house
bore on its door the sign of the cross, and with every Béguine court
there were invariably two large buildings--a church and a hospital; the
one for the worship of the sisters, the other the field of their
self-denying ministrations. At first they were in no wise distinguished
in their dress from other women, but in time they wore a habit which
varied in color with each establishment, but was generally blue, gray,
or brown. The veil was invariably white. The sisters had to earn, or
partly earn, their own livelihood. In the time remaining they rendered
essential service in performing acts of charity. They received orphans
to bring up and educate, taught little children, nursed the sick,
performed the last offices for the dead, and bound themselves by good
deeds closely with the lives of the people. They were in no sense
isolated from the world, but lived busy, useful lives in the midst of
the world. They could leave the community at any time, and after
severing their connection with it were free to marry. They also retained
control of their own property.

There were certainly many points of resemblance between these women who
were so active in the sphere of Christian charity in the twelfth and
thirteenth centuries and the deaconesses of Europe to-day. The most
prosperous period for the Béguines was the first half of the thirteenth
century, when they were numbered by thousands.[19] Gradually persecution
was directed against them. The nuns looked upon them with disfavor, and
the pope withdrew his protection. In the Netherlands many became
Protestants at the time of the Reformation, but the Béguines of to-day,
changed in many respects from the original type, and now, closely
resembling the other sisterhoods of Catholicism, are frequently to be
seen in the cities of Belgium and north-eastern France.

A new current of spiritual life swept over the church in the fourteenth
century, and again we find women living together in community life, and
devoting themselves to common service in good deeds, and known as the
Sisters of the Common Life. There was also a Brotherhood of the Common
Life, as there were Beghards, communities of Christian men corresponding
to the Béguines. The Brotherhood and the Sisterhood of the Common Life
honored as their founder Gerhard Groot, of Deventer, who was born in
1340. Of a singularly attractive personality, a creative mind, and an
ardent, enthusiastic nature, he was born to influence and command. He
was already known as a priest of eloquence and wide learning when, in
1374, he met with a deep spiritual change, and from that year dated his
conversion. Henceforth, with every power of a rarely gifted nature, he
sought to lead those who heard him to lives of purity and holiness.
Gradually there grew up about him a circle of like-minded friends,
occupied in writing books to spread his ideas, and aiding him as they
could. His friend Florentius proposed that they live together and form a
community. "A community!" answered Groot. "The begging orders will never
permit that." But Florentius, the planner and organizer, persisted,
offering his own house as a home, and held to the advantages of his plan
until Groot yielded, and said, "In the name of the Lord begin your
work."

Such was the origin of the Brotherhood of the Common Life, and from its
circle proceeded that immortal book, the _Imitation of Christ_, by
Thomas à Kempis, keeping alive in the hearts of choice spirits of every
generation the thoughts and sentiments of the men of whom its author was
the interpreter. For a community of women of similar aims and purposes
it needed only that Groot should make a few changes in the house that he
had already set apart from his paternal inheritance as a home for
destitute women, and the first sister house began. Like the Béguines,
the Sisters of the Common Life took no obligations binding them to
life-long service, but they differed from them in living more closely
together in one family, and had a common purse. They wore a gray
costume, and also worked for their own support. The special virtues they
inculcated were obedience to those above them in authority, humility
that would not shun the meanest task, and friendliness to all. Their
charitable duties were much the same as the Béguines; they cared for
children, nursed the sick, and often acted as midwives. In the first
half of the sixteenth century there were at least eighty-seven
sister-houses, mostly in the Netherlands.[20]

It will be noticed that these freer communities of religious women, that
bear so much closer resemblance to the deaconesses of the early Church
than to the sisterhoods of nuns contemporary with them, mostly existed
in the great free cities of Germany and the Netherlands, which were the
cradles of political and religious liberty, the centers of commerce and
of civilization at that time.

Among the Waldenses, the Poor Men of Lyons, who were already prominent
in the last half of the twelfth century, we find there were
deaconesses. We learn of them again, too, among the Bohemian brethren,
the followers of Huss. With deep Christian faith they endeavored to form
a Church after the apostolic model, and in 1457 appointed Church
deaconesses. "They were to form a female council of elder women, who
were to counsel and care for the married women, widows, and young girls,
to make peace between quarrelers, to prevent slandering, and to preserve
purity and good morals,"[21] aims which keep close to the apostolic
definition of this office.

Luther, the great master-mind of the Reformation, was too clear-sighted
to fail to appreciate the importance of women for the service of the
Church. Speaking of the quality which is an inherent part of the
diaconate of women, he says: "Women who are truly pious are wont to have
especial grace in comforting others and lessening their sorrows." In his
exposition of 1 Pet. ii, 5, he uttered truly remarkable words, for the
age in which he lived, concerning women as members of the holy
priesthood. He says: "Now, wilt thou say, Is that true that we are all
priests, and should preach? Where will that lead us? Shall there be no
difference in persons? shall women also be priests? Answer. If thou
desirest to behold Christians, so must thou see no differences, and must
not say, That is a man or a woman, that is a servant or a lord, old or
young. They are all one, simply Christian people. Therefore are they all
priests. They may all publish God's word, save that women shall not
speak in the church, but shall let men preach. But where there are no
men, but women only, as in the nuns' cloisters, there might a woman be
chosen who should preach to them. This is the true priesthood, in which
are the three elements of spiritual offerings, prayer, and preaching for
the Church. _Whoever does this is a priest. You are all bound to preach
the Word, to pray for the Church, and to offer yourself to God._"[22]

There is no mention in Luther's writings, however, of the diaconate of
women. It would be more natural that he should have tried to adjust the
lives of the monks and nuns as he knew of them to the new relations
arising from the Reformation rather than to bring to life an office of
which he had no personal knowledge. This was what he did when he wrote
to the burghers of Herford in Westphalia. In their new zeal they wanted
to drive the inmates from the religious houses, although the latter had
been the means of teaching them the reformed doctrines. In his letter
of January 31, 1532, Luther says: "If the brothers and sisters who are
by you truly teach and hold the true word it is my friendly wish that
you will not allow them to be disturbed or experience bitterness in this
matter. Let them retain their religious dress and their accustomed
habits which are not opposed to the Gospel."[23]

Certainly Luther would have seen no harm in allowing deaconesses the
protection of a special garb.

Passing to another great reformer, Calvin, we find not only references
to deaconesses as filling a "most honorable and most holy function in
the Church," but in the Church ordinances of Geneva, which were drawn up
by him, there is mention of the diaconate as one of the four ordinances
indispensable to the organization of the Church.

In the Netherlands several attempts were made to revive the ancient
office. The General Synod of the Reformed Church at Wesel, in 1568,
first considered the question. A later synod, in 1579, expressly
occupied itself with the work and office of the deaconess, but the
measures taken were not adapted to advance the interests of the cause,
and it was formally abandoned by the Synod of Middleburg in 1581. In
the city of Wesel, however, there continued to be deaconesses attached
to the city churches until 1610. In Amsterdam local churches preserved
the office still later than at Wesel. Already in 1566 we read that in
the great reformed Church not only deacons but deaconesses were elected.
The terrible days of the Spanish fury swept away all Church organization
for a time, but when it was restored in 1578 both classes of Christian
officers again resumed their duties. From 1582 lists of deaconesses were
kept, showing at first three; later, in 1704, twenty-eight, and in 1800
only eight. At the present time there are women directors of hospitals
and orphanages in Amsterdam who are called by the title of deaconesses.
The helpless, sick, and neglected children are now gathered in
institutions instead of being cared for individually as was formerly the
custom, and women having positions of control in these institutions are
designated by the name formerly applied to those who had the personal
care of the same needy classes.

It is interesting to note that there was one association of women in the
century of the Reformation that bears close resemblance to the Béguines
and the Sisters of the Common Life. These were the Damsels of Charity,
established by Prince Henry Robert de la Mark, the sovereign prince of
Sédan in the Netherlands. In 1559 he, together with the great majority
of his subjects, embraced the doctrines of the Reformed Church, and
instead of incorporating former church property with his own
possessions, as did so many princes of the Reformation, he devoted it to
founding institutions of learning and of charity. These latter he put
under the care of the "Damsels of Charity," an association of women
which he had instituted. The members could live in their own homes or in
the establishments, but in either case they devoted themselves to the
protection and succor of the poor and sick and the aged. While taking no
vows, they were chosen from those not bound by the marriage vow, and
were subject only to certain rules of living. The Damsels of Charity
have been held by some to be the first Protestant association of
deaconesses, although not called by the name.[24]

There are two evangelical societies, small in numbers, but one at least
powerful in influence, which have retained deaconesses from their origin
to the present time. These are the Mennonites or Anabaptists, and the
Moravians. It was among the Mennonites in Holland that Fliedner saw the
deaconesses, who so interested him in their duties that he obtained the
convictions which in the end led him to devote his life to their
restoration in the economy of the Church. Among the Moravians,
deaconesses were introduced at the instance of Count Zinzendorf in 1745,
but only as a limited form of woman's service, by no means measuring up
to the place accorded them to day in Germany.

We have now reached the nineteenth century, and from the early Church to
the present time we find successive if sporadic attempts to incorporate
into the Church the active diaconate of women. These constantly
recurring efforts imply a consciousness, deep, if unexpressed, of the
need to utilize better the especial gifts of women in Christian service.
We have reached the moment when this consciousness is to take a suitable
and enduring form; when the Church machinery, long defective in this
particular, is to be re-adjusted and made complete.


  [18] _Die Weibliche Diakonie_, vol. i, p. 67.
  [19] _Woman's Work in the Church_, Ludlow, p. 117, note. "Matthew
       Paris mentions it as one of the wonders of the age, for the
       year 1250, that in Germany there rose up an innumerable multitude
       of those continent women who wish to be called Béguines, to that
       extent that Cologne was inhabited by more than a thousand of
       them."
  [20] _Die Weibliche Diakonie_, Schäfer, vol. i, p. 70.
  [21] _Der Diakonissenberuf_ E. Wacker, p. 82.
  [22] _Denkschrift zur Jubelfeier_, J. Disselhoff, p. 5. Gütersloh,
       1888.
  [23] _Die Weibliche Diakonie_, vol. i, p. 73.
  [24] _Histoire de la principauté de Sédan_, Pasteur Pegran, vol. ii,
       chaps. i, ii.




CHAPTER IV.

FLIEDNER, THE RESTORER OF THE OFFICE OF
DEACONESS.


The first years of the present century were sad years for Germany. There
was a life-and-death struggle with an all-powerful conqueror to preserve
existence as a nation. The Germans still call this "the war for
freedom." Immediately thereafter followed a period of religious
awakening, and this proved to be the hour when the diaconate of woman
rose again to life and power. When the fullness of time arrives for a
cause or a movement to take its place among the forces of society, many
hearts become impressed with its importance. So, between the years 1820
and 1835, there were four several attempts to awaken the Christian
Church to an enlightened conscience in this matter, the last of which
obtained a wide and an enduring success. The first was made by Johann
Adolph Franz Klönne, pastor of the church at Bislich, near Wesel.
Stirred to admiration by the activity that the women's societies had
shown in the Napoleonic wars, he lamented the fact that the
associations had dissolved, and complained that they had not taken a
permanent form, in which the members might have performed the duties for
the Church that deaconesses had done in the early years of Christianity.
In 1820 he published a pamphlet entitled _The Revival of the Deaconesses
of the Primitive Church in our Women's Associations_. This he sent to
many persons of influence, trying to win their co-operation for the
cause. He received a great many answers in reply, among them one from
the Crown Princess Marianne. But while in a general way his project met
with approval, no one could suggest a practical method by which his
thought could be realized.

A distinguished woman, Amalie Sieveking, attempted the same task of
utilizing the labor of Christian women as deaconesses in the Church. She
belonged to a well-known patrician family in the old free city of
Hamburg, and was well known for her philanthropic views and her generous
deeds. "When I was eighteen years old," she relates, "I first learned
about the charitable sisterhoods in Catholic lands, and the knowledge
seized upon me with almost irresistible power. Like a lightning's flash
came the thought, What if you were appointed to found a similar
institution for our Protestant Church?"[25] The thought stayed by her,
and disposed her to receive willingly a similar suggestion coming from
the great Prussian minister Von Stein, the Bismarck of Germany during
the first quarter of this century. He had been favorably impressed by
what he had seen of the Sisters of Mercy in the camp and in hospitals.
He consulted with one of his councilors about increasing their number,
so that they could be employed in all the Hospitals, Insane Asylums, and
Penitentiaries which had women inmates. To another minister he
complained with warmth that the Protestant Church had no such
sisterhoods by which the beneficent stream of activities among women
could be directed into well-regulated channels. "The religious life of
Protestantism suffers from the want of them," he said. These words were
repeated to Amalie Sieveking and stirred her to make the endeavor to
fulfill her own long-cherished wishes, which were those of Stein. Just
at this time, in 1831, the cholera broke out in her native city. She
took this as a providential opening, by means of which deaconesses could
begin their work, and went at once to one of the cholera hospitals,
offered her services as a nurse, and at the same time issued an appeal
for sister-women to join her. But no one came. The only outcome of her
effort was a woman's society which she formed to care for the sick and
the poor of her native city, and to work for this she devoted the
remainder of her life. Stein and Amalie Sieveking had in mind an order
of women closely resembling the Sisters of Charity. That their efforts
were not crowned with success seemed to the evangelical Protestant
promoters of the deaconess cause in later times providential.[26]

Shortly after, in 1835, Count von der Recke, already well known as the
founder of two charitable institutions, issued the first number of a
magazine called _Deaconesses; or, The Life and Labors of Women Workers
of the Church in Instruction, Education, and the Care of the Sick_. Only
a single number appeared, but his earnest plea for deaconesses, and the
elaborate plan he devised for an institution and officers, aroused wide
attention, and brought him a letter of warm commendation from the crown
prince, afterward King Frederick William IV. Evidently the idea was
ripening, and a near fruition could be anticipated. But neither to
minister of state, count, nor prince--to no one among the distinguished
of the earth--was the honor given of reviving the female diaconate. It
was to a humble pastor of an obscure village church that this work was
committed.

The little village of Eppstein lies in a beautiful country, full of high
mountains and deep-lying valleys, about a dozen miles from Wiesbaden. At
the village parsonage of the little hamlet was born, January 21, 1800, a
son, the fourth of a family that numbered twelve children. The pastor,
whose father before him had filled a like office, was a favorite among
his people for his pleasant speech, sound advice about every-day
matters, and his faithfulness in instructing the children in the Bible
and the catechism, and caring for the sick and the afflicted.

The little boy proved to be a strong, healthy child, and as he grew
older developed a liking for books. His father taught a class composed
of his children and some boys in the neighborhood, and when Theodor
became old enough to join it he soon outstripped the rest, giving his
father no little pride by his fluent rendering of Homer. Theodor
Fliedner was not quite fourteen years old when the sudden death of the
father changed the whole life of the family, and left the mother with
eleven children to maintain and educate. Now began for Fliedner a
struggle to complete his education. The simple, kindly hospitality that
had been so generously exercised in the village parsonage met its
reward. Friends came forward to offer help, and at the beginning of the
New Year Fliedner and his brother went to the gymnasium at Idstein. Here
he was obliged to live sparingly, and earned his bread by teaching, but
he was happy and contented, and found in study his great delight. He was
fond of reading books of travel and the lives of great men, which
stirred him to emulation. In 1817 he went to the University of Giessen.
Here he kept aloof from the political agitations among the students.
Neither was he affected by the rationalistic teachings of the
professors. His shy, retired nature aided him in this course, and his
leisure hours were passed in reading the writings of the Reformers. The
jubilee festival of the Reformation occurred in 1817, and the lives of
the heroes of the faith were brought freshly home to him. Their strength
of faith shamed him, but he had not yet learned the secret of their
power. He was yet without a deep, spiritual life. From Giessen he went
to Göttingen, where he devoted himself to a year's study of history,
philosophy, and theology. During the holidays, as is the custom with
German students, he made repeated pedestrian tours. In this way he
visited the great free cities of the north, Bremen, Hamburg, and
Lubeck. From Göttingen he and his brother went to the theological
seminary at Herborn, where the following summer he passed with credit
his theological examination. He was now ready to enter God's great
school of practical life to be further fitted for the mission he was to
accomplish. In September he went to Cologne and was employed in the
house of a wealthy merchant as a private tutor. This was a great change
for the quiet youth of country habits. He took great pains to
accommodate himself to his surroundings, and to acquire the truly
Christian art of becoming all things to all men. In after life, when
speaking of this period and its usefulness to him, he wrote: "It is a
great hinderance to a man, even to his progress in the kingdom of God,
not to have been brought up in gentle and refined manners from his
childhood." Although a faithful and devoted teacher his life-work was
not forgotten. He constantly sought to widen his knowledge and
experience, was made assistant secretary of the local Bible society, and
formed friendships which led to his appointment to the pastorate at
Kaiserswerth. This was a Catholic town formerly of some importance. The
ruins of an imperial palatinate are still to be seen there, but in
Fliedner's time it had become a little village of workmen dependent on
a few manufacturers. On January 18, 1822, alone, and on foot, to save
his poor society the expense of his journey, Fliedner entered the town
where his life was henceforth to be centered. He was to share the
parsonage with the widow of a previous pastor, and his sister was to be
his housekeeper. His income was one hundred and thirty-five dollars a
year. Only a month after his arrival the great firm of velvet
manufacturers who provided the work-people with employment failed, and
the little church community seemed about to be dispersed. The government
offered him another and better appointment, but he felt that he must be
a true shepherd, and not a hireling, and would not leave his people. He
decided to make a journey to collect money to form a permanent endowment
for his church. A journey over sixty years ago, to a young German of
quiet habits, was a very different matter from a similar trip taken in
this day of railroads and steamboats. To Fliedner it seemed a very
important matter; and so it was in its results, which reached far beyond
the little congregation he served. With great hesitation he began at
Elberfeld, a town near at hand. A pastor of the city, to encourage him,
accompanied him to friends, and on parting gave him a friendly
suggestion that, in addition to trust in God, such work required
"patience, impudence, and a ready tongue." Before starting on the longer
journey to Holland and England he returned to his congregation and
encouraged them by the sum of nine hundred dollars that he had so far
secured. He was now absent for nine months, and during that time
obtained an amount sufficient to put the little church in a position
where a certain, if modest, annual allowance was assured. The pastor had
also, in serving others, greatly strengthened and broadened his own
faith. As he says, "In both these Protestant countries I became
acquainted with a multitude of charitable institutions for the benefit
both of body and soul. I saw schools and other educational
organizations, alms-houses, orphanages, hospitals, prisons, and
societies for the reformation of prisoners, Bible and missionary
societies, etc., and at the same time I observed that it was a living
faith in Christ which had called almost every one of these institutions
and societies into life, and still preserved them in activity. This
evidence of the practical power, and fertility of such a principle had a
most powerful influence in strengthening my own faith, as yet weak." It
was while in Holland that he wrote to Klönne concerning the deaconesses,
whose duties he had observed among the Mennonites. After his return he
applied himself with zeal and success to his pastoral duties. Work was a
delight to him, and his energy and force of character were constantly
seeking new ways by which to make his church services more attractive,
and to increase his influence over each member of his congregation. "He
never asked himself what he _must_ do, but always what he _might_
do."[27] But, work as industriously as he would, his small society left
him time for other activities. While in London he had been profoundly
impressed by the noble labors of Elizabeth Fry in the prisons of
England. It was this woman's hand that pointed out the way for Fliedner
in Germany. The prisons in his own land had remained untouched by any
spirit of reform. The convicts were crowded together in small, filthy
cells, and often in damp cellars without light or air; boys, who had
thoughtlessly committed some trifling misdemeanor, with gray-headed,
corrupt sinners; young girls with the most vicious old women. There was
no attempt at classification of prisoners. Some of them might be
innocent people waiting for trial. Neither was there oversight, save to
keep the prisoners from escaping. No work was provided, and as for
schools, where the larger number of convicts could neither read nor
write, no one thought of such a thing.[28] That such idleness, the
beginning of all vice, was here especially pernicious and corrupting can
be readily seen. But few knew of this state of things, and those few
left it for the government to provide a remedy.

Fliedner, however, could not rest in this indifference. He says: "The
smallness of my charge left me more leisure than most of my clerical
brethren, and the opportunities I had enjoyed on my travels of at once
collecting information and strengthening my faith imposed a more urgent
obligation on me to try to make up by the help of our God for our long
neglect." He tried to obtain permission to be imprisoned a few weeks in
the prison at Düsseldorf, that he might view prison life from within the
walls, but his request was refused. He then obtained leave to hold
services every other Sunday afternoon in the prison at Düsseldorf. The
efforts that he put forth succeeded in waking the interest of a great
many persons, and at last there was formed by his efforts the first
society in behalf of prisoners in Germany.

It was while engaged in this work that he met his wife, Frederika
Münster, who was occupied in bettering the condition of the prisoners in
the penitentiary at Düsselthal. He married her in 1828, and she became
a helpful, inspiring co-worker with him in all his undertakings.

In 1832 he was commissioned by the government to revisit England, to
furnish a report on the various charitable organizations, especially
those connected with prisons and alms-houses. This brought him into
closer relations with Elizabeth Fry, as well as with many other noble
men and women of all ranks who were caring for the poor and neglected of
England. He extended his journey to Scotland, met Dr. Chalmers, and
found his heart strangely touched by what he saw. His spiritual
experience had deepened with the years, and while here he wrote to some
friends, "The Lord greatly quickens me."

His heart became still more open to works of mercy and love, and he
gathered rich experiences which were afterward utilized in his work.

Fliedner had now attained a certain reputation of his own as a friend to
prisoners and outcasts. It was not surprising, therefore, that a poor
female convict, discharged from the prison at Werden, should have taken
the weary six miles' walk to Kaiserswerth September 17, 1833, to ask the
good pastor for help. There stood in the parsonage garden a little
summer-house twelve feet square, with an attic. This was offered to the
convict Minna as a temporary refuge, and she became the first inmate of
the Kaiserswerth institutions. She had arrived at an opportune moment.
In the previous spring Count Spee, the President of the Prison Society,
had urged the founding of two institutions, one Lutheran and one
Catholic, to receive discharged female convicts. Fliedner, who had seen
such refuges in England, declared himself ready for the plan, and tried
to induce the pastors of the larger and wealthier communities in the
neighborhood to locate the Protestant asylum in some one of these
cities. No one responded to his appeal. His wife, whose courage was
often greater than his own, urged him to make a beginning in the little
village where he lived, unpromising as the conditions seemed, and after
a little hesitation, seeing no one was ready to assume any
responsibility in a matter that he took so deeply to heart, the good
pastor decided to follow her advice. The old parsonage was for rent, and
he secured it on low terms.

Frau Fliedner had a friend of her school-days and early youth, now a
woman of experience and ability. She sent for her to come and visit them
to see if she would become the superintendent of the refuge, but shortly
after her arrival she was taken sick, and her friends sent letters of
expostulation urging her to return. Just now, when affairs were in
rather an untoward state, appeared the first inmate. Let Fliedner tell
the story:

"We at first gave her lodging in my summer-house, and the necessity of
attending to her did more good to the poor, distressed superintendent
than all her quinine and mixtures. Countess Spee, the wife of our
president, had prophesied that our inmates would never remain with us a
month, they would certainly run away. So when the first month was over I
marched over to Heltorf and triumphantly announced, 'Minna is yet
there.' Minna was followed by another, and the garden-house became too
small."

Finally Fliedner obtained possession of the house he had hired, after
some delay on the part of the former tenants, and the asylum was opened.
The number of inmates increased, and Fräulein Göbel soon had more than
she could manage. She must have an assistant. The need of trained
Christian workers, who could care for these poor women, grew daily more
apparent.

Fliedner's thoughts constantly dwelt on the subject; they gave him no
rest. He had discovered with joyful surprise in 1827 the traces of the
apostolic deaconesses among the Mennonites, and two years later he
wrote:

"Does not the experience of this our sister Church, do not the women
societies in our last war, does not the holy activity of an Elizabeth
Fry and her helpers in England, and the women's associations of Russia
and Prussia formed after their model to care for the bodies and souls of
women prisoners--do all these not show what great power God-fearing,
pious women possess for the up-building of Christ's kingdom as soon as
they have opportunity to develop it?"[29]

His practical experience with the work he had in hand brought him to the
same conclusion; namely, that there must be training-schools where
Christian women, especially set apart for such service, could have
instruction and practice in the duties they had undertaken. As a
consequence there were drawn up in May, 1836, and signed by Fliedner and
a few friends, the statutes of the Rhenish-Westphalian Deaconess
Society.

Fliedner had now reached the work that was henceforth to be his life
mission; that is, the restoration of deaconesses to the Christian Church
of the nineteenth century.


  [25] _Denkschrift zur Jubelfeier_, J. Disselhoff, Kaiserswerth,
       1886, p. 8.
  [26] Schäfer, _Die Weibliche Diakonie_, vol. ii, p. 86; _Denkschrift
       zur Jubelfeier_, p. 9.
  [27] T. Fliedner, _Kurzer Abriss seines Lebens_, p. 43.
  [28] T. Fliedner, _Kurzer Abriss seines Lebens_, p. 48.
  [29] _Kurzer Abriss seines Lebens_, p. 60.




CHAPTER V.

THE INSTITUTIONS AT KAISERSWERTH.


Fliedner saw clearly that if the office of deaconess were to be planted
in the Church there must be soil suitable to nourish it: in other words,
there must be an institution founded which could furnish not only
instruction, but practice in their duties, and a home for those who
should offer their services for this office. "But," he says, "could our
little Kaiserswerth be the right place for a Protestant deaconess house
for the training of Protestant deaconesses--a village of scarcely
eighteen hundred people where the large majority of the population were
Roman Catholics, where sick people could not be expected in sufficient
numbers for training purposes, and so poor that it could not help defray
even the yearly expenses of such an institution? And were not older,
more experienced pastors than I better adapted for this difficult
undertaking? I went to my clerical brethren in Düsseldorf, Dinsberg,
Mettmann, Elberfeld, and Barmen, and entreated them to start such an
institution in their large societies, of which, indeed, there was
pressing need. But all refused, and urged me to put my hand to the work.
I had time, with my small congregation, and the quietness of retired
Kaiserswerth was favorable to such a school. The useful experiences I
had gained on my journeys had not been given me for naught, and God
could send money, sick people, and nurses. So we discerned that it was
his will that we should take the burden on our own shoulders, and we
willingly stretched them forth to receive it. Quietly we looked around
for a house for the hospital. Suddenly, the largest and finest house in
Kaiserswerth was offered for sale. My wife begged me to buy it without
delay. It is true it would cost twenty-three hundred thalers, and we had
no money. Yet I bought it with good courage, April 20, 1836. At
Martinmas the money must be paid."

It is not possible to give here in detail the occurrences by which loans
were made, and the money that was needed obtained at the required time.
God gave friends for the cause, and through them provided the means. The
house was furnished with a little second-hand furniture which had been
given him, and October, 1836, was opened as a hospital and training
school for Christian women. Services of praise and thanksgiving
consecrated this deaconess home yet without deaconesses, this hospital
without patients. Both, however, soon became inmates of the building.
The first deaconess was Gertrude Reichardt, the daughter of a physician.
She had assisted her father in the care of the sick, and had become
experienced in looking after the welfare of the poor and the destitute.
She was an invaluable helper in the new enterprise, and shared with the
doctor the duty of giving instruction in nursing and hospital duties.
Fliedner's wife was the superintendent. She had the oversight of the
house, gave the deaconesses practical direction in housekeeping, and in
their early visits to the sick and poor accompanied them from house to
house. Fliedner was the director, and took upon himself the religious
instruction of the sisters. Every effort was taken to make the house a
home in which a cheerful, loving spirit should prevail. Nearly every
evening Fliedner or his wife would go over to the home, and read to the
sisters, or tell them interesting facts outside their lives. When he
went away on his journeys he would write in full every thing pertaining
to the interests of the common cause, and the letters would be read
aloud. This was to be a home in every sense of the word, in which the
members were to feel themselves belonging to one great family, bound
together by the common tie of unselfish devotion to others "for Christ's
sake." The spirit of the founder has permeated the institution even to
the present time. Those who know any thing of Kaiserswerth testify to
the strong affection for the common home, the "mother-house," as they
beautifully term it, felt by all its children. Every pains is taken to
preserve it. There is correspondence, frequent and regular, from here to
every sister. No matter in what distant land she may be, her birthday is
remembered, and she is taught to look to this as a waiting refuge for
the days of trouble, sickness, and old age.

There was soon arranged a series of house regulations and instructions
for work which became the basis for after regulations in nearly all
existing institutions.

Almost contemporary with the mother-house arose the normal school for
infant-school teachers. It had first started as a child's school, and
afterward young women who had taste for the care of children were
received to be taught their duties. Fliedner took great interest in the
instruction of children. He devised little games for them, and arranged
stories to be told. His simplicity and his child-like nature led him to
disregard formalities, and to think solely of the end he had in view.
On one occasion, when picturing the combat of David and Goliath,
reaching that point in the narrative when the young shepherd lad slings
the stone that brings the giant to the ground, he cast himself headlong,
to the great delight and amazement of his little audience, who enjoyed
to the full this object-lesson that made the story so vivid to them.

Then he took special pains that his teachers should learn to tell the
stories of the Bible so as to make them clear and interesting to the
youngest child. Every day a story was told in school, and each evening
the teacher whose turn it was to relate the story the following day came
to Fliedner and rehearsed it to him as though he were a child, afterward
receiving his suggestions as to how the narrative could be improved. The
work went along quietly, ever growing, ever advancing. "Among all
others, and more than all others, was Fliedner's wife his best help. Her
keen glance, made pure and holy by her Christian faith, preserved him
from mistakes. With the household virtues of cleanliness, order,
simplicity, and economy she united large-hearted compassion toward those
needing help of any kind, yet knowing withal how, with virile sense and
energy, to prevent the misuse of ministering love. She became a model
for the deaconesses, as well as a mother to them, and her name deserves
to be mentioned with honor, as one who had an important part in the
Protestant renewal of the diaconate of women."[30]

In 1842 a new building was erected for the normal school for
infant-school teachers. The publishing house of the institution was also
started, which issues religious books and tracts. The first work sent
forth was a volume of sermons, presented to the new enterprise by the
late Professor Lange, which went through several editions.

The same year the _Kaiserswerth Almanac_ appeared and a large picture
Bible for schools was published. In 1848 the magazine _Der Armen und
Kranken Freund_ was sent forth as an organ for the deaconess cause, not
only for Kaiserswerth, but for all the institutions that are represented
at the triennial Conferences. The publishing house is an important
source of income, as the institution has little in the way of endowment
beside the produce of the garden land attached to it. At present about
three fourths of the expense are met by the sale of publications and the
fees of patients; the remaining sum is given by friends.

The financial story of Fliedner's life could form a tale of thrilling
interest, if it were separated from other facts and told by itself. He
constantly went forward, purchased houses, added lands, and erected new
homes when he had no money in reserve, but unfailingly when the time
came for payments to be made the sum was obtained in some way or other
to meet them. "We have no endowment," he once said, "but the Lord is our
endowment."

The same year, 1842, the orphan asylum was opened. For a very moderate
sum this receives children who are both fatherless and motherless, and
who belong to the educated middle class, having fathers who were pastors
or professors, or the like. Fliedner hoped not only to provide a home
for these girls befitting their station in life, but to develop among
them those who should make a vocation of the care of children and the
sick, and in this hope he was not disappointed.

In the midst of these successes the hand of God often lay heavily on
Fliedner's family. Brethren and children passed away, and, sorest
affliction of all to him, his wife, who had so closely and
sympathetically shared all his labors, died April 22, 1842. "She was the
first of the deaconesses to die," writes Fliedner. "As she, their
mother, had always led the way for her spiritual daughters in life, so
she was their leader into the valley of the shadow of death."[31] Not
long after this a normal school for female teachers in the public
schools was started, for this practical believer in woman's work was one
of the first to advocate the introduction of women teachers in the
public schools of Germany, against which there then existed a strong
prejudice. The Board of Education looked favorably on his project, and
afterward sent a government commissioner to attend the examinations and
award the certificates at Kaiserswerth. At a later period provision was
made for teachers of girls' high schools, as also for those who desired
to become teachers but were too young to enter the normal school. Over
two thousand teachers have gone forth from these schools, carrying with
them a love for the institution which has brought back to it many
returns in money and service. Fliedner well called them his "light
skirmishing troops."

In 1849 he resigned his pastorate, and henceforth, with singleness of
purpose, devoted himself to his one calling. From time to time new
buildings were added to meet new needs. In 1852 an insane asylum for
Protestant women was founded, as sisters were often called upon to nurse
patients of this class. The building set apart for the purpose was
formerly used as military barracks and was given to Fliedner by King
Frederick William IV. In 1881 this, as with so many others of the
original buildings at Kaiserswerth, became too small for the increase in
numbers, and a new building took its place. It stands on an eminence
just outside of the village, and is provided with every modern
appliance. Fliedner's practical good sense and administrative ability
led him to care for all the minor details that were needed for the
success of so great an undertaking. He added a dispensary to the
hospital, where a sister who had passed a regular examination before the
government medical board made up the medicines required for the
hospital. Many deaconesses have been trained to the same knowledge,
which has been an especially valuable acquisition in the hospitals
situated in Eastern countries. Little by little he secured land for
farming operations, until there were one hundred and eighty acres in
garden and meadow land, generally lying close about the various
buildings, and affording means of recreation as well to the inmates.
Nearly all of the vegetable and dairy products that are needed are so
provided. A bakery, bath-houses, homes for laborers and officials, were
added, and bakers, shoemakers, carpenters, and blacksmiths formed part
of the staff of the great establishment.

Gradually every variety of institution that could furnish active
practice to the deaconesses took its place here, and the whole might be
denominated a great normal training-school for Christian women. The
refuge for discharged female convicts, which was the starting-point of
the movement, still continued its good work during all these years. The
last report[32] states that nine hundred and nineteen women of different
ages and different degrees of wrong-doing have been its inmates. Parents
send insubordinate girls; societies forward those who profess penitence;
magistrates sentence degraded creatures often too late for any
reasonable hope to reform them. The old experience of the refuge is
repeated in this last report: one third are saved, one third are
irredeemable, and the judgment as to the remaining third, doubtful.
There were two buildings erected during the later years of Fliedner's
life in which he took great interest. One of these was a cottage among
the neighboring hills, where deaconesses who had become exhausted by
long days in the sick-room, or whose health was suffering from
over-toil, could retire for a few weeks of mountain air and quiet rest
during the summer months. This pleasant retreat was well named Salem.
Soon afterward was laid the corner-stone of the second building,
regarded with peculiar favor not only by the good pastor, but by all
friends of the institution. This was the "Feierabend Haus," the House of
Evening Rest, where, somewhat apart from the busy activity of the great
household, those deaconesses whose best strength had been given to
faithful labor in the service could pass the evening hours of life in
quiet waiting for the last great change, while using the experience they
had gathered and the strength still remaining in behalf of the cause
they had faithfully served.

Such are the main features of the great establishment that year by year
grew up in this village on the Rhine. But from this as a center had
gradually branched off manifold lines of service, and many
daughter-houses both in Germany and foreign lands. It was only a year
and a half after the home was opened that the first appointment of
deaconesses to work outside of Kaiserswerth was made.

This was an important victory for the new institution. It took place
January 21, 1838, on Fliedner's birthday, when he and his wife escorted
two of the sisters to Elberfeld, where they were to act as trained
nurses in the city hospital. From that time to the present the hospital
has continued under the management of the Kaiserswerth deaconesses.

Soon afterward sisters were sent out to nurse in private families, and
in 1839 two more were sent to superintend the workhouse in Frankfort. As
the institution became known there was a constant demand for
superintendents, and matrons for public reformatories, prisons, and
charitable establishments. Between 1846 and 1850 more than sixty
deaconesses were at work at twenty-five different stations outside of
the mother-house. About the same time deaconesses began to work in
connection with special churches which called for their services, having
the duties which in England are assigned to those called "parish
deaconesses."

King Frederick William IV., from the beginning Fliedner's faithful
friend and supporter, had long desired a deaconess home in Berlin. This
was finally obtained, and set apart under the name "Bethanien Haus," or
Bethany House, October 10, 1847, at a special dedicatory service, at
which the king, with his court, was present. It was while seeking a
superintendent for this home in Berlin that Fliedner learned to know
Caroline Bertheau, of Hamburg, a descendant of an old Huguenot family
that was driven from France by the revocation of the Edict of Nantes. He
led her home as his wife in May, 1843, and she became to him a true
helpmeet for his children, his home, and his institution. She is still
living, having survived her husband over twenty-five years, and in an
advanced age still retains a place on the Board of Direction at
Kaiserswerth.

In one place after another deaconess homes arose, sometimes simply
through Fliedner's advice, more often by his direct co-operation. From
1849 to 1851 he was chiefly engaged in traveling from one land to
another, occupied in kindling the zeal of Christian women to devotion to
the sick and sorrowing, and finding fields of service for their
priceless ministrations. He visited the United States, England, France,
and Switzerland, as well as various cities of the East, including
Jerusalem and Constantinople.

The work in our own land was begun at Pittsburg, where Fliedner came
with four sisters in the summer of 1849, at the invitation of Pastor
Passavant, of the German Lutheran Church.

The deaconesses at once entered upon hospital work, and their care of
the sick met with warm appreciation, but their numbers did not increase.
An orphanage was afterward started at Rochester, and hospitals under the
same auspices exist at Milwaukee, Jacksonville, Ill., and Chicago. Still
the work has not grown, and it has proved the least successful of any
initiated by Fliedner. Upon his return he aided in opening
mother-houses in Breslau, Königsberg, Dantzic, Stettin, and Carlsruhe.

We have now come to the period when Kaiserswerth institutions met with a
notable extension. Fliedner had long been looking toward Jerusalem,
hoping to found a deaconess home there. "Who would not gladly render
service on the spot where the feet of the Saviour once brought help and
healing to the sick?" he had said.

Now, through Dr. Gobat, the Bishop of Jerusalem, the opportunity was
given. The king offered two small houses in Jerusalem that were his
private property, and volunteered to pay the expenses of the journey.
Associations were formed in all parts of Germany to provide an outfit
for the mission. Gifts flowed in rapidly, and March 17, 1851, Fliedner,
accompanied by four deaconesses, two of them being teachers, set out on
this new and peaceful crusade to the holy city. From that beginning has
resulted a net-work of stations throughout the East.

There is at Jerusalem a hospital[33] where, during 1887, four hundred
and ninety-three patients were given medical aid and nursing, and seven
thousand seven hundred and two patients were treated in the dispensary.
No woman in the city is better known or more justly honored than Sister
Charlotte, the head-deaconess.

The Mohammedans at first regarded the work of the sisters with fanatical
distrust, but a glance at the statistics of the last report will show
how completely they have cast aside their prejudices.

Of the 493 patients in 1887, there were 404 Arabians, 43 Armenians, 30
Germans, 5 Abyssinians, 4 Greeks, 3 Roumanians, 2 Russians, 1 Italian,
and 1 Hollander. As to religion, there were 235 Mohammedans, 97
Protestants, 78 Greeks, 23 Roman Catholics, 45 Armenians, 6 Copts, 3
Syrian Christians, 4 Proselytes, 1 Jew, and 1 Maronite; so that in all
nine nations and nine religious faiths were represented in the hospital.

There is also a girls' orphanage, called "Talitha Cumi," just outside
the city walls at Jerusalem, where one hundred and fourteen native girls
were last year taught by the Kaiserswerth deaconesses. Over a hundred
more made application to enter, but there was no room to receive them.
In Constantinople, Alexandria, Cairo, Beirut, and Pesth there are also
well-appointed hospitals, some of them of spacious dimensions, and all
having excellent medical service and nursing that cannot be surpassed.

The orphanage and school at Beirut had a sad foundation. In 1860 came
the terrible news of the massacre of the Maronite Christians by the
Druses in the Lebanon mountains.

Kaiserswerth deaconesses were immediately sent out, and were among the
first to arrive to join the resident Europeans and Americans in caring
for the sufferers. Numbers of children were left fatherless and
motherless, and the sisters started the orphanage at Beirut to shelter
them. When its twenty-fifth anniversary was celebrated in 1885 over
eight hundred girls had received a home and education here, and had gone
forth to eastern homes, carrying with them the light and knowledge of
Christian faith into the dark, degraded social life of the Orient.[34]

From the two orphanages at Beirut and Jerusalem over forty have gone out
as teachers in girls' schools in Palestine and Syria. Twelve others have
become deaconesses, and are ministering in this capacity to their own
countrymen and to foreigners in eastern hospitals.[35]

In Smyrna there is also a girls' school, that was opened at the request
of some wealthy Protestants residing there. The school is not so needed
as formerly, since the government has started girls' high schools, but
it is still maintained, and aids in bringing new life into the hopeless
society of the East. There is also an orphanage at Smyrna, where some
girls of the poorer classes were gathered after the ravages of the
cholera had left them without parents or homes.

The eastern deaconesses have also their Salem. Just above the little
village of Areya, in the Lebanon, on the summit of a hill overlooking
the Mediterranean, stands the house of retreat, where, during the summer
months, the more than forty sisters stationed in Beirut, Alexandria,
Cairo, and Jerusalem can take refuge in seasons of overpowering heat.

The deaconess who superintends the house has a school for the native
children of the village, which is taught by one of the girls educated at
the Beirut orphanage.

Prosperous girls' schools are also in existence at Bucharest, and at
Florence, Italy. The Italian school was started in 1860 with four girls
in the upper floor of a rented house. It now possesses a beautiful house
and grounds of its own, and had one hundred and forty-five girls under
its charge the past year. Most of these were Italians, but different
foreign residents also availed themselves of the opportunity to send
their children to an excellent Protestant school. There is also a
mission at Rome maintained by deaconesses during the winter months.

The large majority of the undertakings outside of Kaiserswerth were
initiated personally by Fliedner. When we recall the complex demands of
the home field in Germany we marvel at the versatile executive ability
of this man, who started life as the humble pastor of an obscure village
church. But he loved work. He possessed "iron industry." He was ever
hopeful, courageous, and indefatigable. Above all, he trusted completely
in the leadings of Divine Providence, and constantly went forward with
sure confidence. Then he was a true leader. He knew men. He put the
right person in the right place, gave him full liberty of action, and
held him to a strict responsibility for results. So, while Fliedner
remained the soul of the great institution, he knew how to make himself
spared, which was not the least of his qualifications for his calling.


  [30] _Der Diakonissenberuf_, Emil Wacker, Gütersloh, 1888, p. 116.
  [31] _Life of Pastor Fliedner_, translated by C. Winckworth, London,
       1867.
  [32] _Ein und fünfzigster Jahres-Bericht_, p. 30.
  [33] _Achtzehnter Bericht über die Diakonissen Stationen im
       Morgenlande_, 1888.
  [34] _Vierzehnten Bericht über die Diakonissen Stationen am Libanon._
  [35] _Der Rheinisch Westfälische Diakonissen Verein_, p. 64,
       J. Disselhoff.




CHAPTER VI.

THE REGULATIONS AT KAISERSWERTH, AND THE
DUTIES AND SERVICES OF THE DEACONESSES.


The regulations in daily use at Kaiserswerth are based on those that
Fliedner drew up in the early days of the institution. They have been
adopted with few alterations by the larger number of deaconess
institutions that have since arisen, so that to understand the spirit
and usages prevailing in them it is well to give these rules some study.
They are contained in a book numbering one hundred and seven pages,[36]
treating with great minuteness every question that affects the daily
lives of the deaconesses. The qualities that the office demands are
first dwelt upon as they are described in Acts vi, 3, and 1 Tim. iii, 8,
9. The sisters are reminded that their life is one of service; that they
serve the Lord Jesus; that they serve the poor and the sick and helpless
"for Jesus' sake;" and that they are servants one of another.

Special stress is given to the importance of cultivating unity, love,
and forbearance in the relations of daily life, and the deaconesses are
enjoined "to protect and further the honor of other sisters," "to form
one family living unitedly as sisters, through the tie of a heartfelt
love for the one great object that brings them to this place."

There are two classes of deaconesses formally recognized, nurses and
teachers; although there is another, deaconess whose work is year by
year becoming more important, and that is the deaconess who is attached
to a church in the capacity of a home missionary. She is designated by
the term "commune-deaconess," or, as the English translate it,
"parish-deaconess."

Those who desire to become nurse-deaconesses must have the elements of a
common school education, must be in good health, and, as a general rule,
be over eighteen and not over forty years of age. Most important of all
is it that she possess personal knowledge of the salvation of Christ,
and a living experience of the grace of God. Those who desire to become
teacher-deaconesses must, in addition, present certain educational
certificates, and be able to sing. All must pass some months at the
mother-house, taking care of children and assisting in housework, so
that their fitness for the office can be proven. A great deal of care
is taken to test the efficiency of the candidates, and only about one
half the probationers finally become deaconesses in full connection. The
teachers have, further, a seminary course of one year for those who are
to teach in infant schools, of two years to prepare for the elementary
schools, and of three years for the girls' high schools.

While probationers, they receive, free of charge, board and instruction,
and the caps, collars, and aprons that are their distinctive badges.
Their remaining expenses they provide for themselves. Those who have
completed the full term of probation, and have proved their fitness for
the office, must pledge themselves to a service of at least five years.
At the end of the time they may renew the engagement or not, as they
wish. Should a deaconess be needed at home by aged parents, or should
she desire to marry, she is free to leave her duties, but is expected to
give three months' notice of her intention to do so.

The deaconess performs her duties gratuitously. This is a main feature
of the system. She is not even free to accept personal presents, for
envy, jealousy, and unworthy motives might then creep into the system.
She is truly "the servant of the Lord Jesus Christ." All of her wants
are supplied, and her future needs anticipated, so that, literally
"taking no thought for the morrow," she can give herself with
single-hearted devotion to the work in hand. The deaconess at
Kaiserswerth receives from the institution her modest wardrobe,
consisting of a Sunday suit, a working-dress of dark blue, blue apron,
white caps and collars. A deaconess attired in her garb, with the
placid, contented countenance that seems distinctively to belong to her,
is a pleasant, wholesome sight that is constantly to be seen on the
streets of German cities. Her deaconess attire is not only a protection,
assuring her chivalrous treatment from all classes of men, but it is a
convenient identification that insures her certain privileges on the
State railroads and steamboats, for the German government recognizes the
sisters as benefactors of society, and treats them accordingly. For her
personal expenses the Kaiserswerth deaconess in Germany receives yearly
twenty-two dollars and fifty cents; sometimes when in foreign lands she
is paid a slightly larger sum. When she becomes unfitted for service by
reason of sickness or old age, and has no means of her own, the Board of
Direction provides for her maintenance.

The rules for probationers are full of practical suggestions touching
the details of daily life. There is not space to transcribe them here,
but those who have charge of training schools will find them valuable
reading. Every kind of house and hospital service is clearly defined.
The deaconesses are instructed what duties are theirs in hospitals for
women and in hospitals for men. In the latter the sister undertakes only
such nursing as is suited to her sex, and for that reason she has a male
assistant. She must follow strictly the doctor's orders in all matters
pertaining to diet, medicine, and ventilation, and must inform him daily
of the patient's state. She also assists the clergyman, if desired, in
ministering to spiritual needs. But she must not obtrude her religion,
when it is distasteful to her patients; rather manifest it in her deeds
and manner of life.

Every portion of the day has definite duties assigned to it. On reading
them over you say, Can much be accomplished when the hours are
subdivided into so many portions, and given over to so many objects? But
the unvarying testimony is that no nurses accomplish more than the
German deaconesses. No matter how busy they may be, the effort is made
for each to have a quiet half hour for meditation and private devotion.
Every afternoon the chapel is opened for this purpose, and all the
sisters who can be spared meet here. A hymn is sung, and afterward each
spends the time as she will in meditation, reading the Bible or silent
prayer, the quietness and stillness being unbroken by words. The "Stille
halbe Stunde," as it is called, is greatly prized by the sisters, and is
observed by them in all their institutions, and in all lands. There are
Bible-classes and prayer-meetings for the deaconesses during the week,
and the first Sunday of every month there is a special service of prayer
and thanksgiving for all sisters, all the affiliated houses, and similar
homes wherever they exist. Fliedner prepared a book of daily Bible
readings for the use of the sisters, and a hymn-book, used in all the
Kaiserswerth institutions at home and abroad. "We have no vows," he
said, "and I will have no vows, but a bond of union we must have, and
the best bond is the word of God, and our second bond is singing."[37]
The sisters of each house meet together to give their votes for the
admission of new deaconesses and the election of the superintendents.
Each deaconess is expected to obey those who are placed over her, and to
accept the kind of work assigned her, except in the case of contagious
diseases, when her permission is asked. What a tribute it is to these
women that such a refusal has never yet been known! Every effort is made
to harmonize the right of the individual with the needs of the whole
body, a marked characteristic of the Protestant sisters of charity.

When a probationer becomes a deaconess she is consecrated to her work by
a service the main features of which it may be well to indicate. They
are as follows:

Singing. Address commending the deaconesses for acceptance. Address to
the deaconesses, recalling the ever-repeated thought, "You are servants
in a threefold sense: servants of the Lord Jesus; servants of the needy
for Jesus' sake; servants one of another." Then, having answered the
question, "Are you determined to fulfill these duties truly in the fear
of the Lord, and according to his holy will?" the candidate kneels and
receives the benediction: "May the Triune God, God the Father, Son, and
Holy Ghost, bless you; may he give you fidelity unto death, and then the
crown of life." After this is repeated the prayer of the _Apostolical
Constitutions_, that beautiful prayer which has been said on similar
occasions in many lands and in many tongues.[38] The service ends with
the communion.

A similar consecration service is used by nearly all the German
deaconess houses. The features of those that meet together in the
triennial Conferences at Kaiserswerth are strikingly similar; the spirit
of the original founder pervades them all.

The first of the Conferences was held in 1861, just twenty-five years
after the founding of the first deaconess house at Kaiserswerth. It was
celebrated as a Thanksgiving festival for the restoration of the
diaconate of women to the Church. The representatives of twenty-seven
distinct mother-houses met together to exchange their experiences, and
to deliberate on matters touching the further usefulness of the order.

Since then the Conferences have been continued at intervals of three and
four years. The last General Conference assembled at Fliedner's old home
in September, 1888.

Just before it convened, as is the custom, statistics were obtained from
the different mother-houses represented in the association, and pains
were taken to verify their correctness. The results so obtained are
given in the following table:[39]

                    Mother-                  Fields of
    Conferences.    houses.    Sisters.        Work.
    1861              27        1,197             ?
    1864              30        1,592           386
    1868              40        2,106           526
    1872              48        2,657           648
    1875              50        3,239           866
    1878              51        3,901         1,093
    1881              53        4,748         1,436
    1884              54        5,653         1,742
    1888              57        7,129         2,263

Five additional houses had made application for entrance at the time the
table was made, and were received at the ensuing Conference, among which
was the Philadelphia mother-house of deaconesses in connection with the
Mary J. Drexel Home.

Over sixty mother-houses now belong to the association, and
notwithstanding the necessary loss of deaconesses from death or removal
from work since the preceding Conference, there are 1,476 more in number
now than then. Surely the deaconess cause is striking deep root in the
religious life of Protestant Europe. During Fliedner's life-time
occasions arose which called the deaconesses outside their accustomed
fields of work, and proved their value in the exceptional emergencies
that so often arise. Here is an instance that occurred during the early
days of the establishment:[40]

"An epidemic of nervous fever was raging in two communes of the circle
of Duisburg, Gartrop, and Gahlen. Its first and most virulent outbreak
took place at Gartrop, a small, poor, secluded village of scarcely one
hundred and thirty souls, without a doctor, without an apothecary in the
neighborhood, while the clergyman was upon the point of leaving for
another parish, and his successor had not yet been appointed. Four
deaconesses, including the superior, Pastor Fliedner's wife, and a maid,
hastened to this scene of wretchedness, and found from twenty to
twenty-five fever patients in the most alarming condition, a mother and
four children in one hovel, four other patients in another, and so on,
all lying on foul straw, or on bed-clothes that had not been washed for
weeks, almost without food, utterly without help. Many had died already;
the healthy had fled; the parish doctor lived four German leagues off,
and could not come every day. The first care of the sisters, who would
have found no lodging but for the then vacancy of the parsonage, was to
introduce cleanliness and ventilation into the narrow cabins of the
peasants; they washed and cooked for the sick, they watched every night
by turns at their bed-side, and tended them with such success that only
four died after their arrival, and the rest were only convalescent after
four weeks' stay. The same epidemic having broken out in the neighboring
commune of Gahlen, in two families, of whom eight members lay ill at
once, a single deaconess was able, in three weeks, to restore every
patient to health, and to prevent the further spread of the disease.
What would not our doctors give for a few dozen of such hard-working,
zealous, intelligent ministers in the field of sanitary reform?"

The Schleswig-Holstein war of 1864 was the first in which Protestant
deaconesses were active as nurses. Already in the Crimean war the Greek
Sisters of Charity among the Russians, the Sisters of Mercy among the
French, and Florence Nightingale and Miss Stanley among the English, had
wakened the liveliest gratitude on the part of the soldiers, and secured
the respect and approbation of the surgeons.

In the Austrian war of 1866 two hundred and eighty-two deaconesses were
in the hospitals and on the battle-fields, fifty-eight of whom were from
Kaiserswerth. The Franco-Prussian war of 1870 was on a greater scale,
and afforded wider opportunities for the unselfish, priceless labors of
these Christian nurses. Neatly eight hundred deaconesses, sent from more
than thirty mother-houses, cared for the sick and wounded in the camp
hospitals or on the field. The willingness of a number of boards of
administration to release sisters who were in their service, and the
voluntary offers of other women to take their places, enabled
Kaiserswerth to send two hundred and twenty of the number. Their
experience in improvising hospitals, in aiding the surgeon in his
amputations, and in ministering to the wounded and dying, throws a
tender glow of compassionate sympathy over the terrible scenes of
war.[41]

The importance of trained deaconesses in times of war is now well
understood by the military authorities at Berlin. In the winter of 1887,
when war seemed imminent, the directors of the German deaconess houses
were summoned by the government to a conference at the German capital to
take measures for supplying nurses in case war should be declared.

Deaconesses are now thoroughly incorporated into the religious and
social features of the German national life, as must be admitted by any
one who has weighed the facts that have been given.

The example of Kaiserswerth has been far-reaching; the mission of
Fliedner, that simple-hearted, true-souled, practical, energetic pastor,
has been wonderfully successful.

In this rapid sketch I have said but little of the hinderances he met,
nothing of the ridicule which at first attacked him unsparingly. He paid
no heed to these obstacles, and why should we waste time in detailing
them? Steadfastly and undeviatingly he went forward toward the end he
had in view; that is, to restore in all its aspects the devoted
disciplined services of Christian women to the Church. He passed away
from life October 5, 1864, leaving the great establishment that he had
watched over in the charge of his son-in-law, Pastor Disselhoff, and
other members of his family.

The institution has become an imposing mass of building, forming an
almost absurd contrast to the little garden house, the cradle of the
whole establishment, which is still standing in the parsonage garden.

When the fiftieth anniversary of the rise of the deaconess cause was
celebrated in 1886 the Kaiserswerth sisterhood put their mites together
and purchased the little house, to hold it in perpetuity as a monument
of God's providence.

The symbol of Kaiserswerth is a white dove, carrying an olive branch,
resting against a blue ground. The blue flag floats from the old
windmill tower on the river-bank, attracting the attention of the
traveler as he floats up the Rhine.

Other flags bear messages of conquest, of victory, of battles fought and
won, of storm and stress and endeavor in the conflict of man against his
fellow-man. But only peace and good-will, the victory of goodness and of
love--these alone are the messages that are waved forth to the wind by
the blue flag of Kaiserswerth.


  [36] _Haus Ordnung und Dienst-Anweisung für die Diakonissen und
       Probeschwestern des Diakonissen Mutterhauses zu Kaiserswerth._
  [37] _Deaconesses_, Rev. J. S. Howson, D.D., p. 81.
  [38] Refer back to page 23, chapter ii, where it can be found.
  [39] _Der Armen und Kranken Freund_, August Heft, 1888.
  [40] _Woman's Work in the Church_, p. 273, J. M. Ludlow. A. Strahan,
       London, 1866.
  [41] _Denkschrift zur Jubelfeier_, p. 215.




CHAPTER VII.

OTHER ESTABLISHMENTS ON THE CONTINENT.


In a book of these dimensions no exhaustive historical account can be
given of all the developments of the deaconess movement in the various
countries on the Continent. Only a few of the leading houses can be
spoken of, but through a knowledge of these we can gain an insight into
the life and characteristics of the movement as a whole.

The mother-house at Strasburg is one of the oldest ones, dating from
1842. It owes its origin to the holy enthusiasm and life experiences of
Pastor Härter, who exercised a deep religious influence in the city
where he lived. In 1817, when he was a young man of twenty, the great
Strasburg hospital was re-organized. The six to eight hundred patients
were divided according to their religious faith. To the Catholics were
assigned as nurses Sisters of Charity. For the Protestants there were
paid women nurses.

The magistrates appealed to the pastors to find at least two Protestant
women of experience and ability to oversee the nurses, but the most
persistent search in the various churches of Strasburg failed to procure
suitable candidates. Years afterward, when death entered Härter's family
circle, and his life became clouded and darkened, he was called as a
pastor to the largest church in Strasburg. He entered upon his new
pastorate with a heart heavy and sad, and not until after ten months of
struggle, in which the depths of his soul were stirred, did he come
forth strong, confident, and positive as never before that "Jesus Christ
came into the world to save sinners, of whom I am chief." Henceforth
there was force to his life, conviction in his words, and never-ceasing
energy in good works.

When he heard of Fliedner's new undertaking below him on the Rhine he
remembered the difficulty in finding Protestant nurses for the hospital,
and declared that Strasburg must have a similar institution. He won the
support of a number of Christian men and women, and the house was opened
in October, 1842. From its beginning many branches of charitable and
religious work were undertaken. Especial attention was at first given to
preparing Christian teachers, and the schools in connection with the
deaconess house were filled with pupils. The success in this particular
aroused apprehension lest the deaconesses should be diverted from their
legitimate duties in caring for outside interests, so for a time the
schools were discontinued. They have been resumed, however, and are
to-day prosperous as of old.[42] There are also a hospital, a home for
aged women, a servants' training-school and a foundling asylum under the
charge of the deaconesses. They are, as a class, of higher social rank
than these of Kaiserswerth, the preponderating number of whom are from
the lower grade of social life. They are also better educated. This is
partly a necessity, from the fact that the city is on the border-land
between two great nations and if the deaconesses are to be effective
they must be familiar with the spoken and written speech of both
peoples. Strasburg continues to be a great and powerful center of
deaconess activities, having a number of branch houses and various
fields of work.

The affiliated house at Mülhausen has obtained an especially good report
for its successful use of parish deaconesses. No other house has so
systematized their labors or developed their possibilities as has the
deaconess house at Mülhausen. All the authorities on deaconess work
agree that the office of the parish deaconess is the crown and glory of
the diaconate, and approaches most nearly the type of the deaconesses of
the early Church.

The parish deaconess has occasion to use every gift which she can
possibly acquire in the varied training of the deaconess school. She
must know how to care for the poor, the weak, the sick, and those
needing help for either body or soul, as she finds them in her visits
from house to house. She must be able to pray at the bedside of the rich
man, and to serve in the kitchen of the poor man; to be motherly to
children, sympathetic with the sorrowing, and silent with the
complaining. She must be an intelligent nurse, having some knowledge of
medicine, able to faithfully carry out the instructions of the
physician. She must be keen in detecting imposition, and wise in the
administration of charity, knowing that "to deny is often to help, and
to give is often to corrupt." Truly, there is no gift of Christian
womanhood which has not here its use.

For many reasons Mülhausen was well adapted for a field of labor for
parish deaconesses. It is an old city, dating back to mediæval times,
having a population of about sixty thousand inhabitants, half of whom
are workmen. It has long been known for its noble and successful
endeavors to promote the well-being of the working class. One of the
first building and loan associations was started here to enable the
operatives to earn their homes by gradual payments. Other organizations
whose object is the moral elevation of the employees have united the
different social circles by strong ties of sympathy. It was an easy
matter, therefore, to raise a subscription of two hundred thousand
francs to provide a home for the deaconesses who were invited here from
Strasburg in 1861. There are now fourteen sisters in the deaconess
house. Half of the number remain at the home to nurse the sick, and
perform house duties. The remainder are parish deaconesses, who go forth
early in the morning, each to her own quarter of the city, where she is
busy at her labors during the day. In the evening she returns to the
central home. In each of the seven districts into which the city is
divided is located a district house; a pleasant, well-kept place. This
contains a waiting-room for the deaconess and a consultation-room for
the district physician, who comes at stated hours during the week. The
poor who are recommended by the sister he treats gratuitously, and, so
far as the physician directs, she furnishes food gratuitously. She keeps
on hand a good stock of lint, bandages, and instruments. Each house has
a kitchen and cellar. Every morning a woman comes in and prepares a
large kettle of nourishing soup, and at 11 A. M. this is given out to
the sick and poor.

In the store-room are rice, sugar, coffee, meal, and similar articles of
food. From here she sends out at noon such portions as are needed for
the most destitute of the district. In winter she also sells from her
stores to the poor. Then there is a closet amply provided with sewing
materials, and when the deaconess obtains work for seamstresses she
furnishes them at a small price the necessary outfit to begin sewing. At
two o'clock the deaconess ends her duties at the district house, and
spends the remainder of the day in making visits in her quarter. To
provide means to support the constant expenditure, there is in each
quarter of the city a committee of fifteen ladies and three gentlemen,
being in all more than one hundred ladies and twenty gentlemen, who are
responsible for the administration of the charity. Each committee has a
yearly collection in its district, and in this way about forty thousand
francs are gathered annually. In each quarter nine hundred francs (one
hundred and eighty dollars) is set apart for the maintenance of the
sister and the rent of the district house. The remaining sum is expended
by the deaconesses in their several districts in caring for the sick and
destitute. Every month each one receives the sum allotted her from the
treasurer, and in return reports her expenditure. The ladies on the
committee often give personal assistance to the deaconess, and sometimes
assume responsibility for individual cases, or for an entire street. The
arrangements are constantly being improved upon as knowledge is gained
by practice. The experience that has been gathered at Mülhausen is very
practical, and therefore very valuable. Similar work could be undertaken
in any of our large American cities, with the anticipation of like
beneficent results. For that reason the above detailed description has
been ventured upon, with the hope that the Old World example will find
imitators in the New.[43] Similar institutions, although not so
carefully perfected, are found in Gorlitz and Magdeburg.

In Berlin are a good many deaconess institutions. Among them is the
Marthashof, a training-school for servants, and a home for those out of
employment.

The first impulse to care for the girls who come to large cities to
obtain work, and to provide them a home where they can have respectable
surroundings, came from Pastor Vermeil, the founder of the deaconess
house at Paris. When Fliedner visited the Paris house his heart was
touched by what he saw. He thought of the thousands of girls coming
annually to Berlin from the provinces, and of the exposures and
temptations to which they were subjected. He knew that many of them in
their ignorance and inexperience were ruined body and soul in the
lodging-houses to which they resorted, and drifted away on the streets
of the city, only to find a place eventually in the hopeless wards of
the great hospital, La Charité.

He determined to do what he could to provide a remedy, and, as was his
wont, "without money and without noise" he set to work. In the north of
Berlin, at quite a distance from the railroad stations, he hired a small
house on a street then called "The Lost Way"--a street well named, as it
was unlighted and unpaved, and so poorly kept that when the queen came
to visit the home, shortly after it was opened, her carriage, in spite
of the strong horses, got stuck in the mud.

By the aid of some ladies in the city the home was furnished with twelve
beds; three deaconesses were put in charge, and after perplexing
difficulties the authorization to open a registry for servants was
obtained. The idea at first met with derision. It was said that such an
institution was rightly located on "The Lost Way," for no one would ever
come to it. But they came. In two years the number of beds increased to
twenty, and the same year Fliedner purchased the entire court in which
the house stood, containing five houses and a fine garden. Queen
Elizabeth of Prussia became the patroness of the institution, and it
grew in favor with the people. A training-school was added in which the
girls were taught to wash, iron, cook, and sew, and also to work in the
garden and to care for cows, the last two branches of domestic service
being required of servant-girls in Germany. Later an infant school was
added in which nursery girls were practiced in taking charge of
children, a pleasant, helpful demeanor being made one of the requisites.
Over two hundred children, mostly coming from the poorest and gloomiest
homes, are in daily attendance. About three hundred and fifty more
attend the girls' school for children of the working classes. In the
home and training-school for servants about eight hundred girls are
received annually, and sixteen thousand have been sheltered and taught
during the years it has been open. They readily secure situations, over
two thousand applications being annually received for the servants of
the Marthashof. They remain in friendly relation to the home, receive
good counsel and advice, and are encouraged to spend their free Sundays
there.

The Marthashof has had a beneficent influence over the moral and
spiritual welfare of servants throughout Germany. In nearly all the
cities similar homes are now established, while in the larger cities
Sunday associations are formed to provide suitable places of meeting for
the entertainment and instruction of those who are free Sunday
afternoons and evenings. So far as I am aware, no similar work has been
attempted for servant-girls in the United States. It is true that
training-schools exist, but not with religious supervision, and with the
moral and religious instruction of the inmates made a prominent feature.
The Marthashof offers us a lesson well worth our learning.

The deaconess house, "Bethanien," in Berlin, was founded by King
Frederick William IV., who as the Crown Prince took a warm interest in
Fliedner's undertakings.[44] It still remains under the protection of
the emperor, and is one of the most important mother-houses. Over three
thousand patients are annually admitted to the hospital connected with
the house, and five hundred children are treated at a dispensary devoted
solely to cases of diphtheria. Outside of the city it has thirty-three
stations. There are also the Lazarus Hospital and Deaconess Home, the
Paul Gerhardt Deaconess Home, provided for parish deaconesses, and the
Elizabeth Hospital and Home, which started independently but is now
allied to Kaiserswerth.

The deaconess house in Neudettelsau stands in closest union with the
Lutheran Church. The sisters are mostly from the higher ranks of
society, and intellectual training is made prominent. Certain liturgical
forms are used, and in the main deaconesses are employed in preparing
ecclesiastical vestments and embroideries for church adornment.

In marked contrast to Dettelsau is the deaconess house at Berne. It is
almost a private institution, having only slight connection with the
State Church. It owes its origin to Sophie Wurdemberger, a member of one
of the old patrician families of Berne. A visit to England made her
acquainted with Elizabeth Fry, with the usual beneficent result of
increased interest and activity in good works. On her return to Berne
she gained the support of a society of women, and through their aid
secured a hospital and deaconess home. It is now fourth in number among
the largest mother-houses, has two hundred and ninety-seven deaconesses,
five affiliated houses, and forty-five different fields of work.

The oldest mother-house in Switzerland is at St. Loup, not far from
Lausanne, standing on one of the beautiful heights of that picturesque
region. It was founded by Pastor Germond in 1841, through the direct
influence of the work at Kaiserswerth. There are now seventy-three
deaconesses, mostly acting as nurses either in private homes or public
institutions.[45]

There is also a large institution at Riehen near Basel, which sends out
two hundred deaconesses. The greater number are of the peasant class,
and are nearly all employed as nurses. The home at Zürich was at first a
daughter-house of Riehen, but is now an independent institution with
twenty-seven stations. In Austria there is a mother-house at
Gallneukirchen from which sisters are sent forth, four of them working
in as many Vienna parishes. The story of deaconess work in Austria is an
interesting one, and is told by Miss Williams in a recent number of
_The Churchman_, from which the following extracts are taken:

"The Protestants of Gallneukirchen were first formed into an independent
parish in the year 1872, and it is the only one lying between the Danube
and the Bohemian frontier. It is very widely extended, but numbers only
three hundred and eighteen souls, and is so poor that with the greatest
effort it can raise only four hundred florins a year (about one hundred
and sixty dollars) for church and school. With the aid of those
interested in the work a parish-house has been secured, where the pastor
and his wife reside, and in which is the deaconess asylum for the aged,
infirm, and insane of all classes. It has not as yet been possible to
clear off the debt on the purchase. Still the sisters strive in every
way to enlarge their usefulness, so that they now possess extensive
buildings and farms--only partly paid for, it is true--wherein to house
the many afflicted who apply to them for aid. In one building, standing
alone on a hill, they purpose to collect the insane patients, and
suitable additions are now being made to insure their safety and
comfort. In another village, two hours' drive from here, is their
school, where more than sixty boys and girls are taught, fed, and
clothed, in most cases gratuitously, at worst at a nominal charge."

"The sisters are bright and cheerful, and keep their various dwellings
so exquisitely neat and clean, with their white-washed walls adorned
with Scripture texts and pictures. No work, however menial, is beneath
them. I have myself seen one scrubbing the stairs, and in turns they
sleep on a hard straw bed on the floor, ready to rise in the night as
often as a bell summons them to the aid of a suffering invalid or a
refractory lunatic."

There are a few institutions that exist independently of those
represented at the Kaiserswerth General Conference. They stand alone for
various reasons; perhaps they have not met the conditions required of
those which belong to the association. Any house whose administration
rests exclusively either in the hands of a man or a woman is excluded
from the Conference. In every mother-house there represented the
administrative head is twofold, consisting of a gentleman, who, with
rare exceptions, is a clergyman, and a lady who is a deaconess. The
Kaiserswerth authorities regard this joint management as an
indispensable condition.

The rector, as he is usually called, cares for the intellectual and
spiritual instruction of the probationers, conducts public services in
the chapel, and issues the publications and reports of the house.

The oberin, or house-mother, is the direct head of the sisters. She is
responsible for the interior management, regulates the duties of the
sisters, and gives practical instruction. The two are jointly
responsible for the acceptance and dismissal of probationers, for the
assignment of the sisters to different fields of labor, and the kind of
labor required. Every mother-house has its own peculiarities. The
personal characteristics of those who conduct it are naturally impressed
upon the house.

Then, too, the influence of environment is to be reckoned with. The
house may be located in a large city or in a small one; in the country
or in towns. It may be under the influence of a State Church, as in
Germany, or of Christians of all Churches, as at Mildmay. It will share
the characteristics of the race of people from which come its workers.
Doubtless in the Methodist Episcopal Church in America the deaconesses
that eventually become recognized as set apart to special Christian
service, through the training that is provided for them, will be women
who are peculiarly adapted to the needs of that Church, with all the
distinguishing American traits that will prepare them to understand the
people whom they are to serve, and that will give them access to the
hearts of this people.

If the deaconess cause should gain favor with us as it has in Europe,
and should the deaconesses become as established in the social life of
the people as they are there, the effective agencies will be largely
increased that are to deal with the questions that come to the front
whenever, as in great cities, large numbers of people are massed
together.

Deaconess institutions now exist in Switzerland, France, Holland,
Denmark, Norway, Sweden, Russia, Austria, England, and Germany, while
the countries in which these homes have stations are literally too
numerous to mention. Spain, Italy, Greece, Turkey, the countries of
Northern Africa, and of Asia Minor, as well as isolated mission stations
throughout the entire world are now served by deaconesses.

If there were ten times the number of sisters, places could be at once
found for them. It is instructive on this point to read what Pastor
Disselhoff says[46] in the account he gives of the various demands made
upon him, which he has been unable to meet. One of the letters he quotes
was from an English missionary on the Cameron River. "Send us
deaconesses for our hospital," he says. "It was built for European
sailors, especially Germans. We hope and trust to overcome the
superstitions of the natives, and that they too, may come to be healed."
But there were no sisters to send.

A similar call came from Shanghai, but as it was impossible to return a
favorable answer, although the hospital was a Protestant institution,
the Sisters of Mercy were invited in, and given control. From 1870 up to
1886 over two hundred and twenty-seven places at widely remote
distances, such as Madras, New Orleans, Port Said, Rio de Janeiro, and
elsewhere, sent most urgent appeals for Kaiserswerth deaconesses to be
assigned them, but invariably the same answer must be returned: "There
are none to send." Disselhoff closes by saying, "How many open doors has
God given! Whose fault is it that they remain closed?"


  [42] Schäfer, _Die Weibliche Diakonie_, vol. i, p. 21.
  [43] The details of the deaconess work at Mülhausen are largely
       taken from Schäfer's _Die Weibliche Diakonie_, vol. ii.
  [44] _Life of Pastor Fliedner_, translated by C. Winckworth, London,
       1867, p. 133. "The favor of the great, especially the
       condescending kindness of our late Sovereign, he took as a gift
       from the King of kings, who allowed his own work to be thus
       promoted. He strenuously avoided all personal distinction, and
       never wore the order which had been sent him; 'for a servant of
       the Church,' he said, 'there should be but one order--the Cross
       of the Lord.'"
  [45] _Der Armen und Kranken Freund_, August, 1888.
  [46] _Denkschrift zur Jubelfeier_, pp. 248, 249.



CHAPTER VIII.

DEACONESSES IN GERMAN METHODISM.


The good results of the work of deaconesses in the other Protestant
bodies of Germany doubtless had their influence upon German Methodism.
As far back as 1868 in Wurtemberg, and later in Frankfort, some
preachers introduced parish deaconesses for the care of the sick; but
well-directed efforts, and unity in management, were lacking.

The existing association was started July 8, 1874, under the title of
"Bethanienverein," or the Bethany Society, through the efforts of
several members of the German Conference, among whom were Rev. G. Weiss,
who, with two deaconesses, initiated the work in Bremen, Rev. Frederick
Eilers, the present inspector, and Rev. G. Hausser, who for several
years was president of the board of direction, and now resides in
America.[47] A further number of ministers showed themselves inclined to
stand by the society, both by their influence and through contributions
taken in their churches, so that in 1876 the first trained deaconesses
were set at work in the city of Frankfort.

As has been said,[48] the little institution in its early days had to
pass through a series of critical experiences, as a young child has to
encounter the series of childhood diseases that assail it; but it
outlived them all, and is now enjoying a vigorous youth. It was but
another illustration of the truth that all beginnings are difficult, and
that successful experience has to be bought by overcoming hinderances
and obstacles.

To-day there is no branch of German Methodism more successfully and
substantially incorporated into the Church life than the deaconess
society, and none that wins greater favor among those outside of
denominational lines.

The first printed report was issued in October, 1884. In this the
inspector says: "Our society is now in three cities, Frankfort, Hamburg,
and Berlin, and our sisters are not able to meet all the demands upon
them for service." At that time there were thirteen deaconesses and
twenty probationers. The last report, issued in July, 1888, shows an
increase in numbers both of deaconesses and their stations. There are
now eighty-nine deaconesses, eleven of whom are probationers, and there
are stations in five places. Besides the ones previously mentioned in
Germany, two additional stations have been started in Switzerland: one
in Zürich, and one in St. Gall.

Nearly all the Methodist German deaconesses are engaged in caring for
the sick; it is only recently that attempts have been made in some other
directions of charitable endeavor. In the last report we are told that
at Frankfort steps have been taken to reform fallen women. One of the
sisters seems to be especially endowed with tact and ability for this
difficult work. She has already induced twenty-two of these girls to
enter the asylum at Sachsenhausen. The police authorities and city
magistrates have given this same sister access to the women prisoners,
which is a decided favor, coming from German officials. Besides her work
in this particular, she has devoted her remaining time to the care of
the poor and the sick.

Many deaconesses were called upon to go out as nurses in private
families, and, in order to obtain room to accommodate the added number
these services required, it has been necessary to rent an additional
house. There are two clinics in connection with the institution; one for
those suffering from nose, throat, or lung diseases, the other for
diseases of women. In both, the hours of consultation are free, and
attract numerous visitors. Two hundred and forty-six people were
received in the hospital last year, and were cared for in four thousand
one hundred and fifty days of nursing. Spiritual results are also
anticipated from the seed of God's word sown in the hearts of the sick
through daily prayer and Sunday services.

The house at Frankfort is too small for its increasing needs, and a
permanent home of more ample dimensions is greatly to be desired.

In Hamburg the house has been enlarged, and there is now room for
thirty-five sisters; yet still there are more demands made than can be
met. In one month ninety requests were handed in for the aid of the
deaconesses. The city authorities offered them a large lot of land at a
very moderate sum, which is at present used as a garden, and adds much
to the enjoyment of the home.

On the 4th of March, 1888, occurred the anniversary of the founding of
the Hamburg house, at which time six sisters were set apart to their
life calling by a service of consecration. As in all places where our
deaconesses are employed, so also in Hamburg their influence is felt in
the increase of religious life among the families they serve.

In Berlin, again, there is an imperative call for enlarged house
accommodations, and more sisters are needed to meet the requests for
help that are constantly coming to them. As the report expresses it,
"Something must happen!"[49] After six years of activity in Berlin the
deaconesses find themselves well appreciated, and with a broad field of
labor. The city authorities gave them permission to take a house
collection during the months of February and March. One of the German
ministers said, "This is an unusual favor, only granted in exceptional
cases, as when a village is swept away, or there is an inundation, or a
failure of harvests." This collection was no easy task. In the depth of
winter, in rigorous cold and snow the sisters had to climb weary flights
of stairs, in houses four and five stories high, arranged in flats; to
knock at many doors, often meeting with but slight success or a positive
refusal; yet daily they went with fresh courage to their work,
encouraged by the thought that they were toiling not for themselves, but
to serve the needy, "for Jesus' sake." The collection resulted in
obtaining nearly twenty thousand marks, to which has been added the loan
of a larger sum at a small rate of interest, so that there is good
prospect of soon obtaining a permanent home as the property of the
deaconess society.

St. Gall is one of the newer stations, but from the beginning it has
been a work of promise. In this old center of missionary operations,
where Irish missionaries founded one of the most famous monasteries of
mediæval times, is now to be erected a hospital under the care of
Methodist deaconesses, who have already begun to collect means for this
purpose. In Scheffel's famous story of _Ekkehard_ the only way in which
the Duchess Hadwig could enter the monastery of St. Gall (as there was a
law that no woman should set her foot upon the threshold) was by the
ingenious device of a young monk, who lifted her over in his arms. These
peaceful women of Methodism are finding no obstacle now as did Hadwig of
old; they do not need even figuratively to be lifted over the entering
threshold; they are gladly welcomed, and are introducing a new element
into the life of the old city.

In Zürich seven deaconesses are at work under the protection, and with
the sympathetic co-operation, of the pastor and the church. I saw
something of the deaconesses and their duties in this place. The
inspector, Rev. Fr. Eilers, came with the first deaconesses and
introduced them to their new field when I was a resident of the city. On
Sunday morning he occupied the pulpit, preaching from Rom. xvi, 1,
commending the deaconesses to the kindness and helpful aid of the
members of the church. I used often to see Sister Myrtha, who was the
head sister, hastening hither and thither on her errands of mercy. In
her plain black dress and round shoulder-cape to match, and broad white
collar and white cap, she was a pleasant and attractive figure. She was
always happy and contented, ready to answer the many questions with
which I plied her in my desire to look through the eyes of a deaconess,
and to obtain her views of the office to which she belonged. She had a
great love for her work, and believed that she was doing service for
Christ in a true missionary field. Her simple uniform was a
distinguishing mark that insured her respect and attention wherever she
went, and she regarded it as a garb of honor that marked her as
belonging to the daughters of the great King. You could not call such a
life an austere or unnatural one. It was too thoroughly filled with
thoughts of love to others to be either morbid or introspective. I
obtained my first favorable impressions of the usefulness of deaconesses
and their importance to the Church from the cheerful, contented labors
of Sister Myrtha and her associates among the poor and sick of
Zürich--quiet women, of no particular prominence in the social world,
and not learned or accomplished; "_nur einfache Mädchen_" (only simple
maidens, quiet, ordinary women, as we might translate Sister Myrtha's
own phrase), but living "not to be ministered unto, but to minister,"
commending their creed by their deeds, and winning sympathy by the
loving, self-denying spirit that they manifest.

During the last year a house of rest has been opened similar to the
house Salem at Kaiserswerth. This is called by the beautiful name
"_Gottestreue_," or "God's Fidelity." The report says that they have
named it God's Fidelity in recollection of this: "That the Lord has so
faithfully led us and has cared for us in all storms which, especially
at the beginning of the work, threatened to overwhelm it, has watched
over us and upheld us, and has so richly blessed us." The acquisition of
this house came through the work of the sisters. One of them was caring
for an aged widow, whose sympathies were so won that she offered to give
her property, amounting to about ten thousand marks, to the deaconess
society, asking only that she be cared for for the remainder of her
life. This sum enabled the house to be built, and last summer it was
opened for use. It lies upon a mountain, has a pleasant outlook to the
south, and a beautiful view over the valley of the Main and off to the
distant forests. Near at hand is a grove of chestnut trees, and farther
removed are extensive pine forests with pleasant walks. The house is in
the charge of one of the older sisters.

The regulations touching the training and duties of the sisters are
similar to those of Kaiserswerth. Two years of probation are required,
part of which is devoted to practical work under the superintendence of
an older deaconess. The rules of daily life are much the same; a quiet
half hour of prayer and meditation is strongly urged, and the same
freedom in control of personal property and withdrawal from the office
exists. It is pleasant to record that our deaconesses have secured to
themselves such good report for their usefulness that the city officials
in Germany accord to them the free use of steamboats and street-cars;
and the Prussian government does the same for roads that are under State
control.

The Bethany Society of the German Methodists is self-supporting and is
independent of the Conference, save only that the board of direction is
composed of Methodist preachers chosen by the Conference. Each of the
homes at the five stations has also its board of control, made up of the
inspector, the pastor in charge, and the head sister. The inspector is a
member of the Conference, but has no appointment, as his whole time is
devoted to the duty of superintendence. Last year the society took the
further step of deciding that henceforth the deaconesses should not be
sent, as heretofore, to outside hospitals or other institutions to
complete their training, but should be given the advantages they require
at our own homes. Owing to this decision only six probationers can be
received for the coming year, and others who have made application to
enter must wait their turn.

The German Methodist Church, the daughter of American Methodism,
anticipated the parent Church in utilizing the womanly gifts and
services of deaconesses as members of her aggressive forces, and
furnished it a very helpful and stimulating example.


  [47] _Jahresbericht des Bethanienvereins_, 1884, Bremen.
  [48] _Der Christliche Apologete_, article by Rev. G. Hausser,
       September 20, 1888.
  [49] _Jahresbericht_, 1888, page 8.




CHAPTER IX.

DEACONESSES IN PARIS.


When in Paris we visited the deaconess establishment on the Rue de
Reuilly, and had the pleasure, ever to be remembered, of seeing the
institution in all its workings under the guidance of Mademoiselle Sara
Monod, the daughter of Adolphe Monod; members of a family that have been
Protestants of the Protestants in the annals of France. We examined with
some degree of thoroughness the different departments, and saw them in
the busy working hours, when the full activities of the great
establishment were in exercise.

In addition to the information and reports then secured I am under
further obligation to Mademoiselle Monod for other material lately
received, among which is a pamphlet entitled _Une Visite à la Maison de
Diaconesses_, by Madame W. Monod, "the worthy daughter of one of the
founders, and the worthy wife of one of the present chaplains of the
institution." I have translated freely from this in the following pages,
as it is pervaded by a tone of intimate knowledge, and nothing can take
the place of the long years of close personal relation that make this
little book so fresh and attractive in its recital.

The institution is situated on the outskirts of the Faubourg St.
Antoine, upon an elevation, where the view in one direction is limited
by Mont St. Geneviève, and on the other embraces a large territory
intersected by the windings of the Seine and by lines of railroad. The
space is thickly dotted by the high chimneys of manufactories and
massive constructions of various forms. A great pile of buildings which
fronts upon the street forms one of the sides of the court within; two
long wings extend at right angles, which seem to have been built at
different intervals of time. That on the right ends with the
penitentiary, or house of correction; the left wing terminates more
modestly at the garden entrance; while farther, at the extreme portion
of the grounds, still to the left, rises the hospital, standing apart
from the rest. The whole establishment, including the gardens, has an
extent of fifty-five hundred square meters.

In the little room at the entrance, where the _concierge_ is usually
found in these French houses, sits one of the sisters, surrounded by
bell-cords and tubes and bells which are constantly in use, bringing
messages to and fro in all directions. A sister is always on duty,
morning, afternoon, and at night when it is necessary, responding with
discreet politeness to the inquiries made. Adjoining are the little
reception rooms, where comers and goers are met, and the consulting-room
of the distinguished oculist, who twice a week gives gratuitously his
valuable services. Then come the office and reception-room of the
chaplain of the house, followed by the little "prophet's chamber,"
occupied by the former directress when she returns upon visits which her
age and poor health render only too infrequent.

What the French call the "_économat_" or business office, next demands
our attention. A dozen registers admirably kept, portfolios of all
kinds, and numberless papers are arranged upon different shelves. The
sister in charge notes in her journal every entrance and every
departure, and all the journeys and leaves of absence of the sisters. In
a safe she has the necessary money for current expenses, the rest being
deposited in the bank. She provides the stores, examines the accounts of
the pharmacy and the kitchen, pays the salaried employees, gives or
sends to each deaconess the modest sum allowed her for personal needs,
and transacts the daily business of the house. She must also every
month hand in three reports--one to the Prefect of Police, another to
the Minister of the Interior, and the third to the Minister of Finance,
giving detailed statistics concerning the age, occupation, and progress
of her _protégés_. "How many know how to read? How many to read and
write? How many to read, write, and cipher? What progress has been made
since the last report?" These are some of the questions she has to
answer; and, meanwhile, if a crowd of little children come in, she turns
from her writing and calculations and plays with them as if she had
nothing else to do.

Let us see where these children come from. Here is the "Salle d'Asile,"
as it is called, with its benches and chairs for the little ones, maps
and historical pictures suspended upon the walls, slates and globes, and
all the belongings of a school-room. The sister who has directed this
school for thirty-five years has seen sons and daughters succeed fathers
and mothers. More than nineteen hundred children have passed through her
hands. With what pride she showed us the copy-books, and pointed out
some particularly good compositions. Hers was no perfunctory task; a
mother could not have displayed greater interest in her children. The
number of pupils varies from one hundred and ten to one hundred and
thirty, a little less than half of them being Catholics. All kinds of
primary instruction are given, including gymnastics, singing, and
marching. Bible stories hold an important place in this elementary
teaching, even those which are sometimes considered to be beyond the
reach of children; for there is nothing in any other book to take their
place. It is useless to add that not only lessons are given, but shoes,
aprons, and garments of all kinds, some of the little ones being clothed
from head to foot by the institution. Every day soup is distributed,
ostensibly to the poor and the ill-nourished, but practically partaken
of by all. Even during the siege of Paris the soup continued to appear.
It gradually became less substantial, it is true, but still it was soup.

From four to six o'clock the mothers and older sisters and brothers, or
perhaps some old lady who has been engaged to have the care of several
children, come to take the little ones home. The influence of these
children is felt beyond the school-room; it is a visible, constant
force. Such a little girl has persuaded her grandmother not to work on
Sundays. Another asks for a book that her father can read aloud to the
family. And similar instances could be multiplied; they are always to be
obtained where loving Christian hearts are interested in children, and
when they remember that fine saying of Jacqueline Pascal; "_Parler à
Dieu des petites âmes plus qu' aux petites âmes de Dieu._"[50]

There used formerly to be attached to this a "_Crèche_," where a mother
could bring her babe when she went to work in the morning, and could
come for it at night. But the government has now started a day-home for
this district of the city, so this part of the work of the deaconesses
has been discontinued.

Passing by the vegetable garden, which is also a pleasure garden for the
sick and infirm, we come to the hospital. This was opened in September,
1873, and can accommodate sixty to seventy patients. There are two large
wards for women, one for children, a dormitory for aged women, and rooms
with one, two, and three beds. All are perfectly heated, lighted, and
ventilated. The medical inspector visits the house every month, and
gives it due praise for meeting every condition of modern medical
science.

A committee of ladies takes the hospital as an especial object of its
care. They have organized a system of patronage, by which beds are
furnished poor patients at a low rate, in some cases gratuitously.
Fifteen subscribers give each two francs, or forty cents, a month; the
sick man or his patron pays a franc a day, to which the Deaconess Home
adds also a franc daily. These three francs represent the bare expenses
of a hospital bed. Of course, sixty cents a day is far from meeting the
entire cost of rent, food, baths, medicine, and service; but those
patients who have been accustomed to a certain degree of comfort in
life, when paying three francs, are freed from the painful impression of
receiving charity.

Many of the patients, when sent forth from the hospital, are directed to
the Convalescents' Home, at Passy. This is an inestimable benefit; what
could this poor servant do, whose strength is not yet sufficient to
undertake fatiguing labor? Or this mother of a family, who would
certainly fall ill again if obliged to resume the heavy burden of
housekeeping, accompanied by privations and wearing economies, were it
not for the home at Passy? Such homes of rest and convalescence are a
necessity in connection with every well-equipped deaconess institution.
The pharmacy is in the charge of a deaconess trained especially for her
duties. A deaconess director, several nurse deaconesses and
probationers, with one or two aged women, constitute the working force
of the hospital outside of the physicians. So many denominational
hospitals are now arising in America that the arrangement of hospitals
under the care of deaconesses in Germany, France, and England, cannot
fail to have interest for us.

There are no nurses like the deaconesses. Other nurses, however well
prepared in the best of training-schools, do not have the same high
motive that lifts the service onto the plane of religious duty, where
the question of self-interest is wholly lost sight of. It was the
perception of this truth that led the authorities of the German Hospital
in Philadelphia to send to Germany for deaconesses as nurses, and that
has brought about the erection of the magnificent Mary J. Drexel Home
for Deaconesses.

But let us return to Paris and our examination of the home on the Rue de
Reuilly. Leaving the hospital, and turning in the opposite direction
from that to which we came, we are at the house of correction. Bars of
iron before the windows apprise us of the character of the building.
There are two divisions of inmates; the one in which the discipline is
more rigid is called the _retenue_. Those placed here are generally
between fourteen and twenty-one years of age, although occasionally a
child of precocious depravity is met with, who has to be separated from
those under less restriction even at ten years of age. The
_disciplinaire_ is the division of milder restraint. The twenty-five or
twenty-six places in each of the two divisions are ordinarily applied
for in advance. Pastor Louis Valette said: "We shall not have room
enough until we have too much room."

There are three classes of inmates: those who are put here by their
parents for insubordination or other grave faults; those who are sent
here by order of a judge of the court for a limited period, and those
who are recognized guilty of a misdemeanor, but are acquitted on account
of their age, and must remain a certain time, sometimes until they have
attained their majority, in houses of correction and education.

The Minister of the Interior pays twelve cents a day for pupils of the
third class; the Prefect of Police four hundred dollars a year for those
of the second class, whatever their number, only the establishment is
bound to receive them at any time and at any hour.

There is a system of rewards, to promote good behavior, and those who
profit by it can accumulate a small sum of money, sometimes amounting to
sixteen or eighteen dollars, to have when they go out from here. In
other cases there is a large indebtedness on the opposite side, which
can never be collected.

The days are occupied in household work, washing, ironing, and sewing,
and two hours of schooling. When the nature of the work will permit,
instructive books are read aloud, or the deaconesses give pleasant talks
on different subjects that will keep the thoughts of the workers busy,
and give them helpful ideas to store away in their minds. As we went
about in the sewing-classes, we noticed that the time was invariably
utilized in some way that was profitable to the girls. Most of them are
pitiably ignorant of even the commonest knowledge demanded in life.
There are separate court-yards for the recreations of the two divisions.
The girls of the _disciplinaire_ are sometimes taken outside the
institution for walks; those of the _retenue_, never. The work in this
last division is especially difficult, and requires the utmost patience
and love. These poor girls have to be watched carefully, and kept
isolated from one another. Some are greatly influenced by the atmosphere
of the place, the gentle, firm kindness of the sisters, and the
restriction they receive. Others go out to take up again the old life of
immorality, and are dragged away into the meshes of sin, finding their
place, after brief delay, in the wards of a hospital, or sometimes a
suicide's grave. It is a singular fact that the numerical appreciation
of those influenced by this school of reform is precisely the same as
that given in the report of the similar work at Kaiserswerth, although
the two reports have no connection with one another, and one in no wise
supposes the other. Thirty-three years ago one of the founders of the
institution, Pastor Valette, said in answer to a question as to the
amount of good accomplished, "Sixteen years ago this question came to my
ears, and I stated as a principle that one cannot and ought not to
answer it precisely and absolutely, because no one but God can give an
appreciation of its real value. However, out of curiosity, I set myself
at work to gather and register some results; and, matured by the
experience of six years, I offer them, such as they are: One third of
the moral results may be considered excellent; another third as offering
good guarantees, and a final third has no value. It seems to me,
however, as I am sure it will seem to you, that here is cause for
rejoicing. Here is something for which to praise the Lord, and to
encourage those who administer our affairs. For, I ask of the merchants
who listen to me, if any one were to offer you thirty-three and one
third per cent. assured, with the hope of a dividend, would you refuse
the investment?"

In 1871 an occurrence took place worthy of being recorded. On April 13,
at ten o'clock in the evening, emissaries of the Commune entered the
house, revolvers in hand. Armed men were posted at all the entrances.
The deaconesses were summoned to one of the parlors, and held prisoners
until three o'clock the following morning. Meanwhile an investigation
took place among the girls in the penitentiary, as they would be the
most likely of any of the inmates of the house to have complaints. The
officers of the Commune interrogated them closely. Their answers were
favorable beyond all expectation. "Are you happy here?" "Oh, yes, very
happy." "What have you done deserving punishment?" "Nothing that we need
talk to you about." "How are you punished here?" "The sisters don't
punish us; they advise us what to do, and warn us." "Now," said the
chief to one, "just tell me quietly, no one else need hear; if you are
not contented I will take you away with me." "What a coward you are,"
she answered, quite scornfully. Not one of them thought of escaping. All
this time the prison wagon had been waiting in the street, and would
have been filled with deaconesses had the slightest cause of complaint
been found; but it went away empty. Later the sisters had occasion to go
to the head-quarters of the Commune in their ward, and they met with
polite consideration. This is not the only experience of the troubled
political life of the great city that the deaconesses have had. The
Faubourg St. Antoine has been noted ever since the time of the Fronde as
being the haunt of all that is turbulent and revolutionary. In February
1848, a great barricade was thrown across the Rue de Reuilly, men,
women, and children hurrying with bricks and stones to help in building
it. Then came the moment of storm and attack, and forty-two men lay dead
in the street. Some of the wounded were received by the sisters, crowded
as they were with the children whom the mothers had brought for safety.
Meanwhile the deaconesses went about unmolested, bought food and
medicine, hunted friends and relatives for the sick, and through all
that period of excitement and strife kept up their ministrations of
mercy.

There is no distinct home for women who are left alone and desire
Christian surroundings, as is the case in several German institutions,
but about sixty such ladies are received as boarders in the Paris home.
Frequently also the hospitality of the house is enjoyed by young girls
who come to Paris alone to earn a livelihood, or who have to stop here
for some hours on their way to another place; a great advantage for
inexperienced young women, unversed in the ways of a city, who find
themselves alone in the great world for the first time.

The preparatory school for deaconesses is on the first floor, below the
rooms of the sisters. For two years the candidates are under the
instruction of superior sisters. They are received into the house
gratuitously, and accept its regulations while they remain. They have to
pass through all practical duties of house-work, and care of the sick
and children. They also pursue practical and theoretical courses in
hygiene, and receive lessons in singing and pedagogics. The chaplains of
the institution give them courses of religious instruction, and lectures
on Church history. Some (the larger number) need very elementary
lessons; others come with a good education. Each is directed according
to her education and experience. In fact, all classes are represented
among the deaconesses; servants, teachers, ladies, and shepherdesses.
They come from different parts of France, but in larger numbers from the
South.

Deaconesses are constantly in demand to go out in the city as nurses in
private families. Such requests often meet with refusals, because
sisters cannot be spared for such duties. Their work is limited by the
smallness of their numbers. The last report gives sixty deaconesses
attached to the Home on the Rue de Reuilly.

The work is upon sterile soil as compared to Germany. The Protestants of
France are in a small minority, surrounded by an overwhelming majority
of Catholics; while in the beginning of the work some influential
members of the Protestant faith, having an inadequate comprehension of
the good in the movement, and a misconception of its plans, exerted a
powerful influence that for awhile told adversely to the cause. The home
has now passed beyond the stage when it can be affected by adverse
criticisms; and it to-day not only has the approbation of Christians,
but also of those who regard it solely from the point of view of
philanthropy.[51]

There are but two parish deaconesses who are at work in Belleville and
Ste. Marie. The directors of the institution would be glad to increase
the number, as they regard the work of the sisters under the direction
of the city pastors as that which presents the widest opportunities for
doing good, while it perpetuates those aspects of the deaconess work
which most closely resemble those of the early Church. But Calvin's
reply from Geneva to the Church of France is theirs. When petitioned to
send more pastors over the boundary into France he replied, "Send us
wood and we will send you arrows." So the want of deaconesses is a
continual hinderance to the furtherance of the cause, both in the city
and the provinces.

The prisons for women in France are under the supervision of women, save
the office of chief director, which is filled by a man. The great
majority of the prisoners in France being Catholics, the number of
Sisters of Charity is naturally much larger than the number of
deaconesses employed. At the prison of Clermont four of the Paris
deaconesses are kept constantly at work among the prisoners.

In connection with the old prison of St. Lazare, the women's prison of
Paris, the deaconesses have a mission especially concerned with caring
for discharged female convicts. As was the case at Kaiserswerth, this,
in its initiation, is closely connected with the saintly life of
Elizabeth Fry. When she came to Paris, in 1835, a drawing-room meeting
was held at the residence of the Duchess de Broglie, in which she told
of her efforts to effect a reform in prisons in England. None of the
ladies of rank and wealth who heard her were stirred to greater effort
than was demanded by the keen interest with which they listened to her
words; but a quiet governess was present, Mademoiselle Dumas, and with
her the seeds of truth fell into prepared ground. She determined to
attempt for her own country a portion of the work Mrs. Fry had
accomplished for England. Obtaining permission from the authorities to
visit the prison of St. Lazare, she went daily to the prisoners shut up
in the rooms of this great building, formerly the monastery of St.
Vincent de Paul, the founder of the Sisters of Charity. After the
deaconess home was established, some deaconesses were set apart to aid
Mademoiselle Dumas in her work. All these years the mission has
continued, not interrupted even during the dark days of the Commune. A
committee of ladies aids in providing shelter and work for the prisoners
when they are discharged. The great publishing house of Hachette & Co.,
although the head of the firm is a Catholic, provides employment in
folding paper for books.

Through the kind offices of Mademoiselle Monod we called on Mademoiselle
Dumas. She is now an extremely aged woman; but her interest in the
Christian reformation of prisoners of her sex is as keen as it was over
fifty years ago, when her labors began. The registers of many years
stand by her desk, and from these we were shown how the records of the
mission are kept, and in what way the lives of those assisted are
watched and followed for years. Narratives of individual reformation
were related to us, and through the long correspondence of many years
she was enabled to tell us of those who had turned to a better life and
held to it permanently. As she talked her eyes brightened, the tones of
her voice became stronger and clearer, her manner more vivacious, and
the years seemed to slip from her. Finally, as if overcome by the
memories that the long retrospect had brought to her, and thrilled by
the recollections, of all this work meant to her, she ended by
exclaiming, "O, my dear St. Lazare!" I looked at her astonished. I had
just come from the walls of the gloomy prison, and the place had chilled
me with horror as I walked through its corridors, and read the stories
of shame and guilt in the faces of its inmates; most hopeless looking
faces, belonging to little children of ten and twelve up to hardened and
prematurely aged women of fifty and sixty. I could not comprehend a term
of endearment applied to such a place. But a moment's consideration led
me to see that this aged saint had there fought and won the best of her
life's battles, and the place remains glorified in her thoughts by most
hallowed and Christ-like memories.

Now that Mademoiselle Dumas is kept to her room, the deaconesses still
come to her weekly, make their reports, and keep up the proper entries
in her books.

A recent letter from Mademoiselle Monod says: "Mademoiselle Dumas still
lives, having completed her ninety-sixth year the 26th of last December
(1888). Only yesterday our prison committee met at her house, she acting
as presiding officer."

The life of this quiet woman is but little known outside the circle of
her immediate influence, but it has been more valuable to her country
than that of many a general or statesman who has been ranked among the
famous of the earth.

The deaconess home has also branches of work in different parts of
France. These include nine hospitals, two homes for the aged and infirm,
four orphanages, two work-rooms for young girls, and a convalescents'
home. The house has established close connection with the deaconess
houses at St. Loup in French Switzerland, and with Strasburg. The ties
of a common language and former memories are strong, and these are the
homes most akin to the Paris home.

The ordinary expenses of the Paris deaconess home are about thirty
thousand dollars a year. Nearly seven thousand dollars are collected
annually by subscriptions, the remaining sum being made up of returns
arising from service.

The institution was founded in 1841 by Rev. Antoine Vermeil, a
distinguished minister of the Reformed Church, aided by a devout and
worthy minister of the Lutheran Church, Rev. Louis Valette. It has grown
up under the joint and harmonious patronage of these two State Churches.

A later deaconess home, entirely devoted to training and employing
parish deaconesses, was started in 1874, under the sole control of the
Lutheran Church. Some pastors secured the co-operation of a few young
Christian women to consecrate a portion of their strength and time to
the service of the Church. From this beginning sprang the work that
exists to-day. The home is located in the Rue de Bridaine. There are now
sixteen deaconesses, six of whom are probationers. Five of them are
located in different parishes in Paris, usually at a long distance from
the central house. Each goes forth early in the morning to her parish,
where is a room of some kind serving as a center to the work. Materials
used in nursing and medicines are stored here, and there is an office
for the physician, who comes at stated periods to give free
consultation. From the district house the deaconess goes in all
directions and in all weather to look up families which have fallen away
from the Church, to gather in children for the Sunday-school, to visit
the sick, and to collect garments and money from the rich in order to
distribute them among the poor. Such are some of their duties. Each
sister is under the direction of a pastor, and is aided by his advice,
while still remaining a member of the community to which she belongs.

In both of the deaconess houses of Paris, as in the German houses, a
special service sets apart those sisters who have passed their period of
probation, and have been received into full connection. As one of the
deaconess reports beautifully says: "When Christ calls the soul to a
special vocation he gives it special grace, and those who consecrate
themselves to him he consecrates to their task by the strength of his
Spirit. So in conformity with the usages of the primitive Church we give
consecration to our sisters by the laying on of hands. The consecration
is not a sacramental act, conferring a particular character, greater
sanctity, or special powers; neither is it simply a ceremony or pious
formality. It is a real and efficacious benediction, which the Saviour
accords to our sisters to consecrate them to their holy work, as he
accorded it to the deacons who received the imposition of the apostles'
hands."

The good that can be accomplished by deaconesses working together with
ministers in behalf of the manifold interests of the Church is
incalculable. The most faithful pastor can make only short and
unsatisfactory visits. Many sorrows which he overlooks the deaconess can
discern and assuage. She knows best how to reach the heart of a
sorrowing woman, to care for her needs, to discern her wants, and to
bring solace to the sorrowing and succor to the needy. Deaconesses who
have been specially trained for service cannot be spared now that the
world has learned to know of them. For "charity cannot take the place of
experience, nor good-will replace knowledge;" and trained Christian
service is the highest of all service.

The old spirit of the Huguenots has not died out of France, and with
that ready susceptibility to noble ideas which is a marked
characteristic of the French character, we can expect to see the
deaconess cause thrive and prosper as it has done in other lands.


  [50] Speak to God about the little ones, rather than to the little
       souls of God.
  [51] See a sympathetic study of the work by Maxime du Camp, a
       member of the French Academy, in his book _Paris Bienfaisant_.




CHAPTER X.

DEACONESSES IN ENGLAND.


To learn the first facts about deaconesses in England, we must go back
to the early days of the Puritans. In 1576, under Queen Elizabeth, about
sixty non-conformist ministers of the eastern counties assembled to make
regulations concerning Church constitution and discipline, and one of
them was as follows: "Touching deacons of both sorts, namely, both men
and women, the Church should be admonished what is required by the
apostle, that they are not to choose men by custom or course, or for
their riches, but for their faith, zeal, and integrity; and that the
Church is to pray in the meantime to be so directed that they may choose
them that are meet. Let the names of those that are thus chosen be
published the next Lord's Day, and after that their duties to the
Church, and the Church's duty toward them. Then let them be received
into their office with the general prayers of the whole Church."[52]

There are other references in the works of the early Puritans that
indicate that the office of deaconess was as well known and recognized
as were the other offices that were named in accordance with the usages
of the primitive Church.

In the early part of the seventeenth century it still survived, as we
shall see from a quaint and curious picture that is of especial interest
to all Americans, because it portrays what took place in that community
of pious souls who furnished us the men we delight to honor as the
Pilgrim Fathers. A number of these heroic souls, who could give up their
country, but would not yield their faith, went forth from England in
1608, and settled in Amsterdam. They preserved in a foreign land their
own Church usages, as the following words show: "In Amsterdam there were
about three hundred communicants, and they had for their pastor and
teacher those two eminent men before named (Johnson and Ainsworth); and
had at one time four grave men for ruling elders, three able, godly men
for deacons, and one ancient widow for a deaconess, who did them service
many years, though she was sixty years of age when she was chosen. She
honored her place, and was an ornament to the congregation. She usually
sat in a convenient place in the congregation, with a little birchen rod
in her hand, and kept little children in awe from disturbing the
congregation. She did frequently visit the sick and weak, especially
women, and as there was need called out ladies and young women to watch
and do them other helps as their necessity should require; and if there
were poor she would gather relief for them of those that were able, or
acquaint the deacons. And she was obeyed as a mother in Israel and an
officer of Christ."[53]

Whether the "ancient widow" with the little "birchen rod" had any
followers in the early Puritan communities of the Plymouth Colony we
cannot say, as there are no records that throw light on the subject; but
the history of early New England Congregationalism gives us one
indication that the office was recognized in the New World. In the
Cambridge Platform, a system of Church discipline agreed upon by the
elders and messengers of the New England churches assembled in synod at
Cambridge, in 1648, the seventh chapter enumerates the duties of elder
and deacons, and then adds, "The Lord hath appointed _ancient widdows_,
where they may be had, to minister in the Church, in giving attendance
to the sick, and to give succor unto them and others in the like
necessities." The same confusion of thought concerning the Church widow
and the deaconess is here seen, but there is evident the recognition of
the services that women were officially to render the Church.

In the early part of the present century Southey voiced the complaint,
long reiterated, that Protestantism had no missionaries. We who live in
the closing years of the same century, surrounded by the multiplied
evidences of the extent of missions, when the Protestants of the world
are expending nearly ten millions of dollars annually, and employing
nearly six thousand men and women as missionaries, cannot realize the
change that has taken place. In 1830 Southey again wrote: "Thirty years
hence another reproach may also be effaced, and England may have her
Sisters of Charity." He had learned to know their value when serving as
a volunteer in Wellington's army, and a year after the battle of
Waterloo he had visited the Béguines at Ghent, and what he saw deeply
impressed him. "We should have such women among us," he said. "It is a
great loss to England that we have no Sisters of Charity. There is
nothing Romish, nothing unevangelical in such communities; nothing but
what is right and holy; nothing but what belongs to that religion which
the apostle James has described as 'pure and undefiled before God the
Father.'"[54]

Southey's prophecy has come true. England to-day in her deaconesses
possesses her Sisters of Charity. How has this change been brought
about? The acquaintance of Mrs. Fry with Fliedner, and her visit to
Kaiserswerth, led her to introduce into England the practical training
of nurses for the sick. The Nursing Sisters' Institution in Devonshire
Square, Bishop's Gate, was founded through her efforts in 1840, and
still exists "to train nurses for private families, and to provide
pensions for aged nurses."[55]

In 1842, Fliedner came to London, accompanied by four sisters, at the
invitation of the German Hospital at Dalston. These deaconesses won
golden opinions from the hospital authorities for their quiet, efficient
manner, and their trained skill. The hospital continues to be served by
them, but the Sisters now come from the mother house at Darmstadt.

Kaiserswerth and its deaconesses became more widely known through the
life and inestimable services of Florence Nightingale. When a child,
one of Fliedner's reports fell into her hands. Its perusal marked an
era in her life. It made clear to her what she should do. She would go
to Kaiserswerth, and fit herself for a nurse. Her childish resolve never
wavered. "Happy is the man who holds fast to the ideals of his youth."
Florence Nightingale held fast to hers. She went to Kaiserswerth at two
different times, and through her deeds and her writings the care of the
sick in England has been completely transformed. She has won a nation's
gratitude, and now is living in honored old age in one of the London
institutions founded mainly by the money that she contributed, and which
she obtained by selling some valuable gifts given her by a foreign
government in acknowledgment of her care of its wounded soldiers during
the Crimean war.

Another woman distinguished in England's philanthropies is Agnes Jones,
who left a home of wealth and refinement to receive her training also at
Kaiserswerth. Returning to England she gave her time and talents in
single-hearted devotion to the care of the poor in the Liverpool
work-house, and met death in the midst of her labors. The training which
led two such women to accomplish such noble deeds naturally was
recognized as valuable, and Kaiserswerth soon became an honored name in
England.

In 1851 Miss Nightingale sent out anonymously her little book entitled
_An Account of the Institution of Deaconesses_, which added to the
knowledge already in circulation about the movement in Germany.
Meanwhile articles were appearing in the reviews. In 1848 one was
written in the _Edinburgh Review_ by John Malcolm Ludlow, who later, in
1866, gave the results of the thoughts and studies of a number of years
in _Woman's Work in the Church_, the best historical study of the
subject up to the date at which it was written. Since then the Germans
have pushed their historical investigations further, and the work needs
to be revised and to be brought down to the present time.

In _Good Words_ for 1861 there were two articles by Dr. Stevenson, of
the Irish Presbyterian Church, entitled "The Blue Flag of Kaiserswerth,"
afterward incorporated in his work, _Praying and Working_, a book too
little known among us.

The great upholder of the deaconess cause in the Church of England was
the late Dean of Chester, Rev. J. S. Howson. His essay, first published
in the _Quarterly Review_, was amplified and issued in book form in 1860
under the title _Deaconesses_. It won many friends. The cause remained a
favorite one with him, and he constantly advocated it by speech and by
deed. Since his death his latest thoughts, which remained substantially
the same as those that he first advanced, have been published in a work
entitled _The Diaconate of Women_.

Within the Church of England, however, the deaconess cause has not met
the same prosperous development that it has obtained in connection with
certain independent institutions, notably that of Mildmay.

Among the institutions on the Continent, as well as in the pages of this
work up to the present, the terms "sister" and "deaconess" are used
synonymously, to indicate one and the same person. But when we come to
consider the deaconess institutions within the Church of England we
cannot continue to use these two names in the same way. A deaconess is a
member of a deaconess institution, actively engaged in charitable deeds,
but, like the deaconess on the Continent, she can sever her connection
with it when adequate cause presents itself, and return to her family
and friends. A sister belongs to a sisterhood which closely resembles
the Roman Catholic sisterhoods in many features. These sisterhoods began
in 1847 with a number of ladies brought together through the influence
of Dr. Pusey, who formed themselves into a community to live under its
rule. Their influence and number increased, and twenty-three
sisterhoods are mentioned in the last official report.[56]

Doubtless it was the activity and great usefulness of the continental
deaconess houses that provided the stimulating examples which acted on
the Church of England and led to the rise of sisterhoods and deaconess
institutions. But the two opposing tendencies within the Episcopal
Church--namely, that which desires to approach the Church of Rome, with
which it feels itself in sympathy on many points, and that which views
with disfavor any conformity to it, and strives to keep to the landmarks
set at the great Reformation--these two distinct tendencies are closely
reflected in the woman's work of the Anglican Church.[57] The
sisterhoods are distinctly under the fostering care of the former
element, the deaconesses are manifestly favored by the latter.
Sisterhoods, again, differ among themselves, some being strongly
conventual in their life and practice, adopting the three vows of
poverty, chastity, and obedience, and a few even advocating penance and
confession. The vows are taken for life, and, in connection with the
view of the sacred obligation to life-long service, great stress is laid
upon the position of the sister as the "bride of Christ"--the same
thought of the mysterious union with the heavenly Bridegroom that is so
dwelt upon in the nunneries of the Catholic Church. With such views
Protestants, distinctly such, can have no sympathy. Those who look upon
the deaconess as a valuable member of the Church economy do so because
they regard her as a Christian woman, strengthened and disciplined by
special training to do better service for Christ in the world. This is
the recognized difference: "The sisterhood exists primarily for the sake
of forming a religious community, but deaconesses live together for the
sake of the work itself, attracted to deaconess work by the want which
in most populous towns is calling loudly for assistance; and with a view
of being trained, therefore, for spiritual and temporal usefulness among
the poor."[58]

There are now seven deaconess establishments in the Church of England,
each having a larger or smaller number of branches, with diocesan
sanction and under the supervision of clergymen.[59]

The first of these was founded in 1861, and is now known as the London
Diocesan Deaconess Institution. At that time Kaiserswerth was accepted
as its model; deaconesses were sent there to be trained; Kaiserswerth
rules were adopted as far as possible, and a modification of the
Kaiserswerth dress for the sisters. The house was then represented at
the triennial Conferences in Germany, and in the list of mother houses
published at Kaiserswerth[60] the name still appears. It would seem,
however, that now the Kaiserswerth connection is entirely set aside by
the London house, for in an historical sketch of the revival of
deaconesses in the Church, that is found in the organ of the
institution, called _Ancilla Domini_, for March, 1887, there is no
mention made of any of the continental houses. The Anglican Church
apparently dates the entire work from the setting apart of its first
deaconess, Elizabeth C. Ferard, in 1861, as she was the first to receive
consecration through the touch of a bishop's hand. The former connection
with Kaiserswerth and the great work carried on in Germany from 1836 to
the present time are quite ignored.

Besides the London house already mentioned an East London deaconess home
was opened in 1880, to provide deaconesses and church-workers for East
London. Besides the deaconesses and probationers thirty-two associates
are connected with this home. The associates are ladies who do not
intend to become deaconesses, but give as much time as they can to the
work. They live with the deaconesses, conform to the rules, and wear the
garb, but pay their own expenses. These associates are a highly
important part of the working force. They form a valuable tie connecting
the sisters with sources of influence and aid that would otherwise be
closed to them. Nearly always they are ladies of independent means, and
come for longer or shorter periods to relieve the deaconesses, their
zeal often being as great as that of the sisters whose places they take.

Besides these houses there are homes located at Maidstone, Chester,
Bedford, Salisbury, and Portsmouth, in the respective dioceses of
Canterbury, Chester, Ely, Salisbury, and Winchester.

In the home at Portsmouth sisters not only engage in nursing and parish
work, but are also given special training for penitentiary and
out-of-door rescue work. They also have a home for the rescue of
neglected children.

The Salisbury Home is beautifully situated in the quiet cathedral city
of the same name. The house is a picturesque and venerable mansion,
covered with clinging green vines, opening out into a garden which in
olden times belonged to the convent. There is in connection with the
home an institution for training girls for domestic service, supported
by the funds of a charity given for that purpose. The whole service of
the house is done by the girls. They attend upon the deaconesses and the
ladies who board there to receive training in the hospital. Each
deaconess pays for board and lodging while training, and, if able to do
so, when she returns for rest, or a visit to her old home.

In other houses the deaconess is expected to keep her own room in order,
and may have some duties in the house, but servants do the rough work.
The social status of the English deaconesses is, as a rule, markedly
different from the German deaconesses. Here ladies of rank and inherited
social traditions, of refinement, of accomplishments, and of education,
many of them women of means, defraying their entire expenses and often
those of their poorer sisters, are largely represented among the
deaconesses. On the other hand, the German deaconesses, as we have seen,
are largely of that station in life that furnishes many for domestic
service. Although of course there are among them women of all ranks and
all degrees of education, still such women form the larger number; and
the conditions under which Fliedner began the work, as well as the
difference of custom and habit in the two countries, incline the German
houses to maintain the rules of service by which nearly every detail of
domestic service in their institutions is cared for by the deaconesses.
There is more of ceremony and formality in the English deaconess
institutions which are under the direction of the Church of England. At
Salisbury, for instance, the candidate must reside in the home for three
months, that her ability and efficiency may be tested. If accepted, she
then puts on a gray serge habit, a leathern girdle, white cap, black
bonnet, the veil and cloak of a probationer, and is admitted to the
"degree" of a probationer at a special service. The year of probation
having come to an end, she is again presented to the bishop, and is set
apart as a deaconess by the laying on of hands. This time the habit is
changed from gray to blue, and a black ebony cross, with one of gold
inlaid, is hung upon her neck.[61]

This is very different from the way in which Fliedner regarded the dress
and adornment of the deaconesses for whom he was responsible. The king
of Prussia desired to present them with a small silver cross as their
badge of service, but the simple-hearted German pastor dissuaded him,
saying that the deaconesses needed no ornament save a meek and quiet
spirit, and they must avoid symbols which would suggest Romish
imitations.

The Strasburg deaconesses also at first wore a small cross, but Pastor
Härter discontinued it when he found that the wearing of it gave
occasion for complaint.

Yet however we may differ in the lesser details, of garb, of rules, and
of ceremonies, from those accepted by some of the Church of England
deaconess institutions, we can give unstinted admiration to the lives of
self-denial, and active, unceasing efforts in behalf of others, that we
see among their numbers. Take, for instance, the little publication _The
Deaconess_, issued by the East London Home, and notice the undertakings
carried on by the members--district-visiting, nursing of the sick,
mothers' meetings, Sunday-school teaching, Bible classes, and all the
multitudinous ways of meeting the squalor, poverty, ignorance, sickness,
and sin of the poor of the east of London. There is no poetic enthusiasm
that strengthens one for such work, the dirt, the degradation, the
forlorn condition are so trying. The little children so precociously
wicked, so preternaturally cunning, that the natural charm and
attraction of childhood have wholly disappeared; the sights and sounds
that assail the senses; the dulled, hopeless faces, the apathy, the
stunted intellectual growth--these are the depressing influences that
continually beset the deaconesses, and nothing short of God-given
strength and Christ-like enthusiasm can enable these women to devote
six, eight, and ten years of service to this worst city district, and to
come forth with sunshiny, peaceful faces, and sympathetic, loving
hearts.

Taking the total number of deaconess institutions under the Church of
England, there are eighty one deaconesses, thirty-four probationers, and
two hundred and twenty-nine associates.[62]

So far, sisterhoods have proved more attractive to the women of the
Church of England than have deaconess establishments. The latter do not
seem to increase largely in numbers. Vexing questions have arisen as to
how the deaconess should be set apart to her work. Should she be
consecrated by the imposition of the bishop's hands? What relation
should she have to the Church? These questions have been partially
settled by the principles and rules that were drawn up in 1871 and were
signed by the two archbishops and eighteen bishops. They define a
deaconess as "a woman set apart by a bishop, under that title, for
service in the Church;"[63] placing her under the authority of the
bishop of the diocese. These recommendations have not been formally
adopted by the Church of England; they hold good only so far as they are
accepted.

But there are other institutions, lying outside of the boundaries of the
State Church, which have developed more fully and prosperously than
those within it. Of these we must speak first of the institution of
Dr. Laseron, which is more closely connected with Kaiserswerth than any
other in England. In 1855 Dr. Laseron and his wife lost their only
child; and as Mrs. Laseron walked through the streets with burdened
heart she looked at the little children with quickened sympathy, and
noticed how many were poor and hungry and scantily clothed. She talked
with her husband, and they opened a "ragged school" for children. This
increased and branched off, until now there is an orphanage, workhouses
for boys, and a servants' training school for girls. Requests were
frequently made for some of the older girls to act as nurses among the
poor; and, finally, Dr. Laseron, who was a German by birth, determined
to found a deaconess house and hospital. A small hospital of twelve beds
was opened, and proved insufficient to meet the demands; and none could
be accepted as deaconesses, as there was no opportunity to train them in
so small a place. While waiting to see how the house could be enlarged,
he mentioned his perplexity to Mr. Samuel Morley. This gentleman heard
him with interest, and said that he was one of the directors of a large
hospital; that at a recent meeting of the directors a Catholic bishop
had offered to send Sisters of Charity who, without compensation, should
nurse the sick, and he had thought what a fine thing it would be if the
Protestant Church had also its women of piety who could devote
themselves to a similar work. The result of the conversation was that
Mr. Morley contributed forty thousand dollars, with which Dr. Laseron
purchased a site in Tottenham, built a hospital with fifty beds, and a
deaconess was called from Kaiserswerth to superintend it. The hospital
has been again enlarged, so that it now accommodates one hundred
patients. Sixty-four deaconesses are connected with it, who are at
service in the hospitals of Cork, Dublin, Scarborough, and Sunderland.
This institution is unsectarian, and has met with special aid from
non-conformists. It still keeps in close relation to Kaiserswerth, and
is represented at the Conferences. It has constantly thriven, and the
mother-house at Tottenham is a center for various benevolent
enterprises.

In connection with Dr. Barnardo's Orphanage there is also a deaconess
house. Harley House, the missionary training-school under the direction
of Dr. and Mrs. Grattan Guinness in East London, has a deaconess home as
one of its branches. The Kilburn (St. Augustine's) Orphanage of Mercy,
and the London Bible-women's Mission are also centers for the training
and organizing of women's work in London.

We must pause more at length over the prison mission under the care of
Mrs. Meredith. American women are beginning to occupy themselves with
questions of philanthropy and religious activity to an extent not before
equaled. The women's prisons in England are especially fruitful of
suggestions to us, as many here are interested in having our women
prisoners separated in prisons by themselves, as has already been
attempted in a few States. Mrs. Meredith's work is in behalf of the
prisoners after they have served their sentence and are discharged. She
is the daughter of General Lloyd, who was formerly governor-general of
prisons in Ireland. As a little child she was accustomed to go about
with her father, and the interior of prisons became familiar to her.
Later in life, when her family ties were broken, and her hands left free
for service, her interest was engaged in behalf of the women convicts
who were discharged from prison. She enlisted the support of other
ladies of like views, able to assist her, and in 1866 the Prison Gate
Mission began, which has continued to the present day. Every morning, as
the gate of Millbank prison swings back to allow those who have been
released from penal bondage to come forth, a sister stands waiting to
invite those who will go with her to a room near by, where breakfast
awaits them; there are ladies to inquire about their plans and to offer
them work. A great laundry was opened in 1867 to provide employment for
these women. Here washing is done for two classes: for the poor and
sick, to whom the service is given as a charity, and to those who pay
for the work and whose money enables the mission to be partly
self-supporting. Then the ladies extended their plans to take in the
children of the prisoners. A law was passed by Parliament which enabled
Mrs. Meredith and her associates to have the care of those children at
the Princess Mary Village Home until they are sixteen years of age. This
home was founded at Addlestone in 1870, and was named after the Princess
Mary, Duchess of Teck, who aided in obtaining funds to build it. The
institution takes not only the female children of criminal mothers, but
also little girls who are likely to drift into a career of crime. It is
conducted on the cottage plan, each little house having ten inmates and
a house mother to superintend it, and being complete in its own
arrangements. There are eighteen cottages, a large, generous
school-room, a small infirmary for the sick, and a little church. About
two hundred children of criminals and the unfortunate class are here
cared for. Instead of allowing them to drift away and to perpetuate
vice, crime, and immorality, they are taken entirely from their old
surroundings, and new influences of knowledge and purity are thrown
about them. There is no part of Mrs. Meredith's mission which has such
hope for the future and is so valuable in results as this preventive
work among the children.

There are also a woman's medical mission (1882), a Christian woman's
union, a girls' school, and a deaconess house in Jerusalem under the
control of the same association. How it arose is well intimated by the
following extract from a letter from Mrs. Meredith to the author, dated
March 9, 1889: "You will know that my course has been progressive with
regard to the mode of congregating the women who joined me in working.
At first we merely came together daily from our own homes, as those who
make a business concern do. Then to spare time and money we began to
live together. The next step was to admit useful and devoted women who
had no property, and to form an association with degrees of membership.
When we found ourselves becoming a corporation of importance, and having
combined to acquire property and to found institutions, we invited the
help and counsel of some men of known eminence. Our institutions are all
branches of a parent stock, and are now placed in the charge of these
good men, and we have taken the name of the Church of England Woman's
Missionary Association. I am daily persuaded of the value of such
organizations."

In connection with the London West Central Mission there is an
association of ladies called the Sisters of the People. "They are
expected to be worthy of the beautiful name they bear. They are true
sisters of the unprivileged and the disheartened; as ready to make a
bed, cook a dinner, or nurse a baby as to minister to the higher need of
the immortal spirit. The sisters live together in the neighborhood of
their work, and wear a distinctive dress as a protection and for other
reasons; but they take no vows, and are at liberty to withdraw from the
mission at any time. Their work is directed by Mrs. Hughes. Katherine
House, the residence of the Sisters of the People, was opened early in
November, 1887, and from that day the work of the sisters dates its
commencement. Their daily labors are very similar to those of the
deaconesses of Mildmay, who work among the London parishes. Each sister
has a district allotted to her, which she visits regularly and
systematically. The first object which she sets before herself is to get
to know the people, and to make them feel that she is their true sister
and friend, irrespective of the fact that they are themselves good or
bad, respectable or degraded. When once true friendliness is
established, the way is opened for direct religious influence; and many,
who in the first instance would never pay any attention to religion,
will listen to an appeal from one whom they love and respect."[64]

Katherine House accommodates twelve sisters. A second house is urgently
needed, and a strong plea is made for it in the Report.

There are besides "out sisters," who work with the sisters but reside at
their own homes. This is a valuable feature of this mission, as it
interests ladies who are living in their own homes, and yet who can be
very useful to those who devote their whole work to the sisters' labor.
In the Report a great many instances are given which show what an
intimate knowledge of the poor people is obtained by these sisters, and
in what practical ways they minister to the bodily and spiritual needs
of those whom they find in their house-to-house visitations. The term
"sister," as it is used in the report of the London West Central
Mission, is in all respects a synonym for "deaconess," as the name is
understood in the large deaconess establishment at Mildmay. To the study
of this we shall devote the following chapter.


  [52] Daniel Neal's _History of the Puritans_, London, 1703, vol. i,
       pp. 344-346.
  [53] _Chronicles of the Pilgrim Fathers of the Colony of Plymouth,
       from 1602 to 1625._ By Alex. Young. Second edition. Boston:
       C. E. Little & J. Brown, 1844, pp. 455, 456.
  [54] Schäfer, _Die Weibliche Diakonie_, vol. i, p. 207.
  [55] _The Royal Guide to London Churches_ for 1866, 1867. By Herbert
       Fry, p. 162.
  [56] _Official Year-book of the Church of England_, 1889.
  [57] _Andover Review_, June, 1888, art., "European Deaconesses,"
       p. 578.
  [58] _Deaconesses in the Church of England._ Griffith & Farran:
       London, 1880, p. 22.
  [59] _Official Year-book of the Church of England_, 1889.
  [60] _Armen und Kranken Freund_, October, 1888.
  [61] "Deaconess Work in England," _The Churchman_, May 19, 1888.
  [62] I am indebted to the kindness of the Rt. Rev. the Bishop of
       Wakefield for these numbers, upon whom the mantle of Dean Howson
       seems to have fallen in caring for the deaconess cause.
  [63] _London Diocesan Deaconess District Services._
  [64] _First Annual Report of the London West Central Mission_,
       pp. 14-42.




CHAPTER XI.

MILDMAY INSTITUTIONS.


Valuable suggestions will be obtained from the study of every successful
deaconess institution, and none will perhaps furnish more practical
models for American Methodism than does the establishment at Mildmay
Park in North London. Its methods of work are flexible, and allow place
for a diversity of talent among the workers, while a wide variety of
charitable and evangelistic effort is undertaken. These two causes give
a breadth and vigor to the work at Mildmay that impress every one who
has knowledge of it.

Whenever we find a good cause carried on successfully and prosperously,
we know that behind it there must be a strong man or woman who has
"thought and wrought" to good purpose. So the first question that arises
in the mind of the visitor who for the first time forms one of the
audience in the great Conference Hall, or looks about in the adjoining
building to see the deaconess home, is, "Who first thought this out? Who
was the founder of this wonderful mission?" And the answer tells us
that Mildmay originated, as did Kaiserswerth, in the prayerful
determination of a Christian minister and his wife to reach out to every
good end that God's spirit of enlightenment could suggest to them. Rev.
William Pennefather was rector of Christ's Church at Barnet, and while
devoted to his ministerial duties his sympathies did not end with his
own people, nor his own denomination. His home was sometimes called the
"Missing Link," for it was a meeting-place for noblemen and farmers,
bishops and clergymen of all churches; a place "where nationalities and
denominations were easily merged in the broad sunshine of Christian
love."[65] He carried his principle of Christian fellowship further,
for, after mature deliberation, in 1856, he issued a call for a
conference to be held at Barnet whose object was "to bring into closer
social communion the members of various Churches, as children of the one
Father, animated by the same life, and heirs together of the same
glory."[66] These conferences have been continued from then to the
present time, and are known and prized in many lands. I was present at
the conference of 1888, and representatives were there from nearly
every Protestant country, while on the platform were leaders of nearly
every Protestant denomination, furnishing a wonderful illustration of
the union of the Christian Church in Christ; a spiritual union so real
and eternal that the minor differences of faith were swallowed up in the
great fact that in Christ Jesus all are one.

Gradually a variety of missionary and evangelistic agencies grew up
about the conferences. In 1860 the little Home was opened at Barnet
which subsequently developed into the deaconess house at Mildmay Park.
The question of calling into more active exercise the energies of
educated Christian women, as we have seen in the preceding chapter, was
one that was attracting attention at the time in England. Mr. and Mrs.
Pennefather had long desired to do something in this direction, and
their desire took this practical form. In its beginning it had to battle
with all the "definite and indefinite objections" that could be advanced
against any attempt at organizing woman's work. But those days of latent
suspicion or more open antagonism are long past. The institution has
justified its right to be by doing a work that otherwise would have
remained undone.

In 1864 Mr. Pennefather was called to St. Jude's, Mildmay Park, and the
philanthropic and religious undertakings which he had begun were
transferred to his new home. He took with him the "iron room" that had
been erected for the conferences at Barnet, and continued to use it for
the same purposes at Mildmay; while the missionary training-school and
home were accommodated in a house which he hired for the purpose.

His new parish was in a part of London where poverty and want abounded.
There was no adequate provision for the education of the poor and
neglected children, so he erected a building where elementary
instruction could be given at a very low price. A soup-kitchen was
started at the iron room: clubs of various kinds were formed, and other
agencies were set at work, both for the temporal and spiritual welfare
of the people. The degraded and miserable neighborhood gradually
underwent a transformation, and the police testified that there was a
manifest restraint on the lawless locality. "To many of the waifs of
life no human hand was stretched in kindness until he came to the
district and taught them what Christianity was."[67]

A small legacy coming to him, he bought a house with a large garden
attached, and made it a mission center for the needs of the infirm and
aged; while the ignorant and careless, who would not enter a church,
were often induced to attend meetings here.

The training-school had been started at Barnet for the purpose of
training foreign missionaries; but Mr. Pennefather now saw that there
was as great a demand for home mission workers in the sorrowful and
benighted portions of the vast metropolis, so, after much deliberation
and consultation between himself and his wife, he decided to initiate
the ministry of Christian women as deaconesses. He hesitated about the
name to be given to the women whom he employed as Christian workers, but
no other was suggested conveying the same idea of service to Christ
among his suffering and needy ones, and, as the appellation had already
won respect through the good reports of the deaconess houses on the
Continent, he decided to adopt the same name. They continued to work in
his parish only until the terrible visitation of the cholera in 1866.
Then when men were swept into eternity by hundreds, and hundreds more
were in dire distress, the deaconesses were invited by the minister of
another parish to come to his assistance. In this way the bounds of the
work began to enlarge. A small hospital was added to the home and a
medical-school mission was begun.

It now became necessary to build a large hall; the iron room was too
small for the conferences, the church too small for the congregation,
and the missions had outgrown the capacity of the mission room. When the
plan for a new building was made known money came in unsolicited from
various sources. The undertaking was pushed rapidly forward, and in
October, 1870, the hall was opened. It will seat 2,500 people, having a
platform at the west end, and a gallery running around the sides and
east end.

Thanksgiving and prayer were built into the walls from the very
foundation; and before the basement rooms were cleared of rubbish, or
the floor laid, a prayer-meeting was held to ask for a blessing upon the
future undertakings of the mission. The basement was divided into five
rooms, to be used for night-schools and other agencies for the benefit
of the poor.

Adjoining the hall, at the west end, was built the deaconess house. From
his home near by Mr. Pennefather had watched the completion of the work
with great interest. In one of his letters he says:[68] "Sometimes I can
scarcely believe that it is a reality, and not all a dream--the
Conference Hall, with its appendages, and the deaconess house actually
in existence. May the Holy Spirit fill the place, and may he make it a
center from whence the living waters shall flow forth."

From a letter written to one of these deaconesses, we gain his opinion
as to the need of deaconesses, and what was his ideal of a Home.[69]
"The need for such an institution is great indeed. I do not suppose
there was ever a time in the history of Christianity in which the
openings for holy, disciplined, intelligent women to labor in God's
vineyard were so numerous as at present. The population in towns and
rural districts are waiting for the patient and enduring love that
dwells in the breast of a truly pious woman, to wake them up to thought
and feeling. O! if I had the women and had the means, how gladly would I
send out hundreds, two by two, to carry the river of truth into the
hamlets of our country, and the streets and lanes of our great cities.
Will you pray for the Home? Ask for women and for means. I want our Home
to be such a place of holy, peaceful memories that, when you leave it,
it may be among the brightest things that come to your mind in a distant
land, or in a different position; and each inmate can help to make it
what it should be." But Mr. Pennefather did not live to see the great
extension in usefulness and importance that the Deaconess Home was to
obtain in later years. He passed away from life April 28, 1873, leaving
to his wife, who had ever been his sympathetic and devoted helper, the
care of continuing the work he had begun. She is still the head of the
Mildmay Institutions, assisted by a resident superintendent, and aided
by the counsels of wise, experienced men, who form the board of
trustees.

From the beginning of the erection of the new building every portion of
it was put to use. In one of the basement rooms is the invalid kitchen,
where, daily, puddings, jellies, and little delicacies are prepared and
sent out to sufferers in the neighborhood, who could not otherwise
obtain suitable nourishment. From eleven to two o'clock tickets are
brought in, which have been distributed by the sisters or by the
district visitors; and those who come to take the dinners, while waiting
their turn, have a kind word, or sympathetic inquiry about the sick one,
from the deaconess in charge.

A flower mission occupies another room. Kind friends send here treasures
from the garden and green-house, field and wood, and children contribute
bouquets of wild flowers. A deaconess superintends the willing hands
that tie the bunches, each of which is adorned with a brightly colored
Scripture text. Ten hospitals and infirmaries were regularly visited
during 1888; and more than thirty-eight thousand bunches of flowers were
distributed, each accompanied by an appropriate text.

Near at hand is the Dorcas room, where deaconesses are kept busy in
cutting out clothing and superintending the sewing classes. During the
winter of 1887 thirty widows attended this class three times a week,
glad to earn a sixpence by needlework done in a warm, lighted room,
while a deaconess entertained them by reading aloud. A large amount of
sewing is given out from the same room, and the garments that are made
are often sold to the poor at a low price. A most impressive scene is
witnessed during the winter months, when, on three evenings of the week,
all the basement rooms are crowded with the men's night-school, which
has, it is believed, no rival in England. The ordinary number of names
on the books exceeds twelve hundred. There are forty-nine classes, all
taught by ladies, the majority of them being deaconesses. The subjects
range from the elementary to the higher branches of general and
practical knowledge, including arithmetic, geography, geometry, freehand
drawing, and short-hand. The Bible is read in the classes on Monday and
Friday, and a scriptural address is given by some gentleman on
Wednesday. The school always closes with prayer and singing. The men
may purchase coffee and bread and butter before leaving, and of this
they largely avail themselves. A lending library is also attached to the
school. The highest attendance during last session was five hundred and
eighty-one, the lowest two hundred and eighty-seven.

The influence of this school is very great, and many pass on from it to
the men's Bible-class, which is held on Sunday afternoons in the largest
basement room.[70]

A servants' registry is attached to the deaconess house, and through its
means about four hundred servants are annually provided with places.

Nearly fifty deaconesses make their home at this central house, many of
them having work in the different parts of the city, perhaps at remote
distances, but returning at night to the home-like surroundings and
purer air of the central house. The large sitting-room, the common
living-room of the deaconesses, is a charming place. It is of great
size, but made cheerful and attractive by pictures, flowers, and bright
and tasteful decorations that are restful to the eyes. Both Mr. and Mrs.
Pennefather made it a principle of action to have the home life
cheerful, pleasant, and attractive, so that when the sisters come in
toward evening, tired physically, and mentally depressed and exhausted
by the long strain of hearing tales of misery, and seeing sights of
wretchedness and squalor the day through, they could be cheered not only
by the words of sympathy and love of their associates, but by the
silent, restful influences of their surroundings.

As I looked around the great room with deep-set windows, brightened by
flowers, and still more by the happy faces of the deaconesses, some of
whom were young girls with the charms of happy girlhood set off by the
plain, black dress and wide white collar of the deaconess garb, I could
but think the founders wise in arranging such pleasant, home-like
surroundings for their workers.

From the windows you look down into a beautiful garden, a rare luxury
for a London dwelling. This garden was among the later accessions of Mr.
Pennefather, being purchased by him shortly before his death. A train of
circumstances led to its possession which he regarded as markedly
providential; and the delightful uses to which "that blessed garden," as
it has been called, has since been put, seem to justify the importance
he attached to securing it. During the conference times great tents are
reared here for the refreshments which the weary body needs. A fine old
mulberry tree extends its branches, and under its ample shade meetings
of one kind or another are held at all hours of the day. The lawn, with
its quiet, shady walks, furnished with comfortable garden seats,
provides a meeting place for friends, where, in the intervals between
the services, those who perhaps never see each other during any of the
other fifty-one weeks of the year may walk or sit together. "Here in
more ordinary times may be seen the children of the Orphanage (where
thirty-six girls form a happy, busy family) playing together, or the
deaconesses in their becoming little white caps, who have run out for a
breath of air. Here, too, during the summer, a succession of tea-parties
is held for the different classes which have been reached by the
deaconesses in the more densely populated parts of London, to whom the
garden is a very paradise."[71]

Before leaving the Central Deaconess Home I must speak of one branch of
work--the artistic illustration of Scripture texts--because it so
illustrates the happy freedom and wisdom of the Mildmay methods, which
seek to develop the strength of each sister in the line of her special
aptitudes. Two of the deaconesses have marked ability as artists, and
they devote their time to illuminating texts and adorning Christmas and
Easter cards with rare and exquisite designs. From the sale of these
illuminations over five thousand dollars were realized last year for the
benefit of the institution.

The Conference Hall, too, should have a further word of recommendation
for the truly catholic spirit in which it serves the interests of a
myriad of good causes. Besides the crowded meetings of the conference
there are held Sunday services throughout the year. The hospitality of
its rooms is readily granted to every good cause with which the mission
has sympathy. During 1887 "temperance society meetings, railway men and
their wives, Moravian missions, Pastor Bost's mission at La Force, the
MacAll Paris missions, the Sunday closing movement, young men's and
young women's Christian associations, a Christian police association,
the Children's Special Service mission, the Christmas Letter mission,
Bible readings for German residents, and various other foreign and home
missions have all in turn been advocated here."[72]

The larger number of the deaconesses at the central house, as well as
the twenty-five at the branch house in South London, are employed in
twenty-one London parishes, where their work has been sought by the
clergymen; they go to all, undertaking every kind of labor that can
give them access to the hearts and homes of the people. While
co-operating with the clergyman in charge of a parish their work is
superintended from the Deaconess Home. They visit from house to house
among the sick and poor, hold mothers' meetings, teach night-schools,
hold Bible-classes separately for men, women, and children; hold special
classes for working women and girls who are kept busily employed during
the day, and during the winter months have a weekly average of more than
nine thousand attendants on their services. They are solving the problem
of "how to save the masses" by resolving the masses into individuals,
and then influencing these individuals by the power of personal effort
and love.

But a few steps from Conference Hall is the Nursing Home, where about
one hundred "nurse sisters," nurses, and probationers make their home in
the intervals between their duties, and are presided over by a lady
superintendent of their own. Adjoining is the Cottage Hospital, a
beautiful building, the gift of a lady in memory of her son. The walls
have been painted and decorated throughout by some ladies who delight in
using their skill to make beautiful the homes of the sick.

A large hospital and medical mission also exist in Bethnal Green, a
densely populated part of London that in some portions can vie with the
worst slums of the city. It was so necessary to provide better
accommodations for nursing the sufferers than could be found in their
poor homes that a warehouse was fitted up with beds and transformed into
a small hospital. In 1887 four hundred and thirteen patients were
received at the hospital, and in the dispensary for outside patients
sixteen thousand four hundred and eighteen visits were paid during the
year, nearly two thirds of which number were to patients in their own
houses. There is no place in which a hospital could be more sorely
needed than in this destitute part of London, and perhaps no place where
it could be more appreciated. "I had no idea," said a man of the better
class who was brought in, "of there being such a place as this; you give
as much attention to the poorest man you get out of the street as could
be given to a prince."[73]

Every Christmas some kind of an entertainment is arranged for the
hospital patients, and, through the gift of friends, articles of warm
clothing are distributed to protect against the winter's cold.

A variety of mission work is carried on in connection with Bethnal
Green. There is a Men's Institute, open every evening except Sunday and
Monday, in connection with which is a savings' bank that is well
patronized. There is a Lads' Institute, where the deaconesses have
classes and meet the boys in a friendly way; a men's lodging-house,
where a comfortable bed and shelter can be had for eight cents a night.
The latter is an enterprise which could be imitated with profit in all
our large American cities, where it is very difficult for the homeless
and poverty-stricken to obtain a decent lodging, or to find any place,
in fact, where liquor is not sold. There are also evangelistic services
in the mission here, Sunday-schools, Bible-classes, temperance meetings,
a soup kitchen, and a coffee bar, where, during Christmas week, between
four and five hundred men and boys were given light refreshments, and at
the same time some idea of the kindliness and good-will that are
associated with this happy season of the year.

There are also two convalescent homes, one at Barnet and one at
Brighton. The home at Brighton is especially designed for the poor
patients of the East End mission. The report for the year ending
December 31, 1887, says that five hundred and fifty men, women, and
children enjoyed its benefits for a fortnight or longer.[74]

Mildmay nurse deaconesses have also charge of the Doncaster General
Infirmary, the Nurses' Institute at Malta, and the Medical Mission
Hospital at Jaffa, where two hundred and nineteen patients were received
the last year, of whom one hundred and seventy-five were Moslems.

There also exists under the supervision of Mildmay workers a railway
mission that was begun in 1880 for men on duty at two of the London
stations. An organized mission has sprung up from this small beginning
that has now extended over three great lines of railroads which employ
thousands of men.

The long list of labors given do not exhaust the efforts of Mildmay
workers, for, besides special teas for policemen and postmen, and the
mission room and day-school at Ball's Pond, there is also an educational
branch that is meeting the demand for higher educational advantages for
women, under distinctly religious influences, by the Clapton House
School.

The questions involuntarily present themselves, when reading the
undertakings just enumerated, that involve not only faithfulness and
devotion in service, but disciplined, practiced faculties, "What class
of women are these by whom so much has been accomplished? And what is
the training that has made them so effective?" It is difficult to
answer the first question. The deaconesses are of all classes, many of
them being ladies who devote their time, talent, and means to forward
the cause. There are a good many daughters of clergymen, who are
carrying out the associations of their life at home. Just how many are
self-supporting and just how many are maintained by the Institution are
facts that are never known; as Mrs. Pennefather says in a letter of
February 11, 1889, "There are certain points we deal with as strictly
private. While every probationer pays four guineas for her first month,
the after monetary arrangements are never known except to myself and the
resident lady superintendent."


    NOTE.--There is a further department at Mildmay that has never been
    named, but is certainly an important and busy one; it might be
    called the "Department of Inquiry," for certainly the personal
    visits and letters received, inquiring into the details of the
    institution, must be very large. My obligations to Mrs. Pennefather
    are great, who, both by letter and printed matter, has placed a
    great number of facts at my disposal, of which I have availed myself
    freely in writing this sketch. Mrs. Pennefather's words, "we are
    glad when we can help any Christian work with the experience God has
    permitted us to gather," echo the words of the great apostle, "Let
    him that is taught in the word communicate to him that teacheth in
    all good things." I remember, too, the gracious patience with which,
    during one of the crowded days of the last conference, Miss
    Coventry, the superintendent, spent a long hour with us, answering
    fully and minutely the many questions which we put when trying to
    supplement our want of knowledge by her long experience. Indeed, the
    spirit of Mildmay impressed me as generous and helpful; as has been
    said, "Over the whole house rules the spirit of love, devotion, and
    prayer."*

      * "Deaconess Work in England," _The Churchman_, May 12, 1888.


The second question is more easy of response. There is a probation
house, where ladies that present themselves as candidates are received
for a month, and are given work in teaching orphan children, or go out
to the city missions and the night-schools under the care of a
deaconess. If the probation has proved satisfactory the candidate enters
the training-school called "the Willows," a mile or two from the Central
House, a pleasant home which about three years ago came into the
possession of the institution and the inmates of the school, formerly
accommodated in five small houses, are now gathered, at slightly greater
expense, under one roof in the larger, pleasanter home. The following
extracts, taken from a little circular called "A Missionary
Training-school," will give us a good idea of the life of the embryo
deaconesses, and the instruction, practical and theoretical, that they
receive. "The house, which lies a little back from the road, is entered
through a conservatory passage, and on the other side of the spacious
hall, with its illuminated motto, 'Peace be to this house,' above the
fireplace, are the lady superintendent's sitting-room and the large
dining-room, where, on the day when I visited 'the Willows,' about
thirty of us sat down to dinner. Several others were absent in
connection with their medical studies. Both these rooms open on a
terrace, and beyond stretches a garden which, even in lifeless
winter-time, looked inviting, and, in its spring beauty and summer
loveliness, must be in itself a training for the young natures which are
learning in the slums of Bethnal Green and Hoxton their hard
acquaintance with sin and sorrow. Perhaps in these days of strain and
toil too little has been thought of the need of young hearts for some
gentle relief from the first shock of meeting with the evil with which
older workers have a mournful familiarity."

The inmates of the Training-school are not deaconesses alone. The school
was started to prepare workers for the foreign field, but the crying
need of the vast metropolis turned attention to the home field. The
Church of England Zenana Society sends its candidates to Mrs.
Pennefather for training, and she is glad to accept them, believing that
a variety of companionship is needed by those who, in zeal for their
personal work, might lose the broad sympathy for all kinds of Christian
labor, which is an invaluable cultivation for wise and useful laborers.

The several classes who pass through the course of training may be
designated as follows:

a.) Those who pass on to the deaconess house.

b.) Candidates for (1) the Church of England Zenana Society; (2) the
Church Missionary Society.

c.) Those who receive medical training for working among the women and
children of India.

d.) Those who are as yet unconnected with any society.

e.) When vacancies occur some few are received who merely return to home
or parish work, but who are greatly benefitted by training and
experience.

"The general routine of life seems to be as follows: Prayers at eight
o'clock, then breakfast, followed by a certain amount of domestic duty
which falls to the lot of each. For it is not forgotten that these years
of training are not for the sake of home life, but as preparation for
the self-denials of missionary life. Speaking broadly, the mornings seem
to be chiefly devoted to classes; afternoons to out of door and district
work; and thus theory and practice pleasantly relieve and support each
other."

There are regular Bible-classes held by different clergymen, and once a
fortnight there are lectures on the history of missionary work. There
are classes in Hindustani, drawing, and singing, and for those whose
education is defective, elementary classes in arithmetic, geometry, and
short-hand. The probationers are also given training in the duties of
the store-room, and the order and method that they are taught in caring
for the minutest details must certainly form valuable habits in all
those who have any desire to profit by the instruction they receive.

For those who are destined for medical work among the women of India
there is a special course of medical training, both theoretical and
practical.

The age requirement is not so strictly maintained at Mildmay as at many
other deaconess houses, but, as a rule, ladies from about twenty to
thirty years of age are preferred as students in the training-school.
The sum of three hundred dollars is charged for the year's expenses at
the training-school, medical students paying one hundred dollars
additional.

Our study of the Mildmay Institutions has been somewhat extensive. As
was said at the beginning of the chapter, the great freedom and
simplicity of the Mildmay methods, as well as the happy faculty that its
directors possess of utilizing all varieties of individual talent, make
this deaconess establishment one that is full of valuable suggestions to
the similar institutions that are now arising in American Methodism. No
working force is wasted; if a deaconess possess a special talent, she is
given a field in which to exercise it; and if exceptional conditions
arise workers are found ready to meet them. This training provides
well-equipped missionaries for the foreign field, and equally
well-prepared missionaries for the great field of the present hour--the
home mission work in the crowded wards of great cities.

The annual expenses of the Mildmay Institutions vary from one hundred
and ten thousand to one hundred and twenty thousand dollars. Sixty
thousand dollars are received in voluntary contributions, and the
remaining sum is generally obtained from friends who are immediately
concerned in the work.

It is certainly a marvelous tribute to Christian faith, although it is
never heralded as such, that an establishment of the extent and
magnitude of Mildmay has been maintained for years with no permanent
endowment to fall back upon, and that annually the renewed self-denial
of constant friends has to supply the large amount of money needed to
meet the entire expenses. Besides those outward and visible services
which it renders "for the love of Christ, and in his name" Mildmay
furnishes a constant testimony to the fidelity of the Christian faith in
the hearts of many believers.


  [65] _Life and Letters of the Rev. W. Pennefather_, p. 279.
  [66] _Ibid._, p. 305.
  [67] _Life and Letters of the Rev. W. Pennefather_, p. 435.
  [68] _Life and Letters of the Rev. W. Pennefather_, p. 471.
  [69] _Life and Letters of the Rev. W. Pennefather_, p. 471.
  [70] _Mildmay Deaconesses and their Work_, p. 7.
  [71] _Mildmay Deaconesses and their Work_, p. 6.
  [72] _A Retrospect of Mildmay Work During the Year 1887._
  [73] _Mildmay Deaconesses and their Work_, p. 13.
  [74] _A Light in a Dark Place_, p. 21.




CHAPTER XII.

DEACONESSES IN SCOTLAND.


When Fliedner went on his second tour to England he extended his journey
to Scotland, and ventured to Edinburgh at a time when the cholera was
sweeping with fearful ravages through the city in order to become
acquainted with Dr. Chalmers. The great Scotch divine and his good
deeds, that were connected with all kinds of charitable endeavor, moved
the German pastor to admiration and stirred him to holy emulation. On
the other hand, that Chalmers was profoundly touched by the work that
Fliedner had accomplished in Germany there can be no doubt; we have his
own words to testify to the importance he attached to the diaconate of
women. In his lectures on Romans, he says: "Here, too, we are presented
with a most useful indication, the employment of female agency, under
the eye and with the sanction of an apostle, in the business of the
Church. It is well to have inspired authority for a practice too little
known, and too little preached on in modern times. Phebe belonged to
the order of deaconesses, in which capacity she had been the helper of
many, including Paul himself. In what respect she served them is not
particularly specified. Like the women in the gospels who waited on our
Saviour, she may have ministered to them of her substance, though there
can be little doubt that, as the holder of an official station in the
Church, she ministered to them by her services also." It is but
recently, however, that deaconesses have become incorporated into the
religious life of Scotland, and, so far, they do not exist in connection
with the Free Church, of which Chalmers was the able and heroic leader,
but only in connection with the national Church--the old historic Church
of Scotland. Within this Church the question has assumed the form, not
alone of the revival of the apostolic order of deaconesses, but also of
the organization of all the manifold activities of women within the
Church into one whole, which is put under the authority and direction of
the officers of the Church.

Isolated attempts in this direction had previously been made, but in
1885 the first definite steps were taken when the Committee on Christian
Life and Work, of which Dr. Charteris was the Convener, presented to the
General Assembly a report on "The need of an organization of women's
work in the Church," part of which is as follows: "The organization of
women's work in the Church has become a subject of pressing interest.
The Assembly has already sanctioned and regulated the organization of
women's work in collecting for foreign missions, and in sending out and
superintending missionaries. The great and growing strength of the
movement thus recognized is one of the most gratifying things in our
mission; ... but of still older date, and not less powerful, is the part
taken by women in the home work of the parish church. Lady visitors are
carrying messages of divine truth and of human sympathy into the
dwellings of the poor both in town and country. Many have been trained
as nurses that they may be skilled ministrants to the suffering and
sick; and there can be little doubt that the greater part of the actual
personal help which ministers receive in parishes is from the women of
the congregations. But those who have done most of the good work are
most instant in asking from the Church some means of doing still more.
From ministers and from their female helpers have come many requests to
the committee for some provision for training; some recognition and
organization of those who are trained.... In the Church of England are
many homes for nurses and deaconesses; training institutions for female
mission work of every kind; and the rapidity with which they are
multiplying proves of itself how much they are needed; also
non-conformist institutions of the kind, and some separate from all
Churches. Your committee believe that the time has fully come for our
Church's taking steps to supply her own wants in this important
department of mission work."[75]

The General Assembly then directed the committee to inquire into the
subject of women's work in the Church, and to bring up a definite report
to the next assembly. The committee accepted the task, sent out requests
to every parish for suggestions as to the forms of Christian work to be
carried on by women, and the best means of making preparation for their
special training, and prepared themselves by personal inspection of the
leading institutions for training women workers in England to be able to
answer intelligently the same questions. A scheme was reported in 1886
which should incorporate all existing parish organizations, such as
Sabbath-school teachers' and women's societies of all kinds, and should
aim at increasing their number and working power. In 1887 regulations
were perfected for working this scheme, and the approval of this by the
Assembly of 1887 made the new plan a part of the organized work of the
Church.

The comprehensive character of the new departure in the Church of
Scotland is plainly seen from a view of the organization as it now
exists. The three grades into which the Christian women workers are
divided embrace every kind of work done in connection with the Church.
The first grade is general in its character, and forms an association
called the Women's Guild. In each parish the members of Bible-classes,
of Young Women's Congregational Associations, of mission working
parties, of Dorcas societies, as well as tract distributers,
Sabbath-school teachers, members of the Church choir, and any who are
engaged in the service of Christ in the Church are all to be accepted as
members of the guild. The next higher grade is the Women Workers' Guild,
for which a certain age is required, and an experience of at least three
years, with the approval of the kirk session which enrolls them. In
connection with this guild are associates, who have a similar relation
to the members of the Women Workers' Guild that the associates have to
deaconesses in the English deaconess houses. They are not pledged to
regular or constant service, but engage to do some work or contribute
some money every year. They can go to the deaconess house, put on the
garb of the deaconess while there, and as long as they remain can assume
the responsibilities and enjoy the privileges belonging to deaconesses.
The third higher grade is that of the deaconesses. Any one desiring to
become a deaconess "must purpose to devote herself, so long as she shall
occupy the position of a deaconess, especially to Christian work in
connection with the Church, as the chief object of her life."[76]
Provision was also made for a training-school and home where deaconesses
could be prepared for their duties.

There are a great many ladies who for a long time have been engaged in
doing the practical work of a deaconess without being clothed in the
garb, or invested with the office. The Church of Scotland recognized
these workers by providing two classes of deaconesses, who should be
equal in position, but have different spheres of activity. Those who for
seven years had been known as active workers, and who have given their
lives largely to Christian service, are accepted as deaconesses of the
first class, and are free to work wherever they find themselves most
useful within the limits of the Church. The second class embraces those
who shall have received training in the deaconess institution, or have
been in connection with it for at least two years.

When the measure was finally passed by the General Assembly there was no
delay in carrying into execution the details indicated by the plan of
work. The Deaconess Institution and Training Home was at once started.
It was located at Edinburgh, as the most central and convenient place
for the institution, and as furnishing the most available advantages for
the instruction and training of the deaconesses. From here as a center
the work is expected to penetrate into every part of Scotland by means
of the trained workers whose services will be available for all parts of
the country when desired by the ministers and kirk sessions. With true
Scotch prudence and wisdom it was arranged that the lady who was chosen
to be the superintendent should fit herself thoroughly for the duties of
her responsible place by becoming familiar with the workings of similar
institutions in England. She was accordingly given six months' leave of
absence, which she spent among the great London Homes, and only assumed
the duties of her position May 1, 1888. Meanwhile the Home had opened
under the temporary care of a lady who had been a worker in Mrs.
Meredith's Prison Mission, and for six years a Mildmay deaconess. It had
from the beginning the warm co-operation of sympathizing, influential
friends. Regular courses of lectures were arranged on subjects connected
with Christian work, and as similar courses will be demanded of like
institutions in America it may be interesting to give the syllabus in
full:


                          SYLLABUS OF LECTURES.
                          (On Tuesdays at 12.)

                1. B.--Professor Charteris. Four Lectures.
                        "How to Begin a Mission."

  Nov. 29.--1. Whom to visit, and why. The ills we know of, bodily,
    spiritual, social; and seek to lessen.
  Dec.  6.--2. How to induce the people who belong to no church--perhaps
    care for none--to come in.
  Dec. 13.--3. What to do with the children; (a) to attract, (b) to
    influence them.
  Dec. 20.--4. What agencies besides Sunday services prove best.

                  2. C.--Dr. P. A. Young. Six Lectures.
                "Medical Hygiene for the Use of Visitors."

  Jan.  3.--1. Object and scope of the course of lectures; short sketch
    of the structure and functions of the human body, including a
    brief description of the functions of digestion, absorption,
    circulation, respiration, excretion, secretion, and enervation.
  Jan. 10.--2. Fractures, how to recognize and treat them temporarily;
    bleeding, and how to treat it; the use of the triangular bandage.
  Jan. 17.--3. Treatment of fainting, choking, burns and scalds, bites
    from animals, bruises and tears from machinery, convulsions,
    sunstroke, persons found insensible, suspected poisoning and
    frostbite; how to lift and carry an injured person.
  Jan. 24.--4. Sick-room, its selection, preparation, cleaning, warming,
    ventilation, and furnishing, bed and bedding, infection and
    disinfection.
  Jan. 31.--5. Washing and dressing patients, bed-making, changing
    sheets, lifting helpless patients, food administration, medicines
    and stimulants, what to observe regarding a sick person.
  Feb.  7.--6. Taking temperature, baths, bedsores, nursing sick
    children, application of local remedies, poultices, fomentations,
    blisters, etc.; management of convalescents.

                3. D.--Rev. George Wilson. Four Lectures.
             "Difficulties Encountered by District Visitors."

  Feb. 14.--1. Difficulties proceeding from indifference.
  Feb. 21.--2. Difficulties proceeding from ignorance.
  Feb. 28.--3. Difficulties proceeding from adversity.
  Mar.  6.--4. Difficulties proceeding from anxiety.
               Note.--Questions invited from the ladies.

              4. E.--Rev. Dr. Norman Macleod. Four Lectures.
  "Some Qualifications of a Church Worker, especially among the Poor."

  March 13.--1. Motives and aims.
  March 20.--2. Difficulties and hindrances, how to overcome them.
  March 27.--3. Conditions of success.
  April  3.--4. Helps, agencies, etc.

                5. F.--Rev. John McMurtrie. Two Lectures.
            "History and Methods of Missions to the Heathen."

  April 10.--1. History of missions.
  April 17.--2. Methods of missions.


Another wise provision in this Scotch home is the arrangement by which
those who do not wish to become deaconesses, but who want to become
competent Christian workers in their own homes, can come here and spend
some months in receiving training and instruction in various methods of
Christian work. There is no department in life in which many blunders
and much loss of time and usefulness cannot be prevented by making use
of the experience of others who have previously overcome the
difficulties to be encountered. In other words, we need to obtain all
the preparation and discipline we can possibly have in order to do our
work well; and especially is this true of Christian work, which demands
the highest service that the heart and soul of humanity can give. Many
individuals will come to the home to be trained and fitted to work in
their own homes, and will start new lines of Christian activity that
will win the sympathies and efforts of many who are eager to be employed
in good works, if only they can have competent direction.

A pamphlet entitled _The Deaconess Institution and Training Home_ says:
"Are there not many parts all over Scotland--mines, quarries,
etc.--where the population is poor and hard-working? Would it not in
such places be an advantage both to minister and people to have a
Christian lady, trained, experienced, and devoted, to live and work
among them? Or, which would be possible in every parish, would it not be
a great advantage that in case of need--in a mining accident, an
outbreak of sickness--a trained Christian nurse should be available
during the emergency?"

The General Assembly provided that deaconesses should be solemnly
inducted into their office at a religious service in church. It also
provided "that along with the application for the admission of any
person to the office of a deaconess there shall be submitted a
certificate from a committee of the General Assembly intrusted with that
duty stating that the candidate is qualified in respect of education,
and that she has had seven years' experience in Christian work, or two
years' training in the Deaconess Institution and Training Home." Also,
"Before granting the application, the kirk session shall intimate to the
presbytery their intention of doing so, unless objection be offered by
the presbytery at its first meeting thereafter." On Sunday, December 9,
1888, the first deaconess was set apart to her duties. The kirk session
was already in possession of the necessary certificates testifying to
her "character, education, experience, devotedness, and power to serve
and co-operate with others." Due intimation had been made to the
presbytery. The questions were put that were appointed by the General
Assembly:

"Do you desire to be set apart as a deaconess, and as such to serve the
Lord Jesus Christ in the Church, which is his body?

"Do you promise, as a deaconess of the Church of Scotland, to work in
connection with that Church, subject to its courts, and in particular to
the kirk session of the parish in which you work?

"Do you humbly engage, in the strength and grace of the Lord Jesus
Christ, our Lord and Master, faithfully and prayerfully to discharge the
duties of this office?"

The lady who, by answering the above questions, received the sanction of
the Church as one of its appointed officers was Lady Grisell Baillie, of
Dryburgh Abbey. She writes to the author of this book: "I count it a
great honor to be permitted to serve in the Church of my fathers, and I
pray that I may be enabled faithfully and prayerfully to fulfill the
duties to which I am called, and that it maybe for the glory of our God
and Saviour that I am permitted to work in his vineyard."

Miss Davidson, who was temporary superintendent of the home, but who is
now engaged in organizing branches of the Women's Guild throughout
Scotland, and Miss Alice Maud Maxwell, the present superintendent of the
home, have also been set apart to the same office. As has been said,
"Each represents an old Scottish family, whose members have been
distinguished for Christian and philanthropic labors;" and "each
represents a different type of deaconess work." Lady Grisell Baillie is
engaged in gentle ministrations among the people of her own home. Miss
Davidson is at the service of every minister who desires aid in
organizing women's work in his parish. And Miss Maxwell is at the
training-home, leading a busy life in directing the class labors and
missionary activities that center around it and in impressing her life
and spirit upon a band of workers who are to further Christ's cause both
at home and in the mission field.

The mention of any facts that can bring before us the varied character
that the deaconess work can assume is valuable. For to be truly useful,
this cause needs to provide a place for women of very unlike qualities,
and also to allow a certain degree of freedom which will insure the
individuality of each worker.

The action of the Church of Scotland has had its influence upon the
Reformed Churches throughout the world holding the presbyterial system.
At the session of the London Council of the Alliance of Reformed and
Presbyterian Churches during the summer of 1888, Dr. Charteris presented
a report embracing many of the features of the elaborate scheme which
he had previously devised for the Church of Scotland. And the Council,
in receiving the report, not only approved it, but "commended the
details of the scheme stated in the report to the consideration of the
churches represented in the Alliance." We may regard the Presbyterian
churches of Great Britain, therefore, as committed, not only to the
indorsement of deaconesses as officers in the service of the Church, but
to the organization of the whole work of women in the churches, under
ecclesiastical authority and direction.

There is one feature of the deaconess cause as it has been developed in
the Church of Scotland that is of especial interest to the Methodists of
America. Most of the great deaconess houses of England have sprung from
the personal faith and works of earnest-souled individuals. Mildmay, for
example, is a living testimony to the faithfulness and energy of the
Rev. Mr. Pennefather and those associated with him. Within the Church of
England the recognition accorded deaconesses is a partial one, resting
on the principles and rules signed by the archbishops and eighteen
bishops, and suggested for adoption in 1871. But as yet the English
Church has not formally accepted this utterance, and made it
authoritative. The German deaconess houses, while receiving the
practical indorsement of the State Church of Germany, are not in any
way officially connected with it. Even Kaiserswerth itself is solely
responsible to those who contribute to its support for a right use of
the means placed at its command. The same fact applies to the Paris
deaconess houses. They are all detached efforts, not parts of a general
system. But the Scotch deaconesses are responsible to a church, and a
church is responsible for their work. The Church of Scotland is,
therefore, justified in its claim when it says that the adoption of the
scheme of the organization of women's work by the assembly of 1888, "is
the first attempt since the Reformation to make the organization of
women's work a branch of the general organization of the Church, under
the control of her several judicatories."[77] The second attempt was
made, which was the first also for any Church in America, when, May 18,
1888, the Methodist Episcopal Church of the United States instituted the
office of deaconess, and made it an inherent part of the Church economy,
under the direction and control of the Annual Conferences.


  [75] _Organization of Women's Work in the Church of Scotland._
       Notes by A. H. Charteris, D.D.; p. 4.
  [76] _Report of Committee on Christian Life and Work_, 1888, p. 36.
  [77] Nearly all of the facts, both printed and personal, concerning
       the deaconess cause in Scotland have been furnished the writer
       through the kindness of Lady Grisell Baillie, Dryburgh Abbey,
       Scotland.




CHAPTER XIII.

THE DEACONESS CAUSE IN AMERICA.


It was no part of the plan of this book, when first projected, to treat
of the deaconess cause as it is developing within the United States of
America, but gradually, through the kindness of many friends belonging
to different denominations, a number of facts have been obtained which
bear directly upon the question of how the example of European deaconess
houses has influenced and is influencing the Protestant Churches of
America; and it seems unwise to omit them from the consideration of the
subject.

Naturally the German Lutherans, who were well acquainted with the
deaconess work in their native land, were the first to try to introduce
it among their churches. In the yearly report sent out from
Kaiserswerth, January 1, 1847, Fliedner mentions that an urgent appeal
had been made to him to send deaconesses to an important city in the
United States, there to have the oversight of a hospital, and to found a
mother-house for the training of deaconesses. In the report for the
following year Fliedner again refers to the call from America, and
states his intention to extend his travels to the New World, and to take
with him sisters who shall aid in founding a mother-house. In the summer
of 1849 he was enabled to carry out his intention, and July 14, 1849,
accompanied by four deaconesses, he reached Pittsburg, Pa., where Rev.
Dr. W. A. Passavant, who had written so many urgent appeals for his aid,
was awaiting him. The building had already been secured for a hospital
and deaconess home, and, July 17, was solemnly dedicated at a service
where Fliedner delivered the principal address, and a large audience
testified to their interest.

Before his return to Europe Fliedner visited the New York Synod, and, in
an English discourse, described the character and aims of Kaiserswerth,
and commended the newly founded institution at Pittsburg to the sympathy
and aid of the German Lutheran Church in America. No further results
were reached, as the synod contented itself with resolving that "this
Ministerium awaits with deep interest the result of the work made in
behalf of the institution of Protestant deaconesses at Pittsburg."[78]

The institution is occasionally heard of afterward in the proceedings
of the Pittsburg Synod, and in the paper, _The Missionary_, published
under the auspices of the same Church. Urgent appeals were also sent out
for devoted Christian women to come to the aid of the sisters and to
join their numbers; but although the hospital, commended by their
skillful and able ministrations as nurses, had the full approval of the
public, there were few, if any, who came to join them, and they were
unduly burdened by a task too great for their small number.

In 1854 Dr. Passavant resigned his pastoral charge, and devoted his
entire time to the furtherance of the cause, but, up to the present, it
has not attained the complete organization and wide extension that its
friends in the German Lutheran Church have desired.

The institutions which owe their existence to Dr. Passavant's efforts
are the infirmary at Pittsburg; the hospital and deaconess home in
Milwaukee; the hospital in Jacksonville, Ill.; the orphanages for girls
in Rochester and Mount Vernon, N. Y., and one for boys in Pennsylvania.

There is, at the present time, only one of the original Kaiserswerth
sisters left, and that is Sister Elizabeth, the head deaconess at
Rochester. Dr. Passavant still continues to labor at forming a complete
organization on the basis of the Kaiserswerth system, and, to quote the
words of Dr. A. Spaeth, "As he succeeded forty years ago in bringing the
first sisters over from Kaiserswerth to Pittsburg, I have no doubt that
now, when the Church is at last awakening to the importance of this
work, he will succeed in the completion of his undertaking."

A more recent development of the deaconess work in the German Lutheran
Church has arisen in connection with the German hospital in
Philadelphia. The hospital was well equipped for its work, but there was
much dissatisfaction with the nursing, which was inefficient and
unskillful. In the fall of 1882 the hospital authorities turned for
advice and co-operation to Dr. W. J. Mann, Dr. A. Spaeth, and other
clergymen of the denomination in Philadelphia. It was determined to
secure German deaconesses as nurses. Several attempts were made to
induce Kaiserswerth, or some other large mother-house in Germany, to
give up a few sisters to the hospital, but on all sides the applications
were refused. The deaconesses were too greatly needed in the Old World
to be spared for work in the New. At length, through the unremitting
efforts of Consul Meyer, and of John D. Lankenau, president of the board
of managers, a small independent community of sisters under the
direction of Marie Krueger, who had herself been trained in
Kaiserswerth, acceded to the proposal, and the head-deaconess, with six
sisters, arrived in Philadelphia June 19, 1884. They left the field of
their self-denying work in the hospital and poor-house at Iserlohn, in
Westphalia, sadly to the regret of the authorities and citizens of the
place, but to the hospital at Philadelphia they gave invaluable aid.
From the first their good services met with appreciation. The efficiency
of the hospital service was greatly increased; and from physicians and
hospital authorities there was only one testimony, and that a most
favorable one, to the value of deaconesses as trained nurses. Mr.
Lankenau, who has ever been the wise and munificent patron of the
institution, determined to insure a succession of these admirable nurses
for the service of the hospital, and, at an expense of over five hundred
thousand dollars, he built an edifice of palace-like proportions, and
made over this munificent gift to the hospital corporation. It was
accepted by them January 10, 1887. The western wing of the building is
used as a home for aged men and women; the eastern wing is a residence
and training-school for the deaconesses, the chapel uniting the two, and
the whole being known as the Mary J. Drexel Home and Philadelphia
Mother-house of Deaconesses.

A visit to the Home convinced me that the regulations of the house, the
work of the sisters, and the devotion to duty that characterize the
mother-houses in Germany rule also in this home in the New World. The
imposing entrance hall with the great stair-way, the floor and stairs of
white marble, the wide halls and spacious reception-rooms and offices
seemed at first almost incongruous surroundings for the modest active
deaconesses, some of whom were busy in the hospital wards, others
hanging clothes on the line, and others occupied in duties within the
building. But place and environments are only incidental matters; the
spirit within is the determining quality; and a conversation with the
_Oberin_ (head deaconess) and the rector left me with the persuasion
that the spirit of earnest devotion to God and humanity is the
main-spring of duty in this house.

The arrangement of the rooms for the sisters is similar to that at
Kaiserswerth; each consecrated sister has a small apartment simply
furnished for her own use. The older probationers are divided two and
three in a room. Those who have recently entered are placed in two large
rooms, but here every one has her own four walls--even if they are only
made by linen curtains. When Elizabeth Fry first visited Kaiserswerth,
among the arrangements that she at once recognized and commended was
that by which each deaconess was given the privacy of her own apartment.
In the deaconess houses that are so rapidly springing up in different
parts of the United States this provision ought to be guarded with care,
for a life that is so constantly drawn out in ministrations to others
should have some moments of absolute privacy upon which no one can
intrude.

There are at present thirty-two deaconesses at the Philadelphia
Mother-house, twenty of whom are probationers. The house was admitted to
the Kaiserswerth Association, and will henceforth be represented at the
Conferences. The direction is vested in a rector and head deaconess,
neither of whom can be removed except on just cause of complaint. The
distinctive dress is black, with blue or white aprons, white caps and
collars. There is one addition to their garb which Fliedner would have
looked upon with disfavor, and that is a cross--worn by the sisters from
the time they are fully accepted as deaconesses.

The first consecration took place in the beautiful chapel of the Home,
January 13, 1889, when three deaconesses were accepted as members of the
order.

For those who desire to form a good conception of the deaconess
institutions as they are conducted in Germany, a visit to the
Philadelphia Mother-house of Deaconesses will be fruitful of valuable
suggestions.[79]

In July, 1887, a Swedish Lutheran pastor in Omaha sent a probationer to
Philadelphia to be trained as a sister for a deaconess house to be
established in that central city of the United States. In 1888 four
others joined her, and the building of a hospital and deaconess home is
now progressing by the generous support of all classes of
philanthropists in Omaha. A deaconess home has also recently been
founded by Norwegian Lutherans in South Brooklyn, L. I.

In the German Reformed Church a layman endeavored in 1866 to arouse
interest in the deaconess office. The Hon. J. Dixon Roman, of
Hagerstown, Md., at Christmas gave five thousand dollars to the
congregation, and with it sent a proposition to the consistory that
three ladies of the congregation should be chosen and ordained to the
order of deaconesses, with absolute control of the income of said fund
for the purposes and duties as practiced in the early days of the
Church.[80] This, and the action of the Lebanon Classis in 1867,
requesting the synod "to take into consideration the propriety of
restoring the apostolic society of deaconesses," seem to have been the
only steps taken by those connected with this denomination.

In the Protestant Episcopal Church of America the bishop of Maryland
first instituted an order of deaconesses in connection with St. Andrew's
Parish, Baltimore, Md. Two ladies gave themselves to ministering to the
poor, and, with the sanction and approval of the bishop, a house was
obtained and given the name of St. Andrew's Infirmary. In 1873 there
were four resident deaconesses and four associates.[81] An early report
of the infirmary says: "The deaconesses look to no organization of
persons to furnish the pecuniary aid required by the demands of their
position. Their first efforts have been for the destitute and sick. At
the home they minister daily to the suffering and destitute sick
wherever found; some requiring only temporary medical aid and nursing;
others, whom God has chastened with more continuous suffering,
requiring, in their penury, constant care and continual ministration."
There is also under their charge a church school for vagrant children,
and one also for the children of those comfortably situated in life.

The "Forms for Setting Apart Deaconesses," the "Rules for
Self-Examination," and the "Rules of Discipline" in the order of
deaconesses in Maryland are largely patterned after the Kaiserswerth
rules. In truth, the general questions for self-examination in regard to
external duties, spiritual duties to the sick, the conduct of the
deaconesses or sisters to those whom they meet, and the means for
improving in the duties of the office are in many cases selected, and
but slightly altered, from the series prepared by Pastor Fliedner.[82]
The influence of the devout German pastor is indelibly stamped upon the
deaconess cause in whatever denomination it has developed during the
nineteenth century.

In 1864 the deaconesses of the Diocese of Alabama were organized by
Bishop Wilmer. Under the supervision of the bishop the three deaconesses
with whom the order originated were associated in taking charge of an
orphanage and boarding-school for girls. In 1873 there were five
deaconesses, one probationer, and two resident associates.[83]

In the Church Home all of the work is done by the inmates. As in the
foreign Homes, the deaconesses are provided with food and raiment, and
during sickness or old age they are cared for at the expense of the
order. They are forbidden to receive fee or compensation for their
services. Any remuneration that is made is paid to the order. In one
feature, however, the deaconesses of Alabama differ from either their
German or English sisters, and that is in the care of their individual
means. The "Constitution and Rules" says: "The private funds of
deaconesses shall not be expended without the approval of the chief
deaconess or the bishop."[84] This usage prevails in sisterhoods, but,
outside of this instance, so far as the author has been able to learn is
not known in deaconess institutions.

The rules for the associates in connection with the order are given
somewhat at length, from which the following are taken. After defining
an associate as a Christian woman desiring to aid the work of the
deaconesses, and admonishing her that, although not bound by the rules
of the Community, yet she must be careful to lead such a life as is
becoming one associated in a work of religion and charity, she is
requested "to state what kind of work she will undertake, under the
direction of the chief deaconess, and to report the result to her at
such intervals as may be agreed upon." The following modes of assistance
are suggested as most useful; namely, "to provide and make clothing for
the poor; to collect alms; to procure work, or promote its sale; to
teach in the school; to assist in music or other classes; to relieve the
destitute; to minister to the sick; to visit and instruct the ignorant;
to attend the funeral arrangements for the poor; and to take charge of
or assist in the decoration of the church."

The feature of the union of the associates with the deaconesses is one
whose importance can scarcely be exaggerated. There are many who would
be able to serve for a short time in this relation whose valuable aid
would be entirely lost if none but deaconesses who give all their time
and strength could work in the order.

In the Diocese of Long Island Bishop Littlejohn instituted an
association of deaconesses by publicly admitting six women to the office
of deaconess in St. Mary's Church, Brooklyn, February 11, 1872. The
association has not continued in the form in which it originated, but
has now changed into the Sisterhood of St. John the Evangelist. Still
this sisterhood retains many of the distinctive deaconess features. A
sister may, for instance, withdraw from the sisterhood for proper
cause. She labors without remuneration, and the sisters live together in
a home, or singly, as they may please, in any place where their work is
located.

In the Diocese of Western New York there are five deaconesses, with
their associates and helpers, under the direction of the bishop of the
diocese.

In America, however, as in England, within the Episcopal Church
sisterhoods are more influential and more rapid in their growth than are
deaconess institutions. In a list of the sisterhoods of the Episcopal
Church in America, given in the monthly magazine devoted to women's work
in the Church,[85] fourteen sisterhoods are named, one religious order
of widows, and two orders of deaconesses, one of which is that which is
now changed into the Sisterhood of St. John the Evangelist.

In 1871 the Board of Missions of the Protestant Episcopal Church
discussed at some length the relation of women's work to the Church, and
there resulted increased interest in the subject of sisterhoods and
deaconess institutions. An effort has been made to obtain for the order
of deaconesses a wider recognition than it now enjoys, as it simply has
the support of the bishop within whose diocese the deaconesses are at
work. To this end, in the General Convention of 1880, a canon was
presented to the House of Bishops, and accepted by a large vote. But it
reached the Lower House too late for consideration, and no further
action has been taken since that time.

In the Presbyterian Church of America the question of the revival of the
office of deaconess has already claimed some attention. The late Dr.
A. T. McGill for many successive years earnestly recommended the revival
of the office to the members of his classes in the theological seminary
at Princeton; and his views, matured by years of reflection, were given
for publication in an article published in the _Presbyterian Review_,
1880.

In the Minutes of the General Assembly for 1884, page 114, and of 1888,
page 640, we find an overture asking if the education of deaconesses is
consistent with Presbyterian polity, and, if so, should they be
ordained, answered in the negative in the following words: "_The Form of
Government_ declares that in all cases the persons elected [deacons]
must be male members. (Chap. 13. 2.) In all ages of the Church godly
women have been appointed to aid the officers of the Church in their
labors, especially for the relief of the poor and the infirm. They
rendered important service in the Apostolic Church, but they do not
appear to have occupied a separate office, to have been elected by the
people, to have been ordained or installed. There is nothing in our
constitution, in the practice of our Church, or in any present
emergency, to justify the creation of a new office." The next year an
explanation of this action, which so obviously contradicts the facts of
history, was asked, but the committee declined to say any thing more.

The Southern Presbyterian Church has proceeded further, and in the
direction of the female diaconate, as it is characterized in its main
features wherever it has existed, when it declares in its _Book of
Church Order_, adopted in 1879, that "where it shall appear needful, the
church session may select and appoint godly women for the care of the
sick, of prisoners, of poor widows and orphans, and, in general, in the
relief of the sick."[86]

In isolated Presbyterian congregations deaconesses have already obtained
recognition. At the Pan-Presbyterian Council, held in Philadelphia in
1880, Fritz Fliedner, the son of Dr. Theodor Fliedner, was present as a
member, and through the influence of his words the Corinthian Avenue
Presbyterian Church set apart five deaconesses, whose duty it should be
to care for the poor and sick belonging to the congregation.

"More recently the Third Presbyterian Church of Los Angeles, Cal.,
empowered its three deacons to choose three women from the congregation
to co-operate with them in their work, granting them seats and votes in
the board's monthly meeting."[87]

The very interesting article from which the quotation has just been made
seems to think the term "deaconess" a misnomer for the Kaiserswerth
deaconess, as she belongs to a community, whereas the deaconess of the
early Church was attached to a congregation and belonged to a single
church as an officer; but it may well be questioned whether the class of
duties assigned to the deaconess of the early Church and of modern times
alike, that is, the nursing of the sick, the care of the infirm in body
and mind, the succoring of the unfortunate, and the education of
children, are not the main characteristics of the office of a deaconess,
while the fact of her connection with a number of like-minded women in
community life is merely an external feature of the office as it has
developed in the nineteenth century. Whatever form the question may
assume, with the Presbyterian churches of Scotland and England so far
committed to the adoption of the office of the deaconess as an effective
part of the organization of the Church, it seems inevitable that the
Presbyterian Church of America will have to meet this question in the
near future.

The Methodist Episcopal Church of America, although occupying itself
with the question of the diaconate of women later than any of the
denominations previously mentioned, by its acceptance of the office and
by making it an inherent part of its ecclesiastical organization has
taken a higher ground than any Protestant body, with the exception of
the Church of Scotland. The Methodist Episcopal Church has ever offered
a freer scope for the activities of its women members than any other
body of Christians save the Quakers, who are still the leaders in this
respect; but it may be questioned if any furnishes a larger number who
are actively engaged in promoting philanthropic and religious measures.

The honor of practically beginning the deaconess work in connection with
the Methodist Episcopal Church in the United States belongs to Mrs. Lucy
Rider Meyer, of the Chicago Training-school, who, during the summer
months of 1887, aided by eight earnest Christian women, worked among the
poor, the sick, and the needy of that great city without any reward of
man's giving. In the autumn the Home opened in a few hired rooms, and
Miss Thoburn came to be its first superintendent. The story of the
growth of the work, the securing of a permanent home, and the
enlargement of its resources is a most interesting one.[88]

The Rock River Conference, within whose boundaries the Chicago Home is
situated, had from the beginning an earnest sympathy and confidence in
the work as it was developing in its midst. A memorial was prepared, and
was presented to the General Conference in May, 1888, by the Rock River
Conference, through its Conference delegates, asking for Church
legislation with reference to deaconesses. At the same time the Bengal
Annual Conference, through Dr. J. M. Thoburn, also presented a memorial
asking for the institution of an order of deaconesses who should have
authority to administer the sacrament to the women of India. Our
missionaries in India have long felt the need of some way of ministering
to the converted women who are closely secluded in zenana life, and who,
though sick and dying, are precluded by the customs of the country from
any religious service of comfort or consolation that male missionaries
can render. If it had been possible for our women missionaries to
administer the sacrament many Indian women could have been received into
the Church. All of the papers and memorials on this subject were put
into the hands of a committee, of which Dr. J. M. Thoburn (afterward
made missionary bishop to India and Malaysia) was chairman; and the
report of the committee was as follows:


                  "THE NEW OFFICE OF DEACONESSES IN THE
                       METHODIST EPISCOPAL CHURCH.

    "For some years past our people in Germany have employed this class
    of workers with the most blessed results, and we rejoice to learn
    that a successful beginning has recently been made in the same
    direction in this country. A home for deaconesses has been
    established in Chicago, and others of a similar character are
    proposed in other cities. There are also a goodly number of similar
    workers in various places; women who are deaconesses in all but
    name, and whose number might be largely increased if a systematic
    effort were made to accomplish this result. Your committee believes
    that God is in this movement, and that the Church should recognize
    the fact and provide some simple plan for formally connecting the
    work of these excellent women with the Church and directing their
    labors to the best possible results. They therefore recommend the
    insertion of the following paragraphs in the Discipline, immediately
    after ¶ 198, relating to exhorters:


                               "DEACONESSES.

    "1. The duties of the deaconesses are to minister to the poor, visit
    the sick, pray with the dying, care for the orphan, seek the
    wandering, comfort the sorrowing, save the sinning, and,
    relinquishing wholly all other pursuits, devote themselves in a
    general way to such forms of Christian labor as may be suited to
    their abilities.

    "2. No vow shall be exacted from any deaconess, and any one of their
    number shall be at liberty to relinquish her position as a deaconess
    at any time.

    "3. In every Annual Conference within which deaconesses may be
    employed, a Conference board of nine members, at least three of whom
    shall be women, shall be appointed by the Conference to exercise a
    general control of the interests of this form of work.

    "4. This board shall be empowered to issue certificates to duly
    qualified persons, authorizing them to perform the duties of
    deaconesses in connection with the Church, provided that no person
    shall receive such certificate until she shall have served a
    probation of two years of continuous service, and shall be over
    twenty-five years of age.

    "5. No person shall be licensed by the board of deaconesses except
    on the recommendation of a Quarterly Conference, and said board of
    deaconesses shall be appointed by the Annual Conference for such
    term of service as the Annual Conference shall decide, and said
    board shall report both the names and work of such deaconesses
    annually, and the approval of the Annual Conference shall be
    necessary for the continuance of any deaconess in her work.

    "6. When working singly each deaconess shall be under the direction
    of the pastor of the church with which she is connected. When
    associated together in a home all the members of the home shall be
    subordinate to and directed by the superintendent placed in charge.

                                         "J. M. THOBURN, _Chairman_.
                                         "A. B. LEONARD, _Secretary_."


The adoption of this report made its contents a portion of the organic
law of the Church.

It is doubtful if there was any measure taken at the General Conference
of 1888 that will be more far-reaching in its results than that which
instituted the office of deaconess. The full and complete recognition
accorded by the highest authority of the Church commended it to the
people, who showed a remarkable readiness to accept the provisions.
Nearly simultaneously, at important points distinct from each other,
steps were taken to establish deaconess homes, and to provide lectures
and practical training to educate deaconesses for their work.

The terms of the law in which the Conference action was expressed were
not closely defined. It was felt that in establishing a new office for a
great Church there must be room for a wide interpretation, to meet the
various exigencies that will arise. It is true, also, that there can be
no final interpretation until there shall be a basis of experience wide
enough and varied enough to furnish facts that will justify us in
forming conclusions from them. Still it was thought by those who were
practically engaged in the work that there should be a common agreement
on certain practical points: What was to be the training that the
deaconesses were to receive during the two years of "continuous
service?" What was to be their distinctive garb? What was to be the
relation of the deaconess homes, that were arising, to the Conference
board appointed by the Annual Conference? To discuss these and other
questions a Conference was held in Chicago, December 20 and 21, 1888, of
those who were actively engaged in the work. The outcome of the
deliberations was the "Plan for Securing Uniformity in the Deaconess
Movement." Regulations were suggested concerning homes and their
connection with the Conference boards, conditions of admission were
agreed upon, and a Course of Study and Plan for Training
recommended.[89] Of course the recommendations set forth in the "Plan"
are not obligatory, but there has been remarkable unanimity so far in
accepting them.

In addition to the Chicago Deaconess Home, and the branch in New
Orleans, there is the Elizabeth Gamble House in Cincinnati, of which
Miss Thoburn is superintendent; the Home in New York city, instituted by
the Board of the Church Extension and Missionary Society, under the
superintendence of Miss Layton; the home in Detroit, under the auspices
of the Home Missionary Society; and homes under way or projected in
Philadelphia, St. Louis, and Minneapolis; while individually deaconesses
are employed in Kansas City, Jersey City, Troy, and Albany. It is also
well to add that since his return to India, Bishop Thoburn has opened a
deaconess house in Calcutta, with four American ladies as deaconesses,
while at Muttra a second home has been opened, of which Miss Sparkes, so
long connected with our mission work in India, is superintendent.

Pastor Fliedner thought it strange that in the New World where there is
such ceaseless activity in good works, the deaconess cause should make
such slow progress; but the season of sowing had to precede that of
reaping, and it seems now as though the fullness of time had arrived for
the incorporation into the agencies of the churches of America of the
priceless activities of Christian deaconesses.


  [78] _Phöbe die Diakonissen_, Dr. A. Spaeth, p. 31.
  [79] For facts concerning the Philadelphia Mother-house of
       Deaconesses, and other important assistance rendered me, I desire
       to express acknowledgements to Dr. W. J. Mann, Dr. A. Spaeth, and
       Rev. A. Cordes, the rector of the house.
  [80] McClintock and Strong's _Cyclopedia_, vol. ii, art.
       "Deaconesses."
  [81] _Sisterhoods and Deaconesses_, Rev. H. C. Potter, D.D.. 1873,
       p. 118.
  [82] _Sisterhoods and Deaconesses_, p. 105.
  [83] _Ibid._, p. 181.
  [84] Constitution and Rules for the Order of Deaconesses of Alabama,
       Art. vi.
  [85] _Church Work_, May, 1888.
  [86] For this and other suggestions regarding the deaconess question
       in the Presbyterian Church, I am greatly indebted to the kindness
       of Dr. Hastings, President of the Union Theological Seminary.
  [87] _Presbyterian Review_, April, 1889, art. "Presbyterian
       Deaconesses."
  [88] Mrs. Meyer's book on _Deaconesses_, containing also the story of
       the Chicago Training-school and Deaconess Home, gives the best
       description to be obtained of the rise of the work in Chicago.
  [89] A more extended and elaborate course of study has been prepared
       by the Rev. Alfred A. Wright, D.D., Cambridge, Mass.




CHAPTER XIV.

THE MEANS OF TRAINING AND THE FIELD OF WORK
FOR DEACONESSES IN AMERICA.


The deaconesses of the early Church differed from those of modern times,
as we have seen, in being directly responsible to a church society, and
in belonging to a church congregation in numbers of two or more. Modern
life shows a strong tendency to organization. Wherever there are workers
in a common cause they are banded together in societies and
associations. It was in accordance with the spirit of the age in which
he lived that Fliedner united his workers in the Rhenish-Westphalian
Deaconess Society, in 1836. It was a happy inspiration--shall we not say
a _providential_ one?--that furnished a convenient organization for the
office under present conditions. The mother-houses in Germany offered
good working-models, and their practical advantages were so obvious that
in whatever Protestant denomination the diaconate of women has revived,
it has been in connection with these homes. There is no place where the
training of a deaconess in all its aspects can be so well obtained as in
the deaconess home and training-school, which is our synonym for the
German mother-house.

Besides the advantages of a permanent home, under careful supervision,
to which the probationers and deaconesses have access, in such a home
care is taken to train the deaconesses in the doctrines of the Church,
and there is an atmosphere favorable to the virtues of faith and
devotion that the work demands. The deaconesses are never allowed to
forget that they serve in a threefold capacity: "Servants of the Lord
Jesus; servants of the sick and poor, 'for Jesus' sake;' servants one to
another." The motto of the indomitable little republic of Switzerland,
"All for each and each for all," might well be accepted as that
characteristically belonging to them.

Then, too, there is a tradition of service in such a home. One deaconess
learns from another. The physician is at hand to give his suggestions
and medical instruction, and the lectures on Church history, on the
history of missions, and on methods of evangelization make the home a
center of information on all questions that affect the usefulness of the
office. There is no other one place in which to obtain the practical and
theoretical instruction that is needed for the education of a deaconess
well equipped for her work.

Furthermore, the deaconess home offers a wide and varied field for those
possessing different gifts. None can be so highly educated and
cultivated that places cannot be found to utilize their talents to good
advantage; while those who are sadly lacking in the education of the
schools can, by talent, untiring industry, and energy make up for
defects in early training.

The field of work of the deaconess in modern times is a large one. It
would be easier to define what it is not than what it is. In orphanages,
in asylums for fallen women, in women's prisons, in reform schools, in
Sunday-schools, infant schools, and higher schools, in classes among
working-girls and servants, in industrial homes, in asylums for the
blind and deaf and dumb, in hospitals of various kinds, and in churches,
working under the direction of the pastor--in all of these relations and
many others we find deaconesses in Germany, France, England, and other
European countries.

The service in hospitals seems especially incumbent upon Christian
women, and in the early history of these institutions we find
deaconesses mentioned in connection with them.

Before the birth of Christ hospitals were unknown. It is true that in
Rome and Athens a certain provision was made for the poor, and largesses
were given them from time to time. But this was done from motives of
political expediency, and not from sympathy or commiseration with their
ills. But as soon as the early Christians were free to practice their
religion openly, hospitals arose in all the great cities. In the latter
half of the fourth century the distinguished Christian teacher, Ephrem
the Syrian, in Edessa, placed rows of beds for the sick and starving.
His contemporary, Basil, the great bishop of Cæsarea, founded a number
of institutions for strangers, the poor, and the sick, caring especially
for the lepers.[90] Little houses were built closely together, but so
that the patients could be separated one from another, and cared for
separately. Even at that early date the hospitals were arranged into
divisions for either sex, as they are at the present time. To use a
modern phrase, the wards of the men patients were placed under the
charge of a deacon while the deaconesses ministered to the sick of their
own sex, according as their services were required. "It was a rule for
the deacons and deaconesses to seek for the unfortunate day by day, and
to inform the bishops, who in turn, accompanied by a priest, visited
the sick and needy of all classes."[91]

In the Middle Ages there were orders of Hospitallers, consisting of
laymen, monks, and knights, who devoted themselves entirely to the care
of the sick. Under their influence great and splendid hospitals were
built, of which the old Hôtel Dieu in Paris was a conspicuous example.
The Hospital of the Holy Ghost in Rome, and the service of the same
order, originated like hospitals all over Europe. In late years, with
the development of medical and surgical art, hospital arrangements have
arrived at a degree of perfection never before known; and the care of
the sick, as it has been studied and practiced by Protestant deaconesses
and Catholic Sisters of Mercy, has also greatly improved.

The state to which the hospitals had degenerated in Fliedner's time, and
the need of experienced nurses who should be actuated by the highest
Christian motives, were among the strong reasons he advanced for
providing the Church with deaconesses as helpers. Here are his
words:[92] "The poor sick people lay heavily on my mind. How often had
I seen them neglected, their bodily wants miserably provided for, their
spiritual needs quite forgotten, withering away in their often unhealthy
rooms like leaves in autumn; for how many cities, even those having
large populations, were without hospitals! And I have seen many on my
travels in Holland, Brabant, England, and Scotland, as in our own
Germany; I often found the portals of glittering marble, but the nursing
and care were wretched. Physicians complained bitterly of the
drunkenness and immorality of the attendants, and what shall I say of
the spiritual care? In many hospitals preachers we're no longer found;
hospital chaplains yet more seldom. In the pious olden time these men
were always in such institutions, especially in the Netherlands, where
evangelical hospitals bore the beautiful name of "God's house," because
it was recognized that God especially visits the inmates of such houses,
to draw them to himself. Do not such wrongs cry to heaven? Is not our
Lord's reproachful word addressed to us, 'I was sick and in prison and
ye visited me not?' And shall not our Christian women be capable and
willing to undertake the care of the sick for Christ's sake?" It was by
such words, and similar ones, as in his famous appeal "Freiwillige vor"
(Volunteers to the front!) which he sent out from Wurtemberg to Basel
in 1842, that he aroused the Christian women of Germany to give
themselves to this service. By their aid he instituted a system of
nursing that has changed the aspect of every hospital ward in Germany;
and, through the training that Florence Nightingale enjoyed at
Kaiserswerth, the reform that was there instituted passed to England,
and has effected a transformation in the entire hospital system of
England.

In Germany deaconesses are often trained to special duties that are
required in hospitals for certain diseases or certain classes of
patients, and they are becoming so skillful in their duties that the
present system of hospital nursing could not be continued without their
aid.

The nursing care of deaconesses in insane asylums is especially
valuable. The large and well-ordered Insane Asylum for Female Patients
in Kaiserswerth, with its long lists of cases soundly cured, shows how
healthful and important is the quiet, constant influence of intelligent
Christian attendance upon those who are mentally unsound.

The usefulness of deaconesses as care-takers in all kinds of hospitals
and homes for the aged, and asylums of every description, is so apparent
that it does not need to be dwelt upon. The _crèche_, or day home,
where infants and young children can be sheltered and watched during the
day while their mothers are at work, is an institution that started in
Paris in 1834, through the efforts of M. Marbeau, one of the mayors of a
district of the city. This is now incorporated into the government
system of Paris, and the idea has spread to neighboring lands, so that
such homes are found in many of the cities in South Germany and
Switzerland. It is true that there are no nurses that can care for
children as the true mother, but where mothers have to be absent from
morning until night engaged at hard work, and the little ones are left
neglected at home, or in the care of other children who are themselves
young enough to need very nearly the same attention that is bestowed on
the infants; or where the mothers are such in name, but in reality are
failing in every quality which we attach to that sacred office; or where
the foundling hospital is the only alternative to which the real mother,
confronted by the necessity of earning bread for herself and child, can
turn--in such cases the _crèche_ is a real benefaction whose existence
has enabled families to keep together, and children to be given a chance
in life who otherwise would have had small prospect of keeping soul and
body together.

There is another institution, called the waiting-school, where children
from two to four years of age are received, whose parents both go daily
to work, and who would be left to wander about the streets unless this
place of refuge were opened to them. The _crèche_, or day home, seeks
only to watch over the infants who are put in its care, or to amuse them
and keep them contented; the waiting-school goes further, and tries to
give the little ones some ideas of discipline and the elementary
beginnings of instruction. Fliedner, who was a lover of children, took
great interest in both these institutions, and in his school for
infant-school teachers prepared deaconesses especially for the duties
that are required in teachers of this class. The motherly heart, the
gift of story-telling and singing, a pleasant and unruffled demeanor,
the quiet but firm inculcation of order and obedience--these and other
qualities Fliedner sought to develop in instructors for these schools.

The day homes have already been introduced into many places in the
United States, and often cover the field of both the _crèche_ and
waiting-school, but there is a wide opportunity for the extension of
their usefulness; and whether in the future, when the demands upon
Christian deaconesses shall be much more multiplex than they are now, it
may be necessary to provide special training for Christian teachers in
America for such special work, time alone can decide. The question of
Christian education is one that has not yet been determined in its full
extent. In the year 1800 Mother Barat, of the Catholic Church, founded
the order of Sisters of the Sacred Heart, which is especially devoted to
the education of daughters belonging to the higher social ranks. At her
death it numbered three thousand five hundred members, and had over
seventy establishments, which are located in every civilized land. It
cannot be maintained that the education given in these schools is either
extensive or profound, but the influence of the order upon the women
whom it has reached has been both. Fliedner, at Kaiserswerth, went as
far as his age and environments would permit him to go. He provided
schools where teachers were prepared as instructors for all grades of
schools, from the most elementary up to the girls' high-schools; and no
other institution in Germany, with one or two exceptions, such as the
Victoria Institute at Berlin, yet offers positions to women teachers of
a higher grade than is afforded by these schools. But in other lands,
where the educational facilities for women are far beyond those that
Germany can offer at the present time, positions of higher importance
and wider influence are held by women; and it is an important question
for the future what class of women shall fill these places. If Fliedner
had had to meet the problem we can imagine he would have done so with
the boldness and energy that he showed in solving those that his times
and circumstances afforded him. He would, doubtless, have enlisted among
his deaconesses those whose talents gave him reason to provide them with
the widest training the schools can offer; and then he would have
endeavored to place them where they could do the most effective service
for Christ and his Church. It may be that in the future which opens
before the women of the Methodist Episcopal Church of America there will
be just such questions seeking and finding solution.

Doubtless at the present time the deaconess who will answer to the
greatest number of immediate wants is the "parish-deaconess," or the
home mission deaconess, as we may call her. Her usefulness has been well
tested in the great cities of Germany, France, and England, as we have
seen. Perhaps nowhere is her work better appreciated than in London, the
greatest city of modern times. The tendency of this age of manufactures
and commerce is to attract laborers and workers from country homes,
where work has become less open to them through the increased use of
agricultural machines of all kinds, into cities, where factories,
shops, counting-rooms, and offices constantly afford openings. London
has felt the full force of this movement. In 1836 her population was
about equal to that of New York, including Brooklyn and Jersey City. Now
the great city contains 5,500,000 inhabitants. It is growing at the rate
of over 100,000 a year, nor is there any influence at work to stop its
growth. The same causes that produce it are constantly at work. The
great massing of the population together, with the unequaled increase in
the wealth of the people, make the contrast of riches and poverty
striking and obvious. The west of London, with its vast wealth, its
homes of refinement and elegance, and its appliances for the enjoyment
of art, science, and literature, is separated from the poverty, the
degradation, the misery, and the sorrow of the East End by a gulf as
great as that which separated Lazarus from Dives. It is difficult for
those who are at ease, whose lives, to use Wordsworth's felicitous
phrase, are made up "of cheerful yesterdays and confident
to-morrows"--it is difficult for such even faintly to apprehend the
dullness, the drudgery, and the hardships of those who, even at the best
estate, are obliged to live in such surroundings. The vast metropolis a
few years ago was for a short time shaken out of its lethargy by a
voice that would be heard, when _The Bitter Cry of Outcast London_ was
published. "Few who will read these pages have any conception of what
these pestilential human rookeries are, where tens of thousands are
crowded together amid horrors which call to mind what we have heard of
the middle passage of the slave-ship. To go into them you have to
penetrate courts reeking with poisonous malodorous gases arising from
accumulations of sewerage, refuse scattered in all directions, and often
flowing beneath your feet; courts, many of them, which the sun never
penetrates, which are never visited by a breath of fresh air. You have
to ascend rotten stair-cases, grope your way along dark and filthy
passages swarming with vermin. Then, if you are not driven back by the
intolerable stench, you may gain admittance into the dens in which these
thousands of beings herd together. Eight feet square! That is about the
average size of many of these rooms.... Where there are beds they are
simply heaps of dirty rags, shavings, or straw, but for the most part
the miserable beings find rest only upon the filthy boards.... There are
men and women who lie and die day by day in their wretched single room,
sharing all the family trouble, enduring the hunger and the cold,
without hope, without a single ray of comfort, until God curtains their
staring eyes with the merciful film of death."[93]

Such are the places where the deaconesses of East London go in and out
from morn to eve, like angels of mercy, succoring the miserable and
unhappy, often rebuking vice, and encouraging with friendly words those
who are worn and discouraged in the battle of life. Here they nurse the
sick, hold mothers' meetings, start evening classes for working young
men, and gather the children of all ages in every kind of class that can
interest and instruct them. They are always ready to provide for
individual cases that they meet. If they find a friendless young
servant-girl who is out of work, they send her to the servants' home,
where, for very little payment, sometimes nothing at all, she can be
taken care of long enough to give her fresh courage and strength. Then
she is aided in seeking a situation, and so she is saved from the
innumerable temptations to vice and misery that are sure to assail her
if she stands alone.

Many of these deaconesses are educated women, gladly devoting their
whole life and energies to the work, and who with "food and raiment" are
quite content. Nothing but a strong indomitable faith in God's love and
promises can stand the strain of such work. But if there is the faith
and love to deny self and dare all "for the love of Christ and in His
name," where can such rewards for labor be found? The dull streets
become filled with friends, sodden countenances brighten, the little
children come with loving faces and gladdened hearts, and the deaconess
is recognized as interpreting to the hearts of these weary, forlorn,
helpless people the love of God who, when He came upon earth, shared the
burdens that belonged to His humanity. He came as a Man of Sorrows and
acquainted with grief, and it was the "common people" that heard Him
gladly. The deaconess, in her distinctive dress, is becoming a
well-known figure in the east of London, and not only protected but
recommended by her garb, she visits the lowest parts of the city without
danger. Just such deaconesses are needed in the cities of America. The
cities of the United States are increasing as wonderfully as the great
cities of the Old World. With the surplus population of Europe pouring
in upon us by the hundreds of thousands annually our country is doubling
in numbers every twenty-five years; and the growth of the towns absorbs
a larger proportion of this multitude than does the country. The cities
attract the immigrants because there they find others of their own
nationality. In some cities there are whole foreign colonies where the
people speak a foreign tongue, read foreign newspapers, and have very
few interests in common with the people of the land in which they live.
They continue the same customs and the same habits of thought that
belonged to them in the Old World. Examples of such colonies are found
in the thirty thousand Poles in Buffalo, and the sixty thousand
Bohemians in Chicago.

Then the cities offer attractions that are irresistible to the young men
and women from the country. Thousands leave quiet country homes every
year, and, with no certain prospects before them, cast themselves into
the busy life of the nearest great metropolis. In many places,
especially in New England, the villages number less, and farm land is
much less valuable than it was fifty years ago. It is this massing of
population that is causing us already to experience some of the evils
that are old problems in the great cities of Europe. There is the same
gulf between the rich and the poor, with the added element that the
great mass of the poor are composed of foreigners and their children.
And the difference in race is a hinderance to a common ground of
sympathy. A greater hinderance is the difference in religious faith. The
preponderating number of native Americans are Protestants, and their
thoughts and beliefs are permeated with the principles that their
fathers held so dear, and which they sacrificed home and country to
preserve. They hold a faith that is inseparably connected with free
institutions, personal liberty, and personal responsibility. But the
mass of foreigners that are in the great cities largely belong to the
working-class, and, with the large proportion of the poor who are the
wards of the city, are Roman Catholic in faith, a faith that has little
in sympathy with republican institutions, and which least prepares its
followers to exercise the duties of citizens of a republic. Keeping
these facts in mind, the statistics contained in the following extracts
are of telling force: "If the laboring class should contribute its due
proportion to the congregations, the churches, many of which are now
half empty, would not begin to hold the people. In 1880 there was in the
United States one evangelical organization to every 516 of the
population; in Boston, _counting churches of all kinds_, there was but
one to every 1,600 of the population; in Chicago, one to every 2,081; in
New York, one to every 2,468; in St. Louis, one to every 2,800." "The
worst of it is that, instead of improving, the condition of things has
been growing worse every year. While the prosperous classes are moving
away to the suburbs, and the laborers are being more densely massed
together in the heart of the city, the church accommodations, even if
fully used, are becoming more inadequate to the needs of the community.
Including religious organizations of all sorts, New York had in 1830 one
place of worship for every 1,853 of its inhabitants; in 1840, one for
every 1,840; in 1850, one for every 2,095; in 1860, one for every 2,344;
in 1870, one for every 2,004; in 1880, one for every 2,468; and the
religious history of Chicago is even more noteworthy in this respect:
Chicago had in 1840 one church for every 747 of its population; in 1851
there was one for every 1,009; in 1862, one for every 1,301; in 1870,
one for 1,593; in 1880, one for 2,081; in 1885, one for 2,254. All the
large cities have districts which are destitute of church
accommodations, and have not seats in Sunday-school for more than one
tenth of their children."[94]

Have we not as great need of deaconesses as any of the cities of the Old
World? Most of our pastors stand alone. They do not have the assistant
curates and pastors that are connected with large city churches in
Berlin and London. When the minister makes pastoral calls, and, entering
working-men's homes, finds sickness and scanty resources, he has no
deaconess to call to his aid with her cheerful words of encouragement
and her loving sympathy, that are better than money and medicine. It is
not charity alone that is wanted in such cases; it is the knowledge of
how to use proper means to make the sick one comfortable, how to lessen
the burden on the family that a small additional call for work and care
has so sadly taxed; how to enlighten the ignorance that is so common
without wounding the susceptibilities that are so human. For, to quote
the words of the Christ in the _Vision of Sir Launfal_:

    "Not what we give, but what we share,
    For the gift without the giver is bare;
    Who gives himself with his alms feeds three:--
    Himself, his hungry neighbor, and Me."

It is for such ministrations that we need deaconesses in every
evangelical church of the United States; may the women that are ready to
"publish the tidings" be "a great host."


  [90] _Der Diakonissenberuf nach seiner Vergangenheit und Gegenwart._
       Emil Wacker, Gütersloh, 1888, p. 196.
  [91] McClintock and Strong's _Cyclopedia_, vol. iv, art. "Hospitals."
       The editors give as authority for this statement, Augustine, _De
       Civit. Dei_, i, xxii, c. 8.
  [92] Theodor Fliedner, _Kurzer Abriss seines Lebens_. Kaiserswerth,
       1886, p. 60.
  [93] _The Bitter Cry of Outcast London_, pp. 3-10.
  [94] _Modern Cities_, by S. L. Loomis, New York, 1887, pp. 88, 89.




CHAPTER XV.

OBJECTIONS MET AND SUGGESTIONS OFFERED.


"Success and glory are the children of hard work and God's favor," is
the inscription upon the tablet erected in Christ's Hospital, London, to
the memory of Sir Henry Maine.

Upon these two elements depends the future of the deaconess cause in
America. We are assured of the one; will the other be forthcoming? Will
the individual members of the Church give this cause their hearty
support? Surely the facts that have been stated must have convinced the
judgment, but perhaps there are certain prejudices to be overcome. "I
fear that deaconesses too closely resemble Catholic nuns for Protestants
to accept them," says one. No; these helpful Christian women are
thoroughly Protestant. Deaconesses are no Catholic institution. Wherever
they have appeared they have been met by open antagonism from the
Catholic Church. Witness the calumnies with which the papers of that
capital have constantly assailed the deaconess home of Paris.

There is good in the Catholic sisterhoods, but mingled with much that we
disapprove. The deaconess institutions have the good features, but have
avoided the ill. Much of the success of the Catholic Church in winning
the poor and in retaining its influence over the lowly is due to the
power exerted by the sisters who go about from house to house among the
poor, and are received as friends.

There is a great army of Catholic sisters. It is calculated that there
are about 28,000 Sisters of Vincent de Paul, 22,000 Franciscan Sisters
caring for the sick, 6,000 Sisters of the Holy Cross, 5,000 Sisters of
Charles, making a total of about 60,000 sisters of various orders
belonging to the Catholic Church[95] who are occupied with works of
mercy. The sisters engaged in education are often well-trained and
accomplished. The order of Charles will not accept widows, orphans
without property, girls from asylums, or those that have served as
maids. As a rule, those that join it must make some contribution of
money to the order when they are received. This order is small, but one
of the most active and aggressive of any. The great number of the
sisters, however, are women of few advantages, taken from poor homes and
lives of toil. There is wisdom in this course, for a great deal of the
work to be done depends upon qualities that can be developed by
training, while the exceptional education and talents are employed in
the exceptional places.

A contemplation of these facts just recorded causes us better to
understand the importance that the co-operation of women has for the
Catholic Church. It causes us, too, to appreciate better the opening
before the Protestant women of all evangelical churches, so wide, so
all-embracing that every variety of talent can find a place.

Gifts of clothes or food or fuel are not so well appreciated as the
respectful hearing which clothes the teller with self-respect, the kind
word and loving sympathy that feed the heart, the inspiring consolations
of religious faith that animate and warm the soul, and such gifts women
of sympathetic Christian hearts can ever render. As has been well said,
"Shall the advantages of such a system be monopolized by those who have
so little else to offer?"[96]

You may say, "I do not object to the deaconess and her work, but I do
object to her distinctive dress. I do not believe in a uniform of
charity." But let us consider the arguments that can be brought forward
in favor of it. It is a distinctive garb because its wearer is a
distinctive officer of the Church. Unless she were "set apart" by some
uniform immediately and widely recognized how could she have the
protection that is accorded her? Alike in every land where she is known,
as we have seen, the deaconess can venture into any part of the great
cities at any hour, and is invariably treated with respect. There is in
the heart of the rudest and most lawless some trace of chivalry which
recognizes the self-denying lives of these women. Then, in making her
visits, the deaconess finds her dress an introduction that opens doors
that would otherwise remain closed to her. It certainly is a convenient
and economical garb, that saves a great deal of time and money to the
wearer.

Are not these advantages more than an offset to an ill-defined objection
to the dress because it has been associated with women who are alien to
our Protestant faith? This is a minor matter, however, and one that can
be adjusted at liking.

You may say, "I do not like to think of a woman who is dear to me cut
off from the pleasures of home life, and devoted to a life-time of work
among those who, in many respects, must be repugnant to her tastes. It
does not seem so high and beautiful a life as that which makes home a
center, and carries on its activities from there."

But there are many women debarred from the pleasures of home life by
God's direct providence to whom other duties and responsibilities have
been allotted. And then this work may not necessarily be for life. It is
true that when a Christian woman occupies the position of a deaconess
she must relinquish wholly all other pursuits so long as she holds this
office. Neither without grave and weighty reasons should she seek to
leave it. It is her calling. The period of probation has its uses, not
only in making the probationer familiar with the duties and tasks
demanded of her, but in giving her time to test the strength of her call
to service, that she may not, through enthusiasm, lightly assume the
duties of the office, nor as lightly throw them aside.

But if a deaconess is called away to perform her duties as a sister or
daughter, or if she desires to marry, she is free to do so, after giving
due information to those with whom she is connected in work. Freedom and
liberty are in every phase of this office.

As to the highest life for a woman, an archbishop of England well said
some years ago, "that whatever life God gives to any woman is the
highest life for that woman," and that "in becoming a deaconess a woman
devoting herself to this life must believe that it is the highest life
for her, and that in it she gives herself wholly to the Lord."[97]

There should be no country like America for the favorable development of
the deaconess cause, because in no other have women such large freedom
of action, and, if we may believe our friends, they have improved it
well. A distinguished English historian has just given us what we are
fain to accept as words of just and discriminating praise. "In no other
country have women borne so conspicuous a part in the promotion of moral
and philanthropic causes.... Their services in dealing with charities
and reformatory institutions have been inestimable.... The nation, as a
whole, owes to the active benevolence of its women, and their zeal in
promoting social reforms, benefits which the customs of continental
Europe would scarcely have permitted women to confer.... Those who know
the work they have done and are doing in many a noble cause will admire
still more their energy, their courage, their devotion. No country seems
to owe more to its women than America does, nor to owe to them so much
of what is best in social institutions, and in the beliefs that govern
conduct."[98]

Nor in any denomination should we expect women to be more ready to adopt
this work than in the Methodist Episcopal Church, because women members
have been accustomed to exercise nearly all the obligations and duties,
and many of the privileges, that are accorded the laity of the great
connection, and they are prepared to accept new duties in new relations.
This Church has over a million women enrolled as members, able to serve
it in every capacity, from the lady in her home dispensing gracious
Christian hospitality, to the one standing quite alone, who will
welcome, as a brevet of rank, this new call to service. There are many
such women ready to respond. Many, too, whose hearts have been left
desolate by bereavement, who will be glad to fill the empty hands and
vacant life by work for God and humanity. To such a woman the wide world
is her home; the dear ones of her family are the poor and sick and needy
who crave her aid.

The beautiful Mildmay motto is: "They dwell with the King for his work."
There are thousands of women all over the land who are ready to become
"King's Daughters" in this additional sense of the word. The
possibility of what such women can accomplish in the furtherance of
God's kingdom upon earth has not begun to be fathomed.

Think of a great city church, with the manifold interests clustering
around it, left to the care of a single pastor! He has not only the
preparation of his weekly sermons, the care of the social meetings of
the church, but a long line of other duties that are equally important
to maintain. He must perform pastoral duties, push forward aggressive
movements in behalf of the masses not touched by the church services,
and fulfill public duties in connection with great charities,
philanthropies, and moral reforms that he cannot neglect without injury.
If the efforts of such a pastor could be furthered by one, two, or more
deaconesses, as are many of the pastors of the London churches, how
greatly would the working force of such a Church be increased!

It is true that we must develop the work in accordance with our American
ideas and institutions. Through the study of the methods that have been
adopted in European institutions, and the experience that has been there
won through long years of patient toil, we are prepared in a measure to
start where their work leaves off. But we shall find that our
circumstances require new adjustments, and that we shall have our own
problems to solve, so that eventually our work will assume a
distinctively American form.

We have only to plant the seed and to give it favorable conditions for
growth. The outcome is not ours: "In the morning sow thy seed, and in
the evening withhold not thy hand." The results are with Him who giveth
the increase.

The practical question may occur to some one who reads these pages,
"What shall I do to become a deaconess?" Write to the superintendent of
the nearest deaconess home, and ask for directions. It is best not to
multiply homes until we have a larger number of trained deaconesses that
are ready to take charge of them, and until the number of applicants
desiring to enter them is much greater than at present.

Many churches that need the services of a deaconess will doubtless
select one of their number whose heart God has inclined to this service,
and will provide the means by which she can secure the necessary
training at a home and training-school. There are many devout Christian
women in every community who have for years been deaconesses in labors,
if not in title and prerogatives. It is very important for such women to
give their sympathies and fostering care to this new institution. If not
deaconesses by office, they can ally themselves as associates. The
associate is a real officer in many of the deaconess establishments in
London. Ladies who have great sympathy with the cause, and an earnest
desire to do what they can to advance it, give some portion of their
time, their labor, or their means to promote its interests. They will go
to the home and reside there for some weeks or months, being under the
direction of the superintendent and filling all the duties of a sister.
Or, if such duties are not practicable, they will work in behalf of the
home, often securing the aid of those whose assistance is most valuable.
In some places it is arranged that a woman who earns her bread by daily
toil shall be assigned to labor at her regular vocation, consecrating a
certain portion of her wages (perhaps one twenty-fourth) to the cause
with which she is allied.

The Church has been accused of being too abstract, too ideal, too far
removed from the life of the people in its every-day aspects. It is well
for Church members to examine themselves, and the Church communities to
which they belong, to judge how much ground there is for such criticism.
None are so sharp-sighted as hostile critics, and from none can such
good lessons be learned. But this accusation is not a new one, and the
only effectual way to meet it is to point to what the Church has
accomplished. Over eighteen hundred years ago, when John the Baptist was
in danger of mistaking our Lord, he sent to him, saying: "Art thou he
that should come? or look we for another?" and the answer was: "Go your
way, and tell John what things ye have seen and heard; how that the
blind see, the lame walk, the lepers are cleansed, the deaf hear, the
dead are raised, to the poor the gospel is preached."

Let us be prepared to make a similar answer to-day, and the Church need
fear no accusation of holding aloof from the needs of the daily life of
the people.

"Christianity, as it stands in the Bible and in our creeds, will neither
be read nor understood by millions; Christianity as it is revealed in
the loving service of deaconesses will be recognized by the dullest
eyes."[99]

We have reached a new departure in Methodism. The Church has added
another to its aggressive forces. How is it to be received? What welcome
will be given it? May pastors and people, one and all, be in that
attitude of spirit where we shall respond readily to the command:
"Whatsoever he saith unto you, do it."


  [95] _Die Diakonissenberuf nach seine Vergangenheit und gegenwart._
       Emil Wacker. Gütersloh, 1888, chap. vi.
  [96] _Modern Cities._ S. L. Loomis, The Baker & Taylor Co., New York,
       1887, p. 192.
  [97] _Deaconesses in the Church of England_, Griffith & Farran, 1880,
       p. 31.
  [98] _The American Commonwealth_, James Bryce. MacMillan & Co., 1889,
       vol. ii, pp. 586, 589.
  [99] _Phöbe die Diakonissen_, p. 8.




NOTE.

YEARLY EXPENDITURES AT KAISERSWERTH.


While the book is in press the following interesting statistics are
received, which are deemed of sufficient importance to insert here.

Receipts and expenditures of Kaiserswerth for the three years from 1885
to 1888:

      Year.          Receipts.            Expenses.

    1885-1886    333,476 m. 74 pf.    331,812 m. 12 pf.
    1886-1887    371,523 m. 46 pf.    370,626 m. 45 pf.
    1887-1888    337,508 m. 14 pf.    492,384 m. 21 pf.

In the year 1887-1888, the excess of expenses over receipts was caused
by the construction of a new building, and special funds were
contributed which more than met the deficit.

Rev. F. Fliedner, the son of Pastor Fliedner further writes: "This does
not include the expenses in the East and other foreign stations. In
truth, about six hundred thousand marks pass yearly through our
treasury." What an amount of good accomplished by the yearly expenditure
of one hundred and fifty thousand dollars!




INDEX.


   Acts vi, 3, 13, 79.
   Addlestone, 161.
   Africa, Northern, 108.
   Age requirements, 29, 187.
   Alabama, 213.
   America, 73, 107, 252.
   AMERICA, THE DEACONESS CAUSE IN, 204: German Lutherans, 204;
     W. A. Passavant, Pittsburg, 205; Mary J. Drexel Home and
     Philadelphia Mother-house of Deaconesses, 208; Swedish
     Lutherans, Omaha, 211; Norwegian Lutherans, Brooklyn, 211;
     German Reformed, Hagerstown, 211; Protestant Episcopal
     Church, Baltimore, 212; Alabama, 213; Long Island, 215;
     Western New York, 216; Presbyterian Church, 217; Southern
     Presbyterian Church, 218; Methodist Episcopal Church, Lucy
     Rider Meyer, 220; Rock River Conference, Bengal Conference,
     221; General Conference action, 222; Conference, "Plan,"
     Homes, 226.
   AMERICA, THE MEANS OF TRAINING AND THE FIELD OF WORK FOR
     DEACONESSES IN, 228: threefold service, 229; hospitals, 230;
     day-homes, 236; home-mission deaconesses, 238; London, 239;
     cities, 242; parish deaconesses, 245.
   Amprucla, a deaconess, 25.
   Amsterdam, 43, 143.
   Andrews, Edward G., 6.
  _Andover Review_, 150.
   Apostolic Constitutions, 19, 21, 24, 85.
  _Armen und Kranken Freund_, 66.
  "Associates," 193, 213-215, 256.
   Asia Minor, 76, 108.
   Austria, 104, 108.
   Author's facilities, 4.

   Baillie, Lady Grisell, 200, 201, 203.
   Ball's Pond, 182.
   Balsamon, Professor, 31.
   Baltimore, St. Andrew's, 212.
   Baptism, 22, 32.
   Barat, Mother, 237.
   Barnet, 167, 181.
   Bartholomew's prayer, 23.
   Basil, of Cæsarea, 231.
   Beghards, The, 37.
   Béguines, The, 35-37, 145.
   Beirut, Syria, 76.
   Belgium, 34, 37.
   Belleville, France, 134.
   Bengal Conference, 221.
   Berlin, 72, 99, 102, 111, 113, 114, 237, 245.
   Barnardo, Dr., 159.
   Berne, Switzerland, 103.
   Bertheau, Caroline, 72.
   Bethany House, 72, 102.
   Bethany Society, 110, 118.
   Bethnal Green, 180, 185.
   Bible-classes, 175, 186.
   Bible stories, 65, 124.
   Bible study, 84.
   Birthdays, 64, 71.
   Boarders in Home, 132.
   Bohemian brethren, 40.
   Bohemians, Chicago, 243.
   Boston churches, 244.
   Bremen, Germany, 110.
   Brighton, England, 181.
   Brooklyn, N. Y., 211, 215.
   Brotherhood in Christ, 10, 11.
   Brotherhood of the Common Life, 37.
   Buffalo, Poles in, 243.

   Calcutta, India, 227.
   Calvin, John, 42, 134.
   Cambridge Platform, 144.
   Catechumens, female, 21.
   Celibacy. See Monks, Nuns.
   Chalmers, Thomas, 57, 189.
   Charitable institutions, 9, 54, 57.
   Charité, La, 100.
   Charlotte, Sister, 75.
   Charteris, A. H., 190, 192, 201.
   Chicago, Ill., 73, 243-245.
   Chicago Training-school, 220, 221.
   Children, 10, 64, 123.
   Cholera, 48, 170.
   Christ, 246.
   Christianity, 257.
   Christmas, 178, 180, 181.
   Chrysostom, 25, 26.
   Church of England, 149, 150, 157, 191.
   Church of England Woman's Missionary Association, 163.
   Church of England Zenana Society, 185.
   Church of Scotland, 190, 193, 195, 201, 203.
   Church of the Deaconesses, 31.
  _Churchman, The_, 105, 155.
   Cincinnati, O., 226.
   Cities, 242, 243, 245.
   Clapton House School, 182.
   Classes of deaconesses, 186, 194.
   Collecting money, 53, 54, 114.
   Commune, 131.
   Commune deaconess. See Parish deaconesses.
   Compassion, Christian, 11, 13.
   Conference, Chicago, 226.
     Kaiserswerth, 86, 106, 152.
     Mildmay, 167.
   Conference Hall, 171, 178.
   Consecration, 23, 29, 85, 140, 199, 210, 211, 217.
   Contagious diseases, 84, 88, 170.
   CONTINENT, OTHER ESTABLISHMENTS ON THE, 93: Strasburg,
     Pastor Härter, 93; Mülhausen, parish deaconesses, 95;
     Berlin servants, 99; Bethany House, 102; Dettelsau, Berne,
     Sophie Wurdemberger, 103; Saint Loup, Pastor Germond, 104;
     Riehen, Zürich, Gallneukirchen, 104; joint management, 106;
     environment, 107; many deaconesses, more needed, 108.
   Convalescent homes, 181.
   Convalescents' home, 126.
   Cordes, A., 211.
   Constantinople, 25, 28, 31.
   Cottage Hospital, 179.
   Coventry, Miss, 183.
   Crèche, 125, 234, 236.

   Dalston, 146.
   Damsels of Charity, 43.
   Darmstadt, 146.
   Daughter-houses, 71, 138.
   Davidson, Miss, 200, 201.
   Day homes, 235, 236.
  "Deaconess," 149.
     how become? 255.
   Deaconess Institution and Training-home, 195, 198.
   Deaconesses, numerous, 107.
     world-wide demand, 108.
     See "Associates," America, Consecration, Continent,
       Diaconate, Early, England, Fliedner, German, Kaiserswerth,
       Literature, Methodist Episcopal Church, Mildmay,
       Objections, Paris, Scotland, Twelfth, etc.
   Deacons appointed, 13.
   De la Mark, Henry Robert, 44.
   Denmark, 108.
   Detroit, Mich., 226.
   Devonshire Square, 146.
   Devotions, 83, 118.
   DIACONATE, THE, 9: brotherhood of all in Christ, 10; foreign
     missions, 11; home missions, 12; diaconate, 13; female
     diaconate, 14; meaning, 16; qualities, field, 17.
   Diaconate, female, 13, 17, 20, 24, 30, 34, 45, 46, 189.
     organic, 203.
   Discipline, 127, 129.
   Dispensary, 69, 75, 103, 180.
   Disselhoff, J., 31, 41, 48, 76, 91, 108, 109.
   Döllinger, 10.
   Doncaster General Infirmary, 182.
   Dorcas room, 174.
   Dove, symbol, 91.
   Dress, distinctive, 36, 82, 116, 155, 156, 210, 242, 249.
   Du Camp, Maxime, 134.
   Dumas, Mademoiselle, 135, 138.
   Düsseldorf, 56.
   Düsselthal, 56.

   Early Church, 231.
   EARLY CHURCH, DEACONESSES IN THE, 18: Pliny's letter, 19;
     apostolic constitutions, 19; deaconesses, widows, virgins,
     20; deaconess' duties, 21; prayer of ordination, 23;
     greatest growth in Eastern Church, 24; Chrysostom, 25;
     Olympias, 27; age, property, 29; in Western Church, 30;
     decay, extinction, 32.
   East London Deaconess Home, 152, 156.
   Easter cards, 178.
   Eastern Church, 24.
   Eccl. xi, 6, 255.
   Edinburgh, Scotland, 189.
   Eilers, Frederick, 110, 115.
   Elberfeld, 58, 71.
   Elizabeth of Prussia, 101.
   Endowment, 67.
   England. See London.
   ENGLAND, DEACONESSES IN, 142: Puritans, 142; Amsterdam, 143;
     Plymouth colony, widows, 144; Southey, Protestants, 145;
     Mrs. Fry, Fliedner, Florence Nightingale, 146; Agnes Jones,
     147; Ludlow, Stevenson, Howson, 148; "sister," "deaconess,"
     149; Church of England, 150; outside institutions, 158;
     Tottenham, 159; Prison Gate Mission, 161; London West
     Central Mission, 163. See Mildmay.
   Environment, 107.
   Eppstein, 50.
   Epidemic, 87.
   Ephrem the Syrian, 231.
   Europe. See Continent.
   Expenses, 82, 187, 188, 258.

   Faith and works, 202, 230.
   Fallen women, 112.
   Farming, 69.
   Faubourg Saint Antoine, 121, 132.
   Feierabend Haus, 71.
   Ferard, Elizabeth C., 152.
   Flag at Kaiserswerth, 91.
   FLIEDNER, THE RESTORER OF THE OFFICE OF DEACONESS, 46:
     Klönne, 46; Amalie Sieveking, 47; Count von der Recke, 49;
     Theodor Fliedner, 50; Idstein, Giessen, Göttingen, 51;
     Herborn, Cologne, Kaiserswerth, 52; collecting money, 53;
     Elizabeth Fry, 55; Prison Society, Frederika Münster, 56;
     convict Minna, refuge, 57; Fräulein Göbel, deaconesses, 59;
     Rhenish Westphalian Deaconess Society, 60.
   Fliedner, Theodor, 44, 50, 55, 56, 60, 61, 66, 68, 73, 74,
       90, 100, 102, 146, 155, 189, 205, 213, 232, 237, 238.
     wife of, 56, 58, 62, 63, 65-67.
     wife, second, 72.
   Fliedner, Fritz, 218, 258.
   Florence, Italy, 77.
   Florentius, 38.
   Flower mission, 173.
   Foreign missions, 170.
   France, 67. See Paris.
   Frankfort, 72, 110, 111, 113.
   Frederick William IV., 49, 69, 72, 102.
   Free Church of Scotland, 190.
   Friends, The, 220.
   Fry, Elizabeth, 55, 57, 60, 103, 135, 146, 209.
   Fry, Herbert, 146.

   Gal. vi, 6, 183.
     vi, 10, 13.
   Gallneukirchen, 104, 105.
   Gamble, Elizabeth, 226.
   Garden 57, 125, 176.
   General Conference, 221.
     action, 4, 222.
   German hospital, 127, 146.
   German Lutherans, 204, 205, 206, 207.
   GERMAN METHODISM, DEACONESSES IN, 110: Bethany Society, 110;
     reports, 111; fallen women, nurses, 112; Frankfort, Hamburg,
     Berlin, 113; collection, 114; Saint Gall, Zürich, 115;
     Sister Myrtha, 116; "God's Fidelity," 117; regulations,
     Bethany Society, 118; home training, 119.
   German Reformed Church, 211.
   Germany, 46, 118, 202, 235.
     See Berlin.
   Germond, Pastor, 104.
   Giessen, University, 51.
   Gobat, Dr., 74.
   Göbel, 59.
   Gottestreue, or God's Fidelity, 117.
   Göttingen, University, 51.
   Greece, 108.
   Greek Church, 24.
   Groot, Gerhard, 37, 38.
   Guinness, Grattan, 160.

   Hachette & Co., 136.
   Hadwig, Duchess, 115.
   Hagerstown, Md., 211.
   Hamburg, 111, 113.
   Harley House, 160.
   Härter, Pastor, 93.
   Hastings, President, 218.
   Hausser, G., 110, 111.
   Headship, twofold, 106.
   Herborn, 52.
   Herford, 41.
   Herzog, 32.
   Holland, 108.
   Home, pleasures of, 250.
   Home missionary. See Parish deaconess.
   Home missions, 170.
   Hospitals. 48, 62, 69, 71, 73-75, 83, 93, 100, 103, 115,
       125, 127, 146, 158, 170, 179, 180, 206, 207, 230, 232.
   House-mother, 106.
   House of correction, 127.
   House of Evening Rest, 71.
   Howson, J. D., 15, 27, 84, 148, 157.
   Hoxton, 185.
   Hughes, Mrs., 163.
   Huguenots, 141.
   Humanitarianism, 11.
   Huss, John, 40.

   Idstein, gymnasium, 51.
   Ignatius, 21, 29.
   Infirmary, 206.
  _Imitation of Christ_, 38.
   Immigrants, 242.
   India, 186, 187, 221, 227.
   Inquiry, Department of, 183.
   Insane, 68, 105, 234.
   Introduction, 3.
   Invalid kitchen, 173.
   Iserlohn, Westphalia, 208.
   Italy, 77, 78, 108, 232.

   Jacksonville, Ill., 73, 206.
   Jaffa, 182.
   Jerusalem, 74, 162.
   John ii, 5, 257.
   John the Baptist, 257.
   Jones, Agnes, 147.
   Jubilee anniversary, 91.

   Kaiserswerth, 52, 57, 147, 152, 203, 234.
     yearly expenses, 258.
   KAISERSWERTH, THE INSTITUTIONS AT, 61: deaconess home,
     hospital, first deaconess, 63; normal-school for
     infant-school teachers, 64; Bible stories, 65; Fliedner's
     wife, 65; publishing house, _Kaiserswerth Almanac_, _The
     Poor and Sick Friend_, finance, 66; orphan asylum, 67;
     normal-school for female teachers, insane asylum, 68; farm,
     69; refuge, Salem, 70; House of Evening Rest,
     daughter-houses, 71; Berlin, 72; Pittsburg, 73; Jerusalem,
     74; Beirut, Smyrna, 76; Salem in the Lebanon, 77.
   KAISERSWERTH, THE REGULATIONS AT, AND THE DUTIES AND
     SERVICES OF THE DEACONESSES, 79; service, 79; nurses,
     teachers, visitors, 80; probation, 81; dress, expenses, 82;
     duties, quiet half-hour, 83; union, obedience, 84;
     consecration, 85; conferences, statistics, 86; emergencies,
     87; wars, 89; Fliedner's death, successors, 91.
  _Kaiserswerth Almanac_, 86.
   Katherine Home, 163.
   Kempis, Thomas à, 38.
   Kilburn Orphanage, 160.
   King's Daughters, 253.
   Klönne, Johann Adolph Franz, 46, 54.
   Krueger, Marie, 207.

   Lads' Institute, 181.
   Lambert le Bègue, 34.
   Lankenau, John D., 207, 208.
   Laseron, Dr. and Mrs., 157, 158.
   Laundry, 161.
   Layton, M. E., 226.
   Lectures, syllabus of, 196.
   Leonard, A. B., 224.
   Library, lending, 175.
   Life, the highest, 251.
   Lightfoot, Bishop, 15.
   Literature referred to, 10, 11, 12, 15, 20, 21, 23, 24, 26,
       31, 33, 44, 47, 49, 55, 66, 68, 70, 76, 79, 110, 111, 120,
       134, 142, 144, 146, 148, 150-152, 155-157, 164, 167, 175,
       178, 181, 192, 194, 205, 212, 214, 216, 217, 221, 226, 232,
       241, 245, 253.
   Littlejohn, Bishop, 215.
   Liverpool work-house, 147.
   London, 166, 238-241, 245, 256.
     See Mildmay.
   London Diocesan Deaconess Institution, 151.
   London Bible-women's Mission, 160.
   London West Central Mission, 163, 164.
   Loomis, S. L., 245.
   Los Angeles, Cal., 219.
  "Lost Way, The," 100.
   Love, Christian, 11, 13.
   Lucian, 22.
   Ludlow, John Malcolm, 20, 23, 37, 87, 148.
   Luke x, 5, 184.
   Luther, Martin, 40, 42.

   McClintock & Strong, 23, 232.
   McGill, A. T., 217.
   MacMaster, 11.
   Makrina ordained, 29.
   Maine, Henry, 247.
   Malta, 182.
   Mann, W. J., 207, 211.
   Marbeau, M. 235.
   Marthashof, 99, 102.
   Mary J. Drexel Home and Philadelphia Mother-house of
       Deaconesses, 87, 127, 210, 211.
   Matt. xi, 3-5, 257.
   Maxwell, Alice Maud, 200, 201.
   Medical mission, 179.
   Medical training, 186, 187.
   Mennonites, 44, 54, 59.
   Men's Bible-class, 175.
   Men's Institute, 180.
   Men's Night-school, 174.
   Meredith, Mrs., 160, 162.
   Methodism, German, 110.
   Methodist Episcopal Church, 107, 203, 220, 253, 257.
   Meyer, Consul, 207.
   Meyer, Lucy Rider, 220, 221.
   Middle Ages, 232.
   Middleburg, 42.
   Mildmay, 202, 253.
   MILDMAY INSTITUTIONS, 166: William Pennefather, Barnet,
     Conferences, 167; Mildmay Park, 168; missionary
     training-school and home, 169; deaconesses, 170; conference
     hall, deaconess house, 171; Pennefather's death, successor,
     173; invalid kitchen, flower mission, 173; Dorcas room,
     men's night school, 174; lending library, men's Bible-class,
     servants' registry, 175; sitting-room, 175; garden, 176;
     orphanage, Scripture texts, 177; conference hall, parish
     deaconesses, 178; nursery home, cottage hospital, medical
     mission, 179; Bethnal Green, 180; convalescent homes, 181;
     nurses, railway mission, 182; deaconesses of all classes,
     183; missionary training-school, 184; classes trained, 186;
     expenses, 188.
   Milwaukee, Wis., 73, 206.
   Ministræ, 19.
   Minna, convict, 57.
   Minneapolis, Minn., 226.
   Missionary training school, 169, 170, 184, 185, 186.
   Missions, 11, 12.
   Mohammedans, 75.
   Monks, 32, 41, 136.
   Monod, Sara, 120, 136, 138.
   Monod, W., 120.
   Moravians, 44, 45.
   Morley, Samuel, 159.
   Mother-houses, 64, 72, 74, 80, 86, 106.
   Mothers, 235.
   Mount Vernon, N. Y., 206.
   Mülhausen, 95.
   Münster, Frederika, 56.
   Muttra, India, 227.
   Myrtha, Sister, 116.

   Neal, Daniel, 142.
   Neander, 23, 24.
   Nectarius, Bishop, 28.
   Netherlands, 35, 37, 39, 42, 44.
   Neudettelsau, 103.
   New Orleans, La., 226.
   New York, N. Y., 226, 244, 245.
   Nicarete, deaconess, 25.
   Night-school, 174.
   Nightingale, Florence, 146-148, 234.
   Normal school, 64, 66, 68.
  _North American Review_, 12.
   Norway, 108.
   Norwegian Lutherans, 211.
   Nuns, 32, 37, 41, 151, 247.
   Nursery girls, 101.
   Nursery home, 179.
   Nurses, 68, 71, 80, 83, 89, 90, 93, 104, 112, 113, 127, 133,
       182, 191, 208.
   Nursing sisters' institution, 146.

   OBJECTIONS MET AND SUGGESTIONS OFFERED, 247: hard work and
     God's favor, 247; not nuns, 247; Roman Catholic sisters,
     248; distinctive dress, 249; cut off from home life, 250;
     America favorable, 252; Methodist Episcopal Church
     favorable, 253; how become deaconess? 255; "do it," 257.
   Orleans, Synod of, 30.
   Olympias, 26, 27.
   Omaha, Neb., 211.
   Ordination. See Consecration.
   Origen, 30.
   Orphanages, 67, 73, 75-77, 159, 177, 206.
  "Outsiders," 164.

   Palestine, 76.
   Paris, 232, 235.
   PARIS, DEACONESSES IN, 120: Sara Monod, W. Monod, 120;
     deaconess establishment, 121; reports, children, 123;
     crèche, hospital, 125; convalescents' home, 126; house of
     correction, 127; moral results, 130; Commune investigation,
     131; wounded, boarders, 132; preparatory school, nurses,
     133; success, parish deaconesses, 134; prisons for women,
     135; Mademoiselle Dumas, 136; branches, 138; parish
     deaconesses, 139; consecration, 140.
   Paris, Matthew, 37.
   Parish Deaconesses, 72, 80, 96, 103, 110, 134, 139, 191,
       238, 254.
   Pascal, Jacqueline, 125.
   Passavant, W. A., 73, 205, 206.
   Passy, 126.
   Pastors, 245, 254.
   Pegran, Pasteur, 44.
   Pentadia, 26.
   Pennefather, William, 167, 173, 202.
     wife of, 173.
   1 Pet. ii, 5, 40.
     iii, 4, 155.
   Pharmacy, 126.
   Philadelphia, Pa., 87, 127, 207, 210, 218, 226.
   Phoebe, 14, 22, 189, 205.
   Pilgrim fathers, 143, 144.
   Pittsburg, Pa., 73, 205.
   Plan for securing uniformity, 226.
   Plato, 10.
   Pliny, letter, ministræ, 19.
   Poles in Buffalo, 243, 244.
   Poor Men of Lyons, 39.
  _Poor and Sick Friend_, 66, 104, 152.
   Portsmouth, 153.
   Potter, H. C. 212.
   Prayer, 23, 83, 84, 118.
   Presbyterian Church, 202, 217.
  _Presbyterian Review_, 217, 219.
   Preparatory school, 133.
   Princess Mary Village Home, 161.
   Prison Gate Mission, 161.
   Prisoners, 55-58, 60, 70, 112, 135, 160, 161.
   Probation, 81, 118, 184, 187.
   Procla, deaconess, 26.
   Protestant Episcopal Church, 212.
   Protestants, 48, 105, 145, 151.
   Psa. lxviii, 11, 246.
   Publishing House, 66, 136.
   Pudentiana, deaconess, 30.
   Puritans, 142, 144.
   Pusey, Dr., 149.

   Railway mission, 182.
   Recke, Count von der, 49.
   Rector, 106.
   Reformed Church, 42.
   Regulations, 79, 118, 193, 213.
   Reichardt, Gertrude, 63.
   Rest, 70, 71, 117.
   Rhenish-Westphalian Deaconess Society, 228.
   Riehen, near Basel, 104.
   Rochester, N. Y., 73, 206.
   Rock River Conference, 221.
   Roman, J. Dixon, 211.
   Roman Catholic Church, 30, 34, 244, 248, 249.
   Rom. xvi, 1, 14, 115, 189.
   Rome, 30, 78, 232.
   Rue de Bridaine, 139.
   Rue de Reuilly, 120, 127, 132.
   Russia, 108.

   Sabiniana, 25.
   Sachsenhausen, 112.
   St. Christopher's Church, 35.
   St. Gaul, 112, 115.
   St. Louis, Mo., 226.
   St. Loup, 104.
   St. Marie, 134.
   Salem, 70, 77, 117.
   Salisbury Home, 153.
   Salle d'Asile, 123.
   Savings Bank, 181.
   Schäfer, Theodor, 22, 27, 39, 42, 49, 95, 99, 146.
   Schaff, Philip, 23, 24, 30.
   Scheffel, 115.
   SCOTLAND, DEACONESSES IN, 189: Church of Scotland, A. H.
     Charteris's report, 190; three grades of women workers, 193;
     Deaconess Institution and Training-home, 195; syllabus of
     lectures, 196; consecration, seven years' experience or two
     years' training, 199; Presbyterian Churches of Great
     Britain, 202; office of deaconess made organic, 203.
   Scripture texts, illustration of, 177.
   Servants, 85, 99, 101, 102.
   Servants Home, 241.
   Servants' Registry, 175.
   Service, threefold, 79, 229.
   Shanghai, 109.
   Sieveking, Amalie, 47.
   Singing, 84, 85.
  "Sister," 149, 165.
   Sisterhoods, 47, 150, 157, 212, 215, 216, 248.
   Sisters of Charity, 93, 136, 145.
   Sisters of the Common Life, 37, 39.
   Sisters of the People, 163, 164.
   Sisters of the Sacred Heart, 237.
   Smyrna, 76.
   Soup Kitchen, 169.
   Southern Presbyterian Church, 218.
   Southey, 145, 146.
   Spaeth, A., 205, 207, 211.
   Spain, 108.
   Sparkes, Miss, 227.
   Sparta, 10.
   Spee, Count, 58.
   Spee, Countess, 59.
   Statistics, 86, 87.
   Stevenson. Dr., 148.
  "Stille halbe Stunde," 84.
   Strasburg, 93.
   Success and glory, 247.
   Superintendent, 72, 195.
   Support. See Expenses.
   Sweden, 108.
   Swedish Lutherans, 211.
   Switzerland, 104, 112, 235.
   Syllabus of Lectures, 196.
   Syria, 76.

   Talitha Cumi, 75.
   Teachers, 68, 76, 80.
     See Normal.
   Theodosius, Emperor, 28.
   Thoburn, Isabella, 226.
   Thoburn, J. M., 5, 221, 222, 224, 227.
   1 Tim. iii, 8, 17.
     iii, 8, 9, 79.
     iii, 11, 15.
     v, 9, 16.
   Tit. ii, 3, 16.
   Tottenham, 159.
   Training-school, 62, 70, 229.
   Turkey, 108.
   TWELFTH TO THE NINETEENTH CENTURIES, DEACONESSES FROM THE,
     34; Belgium, Lambert le Bègue, 34; Béguines, 35; Sisters
     and Brothers of the Common Life, Gerhard Groot, 37; Thomas à
     Kempis, 38; Waldenses, 39; Bohemians, Huss, 40; Luther, 40;
     Calvin, 42; Netherlands, 42; Damsels of Charity, 43;
     Mennonites, Moravians, 44; Zinzendorf, 45.

   Uniformity, Plan, 226.
   United States. See America.

   Valette, Pastor, 130, 139.
   Vermeil, Pastor, 100, 139.
   Vienna, 104.
   Virgins, 20, 21, 25.
   Von Stein, 48.

   Wacker, Emil, 21, 40, 66, 231, 248.
   Waiting-school, 235, 236.
   Wakefield, Bishop of, 157.
   Waldenses, 39.
   Wars, nurses in, 89.
   Weiss, G., 110.
   Wesel, 42.
   Western Church, 30.
   Western New York, 216.
   Widows, 16, 20, 21, 144.
   Williams, Miss, 104.
  "Willows, The," 184.
   Wilmer, Bishop, 213.
   Winckworth, C., 102.
   Women, Old Testament, 24.
     Apostolic times, 13, 16.
     Early Church, 20.
     Methodist, 6.
   Women's Guild, 193, 200.
   Women Workers' Guild, 193.
   Wordsworth, 15, 239.
   Work, hard, 247.
   Wounded, 89, 131.
   Wurdemberger, Sophie, 103.
   Wurtemberg, 110.
   Work-house, 72, 147.

   Young, Alexander, 144.

   Zinzendorf, Count, 45.
   Zürich, 104, 112, 115, 116.




  +------------------------------------------------------------------+
  |                                                                  |
  | Transcriber's notes: Obvious spelling/typographical and          |
  | punctuation errors have been corrected after careful comparison  |
  | with other occurrences within the text and consultation of       |
  | external sources.                                                |
  |                                                                  |
  | The original book was published by HUNT & EATON at New York, and |
  | by CRANSTON & STOWE at Cincinnati. The copyright date was 1889.  |
  |                                                                  |
  | Occasional discrepancies between index and text (for example,    |
  | "Harter" in the index but "Härter" in the text) have been        |
  | corrected to match the text.                                     |
  |                                                                  |
  | Some inconsistent mid-line hyphenations have been retained:      |
  |  "bedside" and "bed-side" occur once each                        |
  |  "housework" and "house-work" occur once each                    |
  |  "workhouse[s]" occurs twice and "work-house" occurs three times |
  |                                                                  |
  +------------------------------------------------------------------+





End of Project Gutenberg's Deaconesses in Europe, by Jane M. Bancroft

*** END OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK DEACONESSES IN EUROPE ***

***** This file should be named 20747-8.txt or 20747-8.zip *****
This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
        http://www.gutenberg.org/2/0/7/4/20747/

Produced by Barbara Tozier, David Wilson, Bill Tozier and
the Online Distributed Proofreading Team at
http://www.pgdp.net


Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
will be renamed.

Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
permission and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules,
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
copying and distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works to
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be used if you
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
rules is very easy.  You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose
such as creation of derivative works, reports, performances and
research.  They may be modified and printed and given away--you may do
practically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.  Redistribution is
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
redistribution.



*** START: FULL LICENSE ***

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm License (available with this file or online at
http://gutenberg.org/license).


Section 1.  General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works

1.A.  By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement.  If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your possession.
If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1.B.  "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark.  It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
paragraph 1.C below.  There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.  See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
copying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
Gutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.

1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are in
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
States.

1.E.  Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
copied or distributed:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org

1.E.2.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
or charges.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a work
with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
Project Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or
1.E.9.

1.E.3.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5.  Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6.  You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including any
word processing or hypertext form.  However, if you provide access to or
distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than
"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.org),
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
request, of the work in its original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7.  Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8.  You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works provided
that

- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.  Royalty payments
     must be paid within 60 days following each date on which you
     prepare (or are legally required to prepare) your periodic tax
     returns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     address specified in Section 4, "Information about donations to
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."

- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
     you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     License.  You must require such a user to return or
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     and discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of
     Project Gutenberg-tm works.

- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of any
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days
     of receipt of the work.

- You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
     distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9.  If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set
forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1.  Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
collection.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
"Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other intellectual
property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or other medium, a
computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by
your equipment.

1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees.  YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH F3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3.  LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS' WITH NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTIBILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5.  Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in accordance
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works,
harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm
work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or deletions to any
Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any Defect you cause.


Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It exists
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need, is critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
and how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4
and the Foundation web page at http://www.pglaf.org.


Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541.  Its 501(c)(3) letter is posted at
http://pglaf.org/fundraising.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
permitted by U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
Fairbanks, AK, 99712., but its volunteers and employees are scattered
throughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at
809 North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887, email
business@pglaf.org.  Email contact links and up to date contact
information can be found at the Foundation's web site and official
page at http://pglaf.org

For additional contact information:
     Dr. Gregory B. Newby
     Chief Executive and Director
     gbnewby@pglaf.org


Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment.  Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements.  We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance.  To
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
particular state visit http://pglaf.org

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses.  Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including checks, online payments and credit card donations.
To donate, please visit: http://pglaf.org/donate


Section 5.  General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.

Professor Michael S. Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
with anyone.  For thirty years, he produced and distributed Project
Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.


Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarily
keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.


Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:

     http://www.gutenberg.org

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.
